ābhāsa (abhasa) ~ appearance; (in Bengali) glimmer, hint.
ābhāva (abhava) ~ entry into the being from outside.
abhaya (abhaya; abhayam) ~ fearlessness; passive courage, “freedom from fear which with a bold calmness meets and receives every menace of danger and shock of misfortune”, an attribute of the ks.atriya.
abhayaṁ, sāhasa, ātmaślāghā, yaśolipsā (abhayam, sahasa, atmaslagha, yasholipsa) ~ fearlessness, daring, self-confidence, the urge towards victory (the attributes of the ks.atriya).
abhayaṁ, sāhasa, yaśolipsā, ātmaślāghā, iti ksatratejah (abhayam, sahasam, yasholipsa, atmaslagha, iti kshatratejah) ~ fearlessness, daring, the urge towards victory, self-confidence: these express the energy of the ks.atriya temperament.
abhimāna (abhimana)~ pride; egoism.
abhiśastih. (abhisastih) ~ hostile expression.
abhis.t.i (abhisti) ~ invasion.
abhyāsa (abhyasa) ~ repetition; exercise; discipline; practice.
ācchanna (acchanna) ~ covered, concealed.
active brahman ~ same as sagun.a brahman, the dynamic aspect of brahman which is expressed in the cosmic movement, “a universal Divine, one in being, multiple in personality and power, who conveys to us, when we enter into the consciousness of his universal forces, a sense of infinite quality and will and act and world-wide knowledge and a one yet innumerable delight”; realised by the mind separately from the śāntaṁ brahma or silent brahman, it is an aspect of universal being which “though wonderfully freed, uplifted and illumined, supports only the present self-expression of the Cosmic Spirit and does not transform, as would a transcendental Descent, the ambiguous symbols and veiled mysteries of a world of Ignorance”.
active samatā ~ equality in one’s response to the contacts of the world, consisting of (sama) rasa, (sama) bhoga and (sama) ānanda, also called positive samatā: an “active equality which will enable us not only to draw back from or confront the world in a detached and separated calm, but to return upon it and possess it in the power of the calm and equal Spirit”.
actual gnosis ~ same as actualistic ideality.
actualistic ~ characterised by a working of intuition which, in dealing with the movement in time, lays “stress on the stream of immediate actualities”.
actualistic ideality ~ an intuitional form of logistic ideality which, applied to the field of trikāladr.s.t.i and tapas, “depends upon the existent
actuality, illumines it, goes a little beyond it but from it”.
actualistic logistis ~ same as actualistic ideality.
actualistic seer tapas ~ tapas acting in the actualist intuitional revelation, the lowest form of seer tapas.
actualistic seer trikāladr.s.t.i (trikaldrishti) ~ trikāladr.s.t.i in the actualist intuitional revelation.
actualist intuitional revelation ~ actualistic ideality raised to the intuitive revelatory logistis.
adāsya (adasya) ~ inability to surrender, “insubmission”, absence of dāsya.
adequate ~ (vāk) having the qualities of the lowest level of style, which “has the power to make us . . . see the object or idea in a certain temperate lucidity of vision”; most often combined with a higher level, as in the effective-adequate style or the inevitable form of the adequate.
ādeśa (adesha; adesh) ~ command; a voice (vān.ı̄) heard inwardly as “the command of the Divine Guide of the Yoga”; especially, “the Adesha given in the jail”, the inner command received by Sri Aurobindo in Alipur jail giving him a mission to accomplish a certain work, karma, with four principal parts: literary (sāhitya), religious (daiva or dharma), political (kr.ti) and social (samāja or kāma1).
ādeśasiddhi (adeshasiddhi; adesha-siddhi; adesha siddhi; adeshsidhi; adesh-siddhi; adesh siddhi) ~ fulfilment of the divine command (ādeśa) enjoining the accomplishment of a certain mission (karma), awork for the world with literary, political, social and spiritual aspects.
ādeśavān.ı̄ (adesavani, adeshavani) ~ “speech of supreme command”, the highest form of vān.ı̄, which “is clear and irresistible, the mind has to obey and there is no question possible, even if what comes is contrary to the preconceived ideas of the mental intelligence”.
ādhāra (adhara; adhar) ~ vessel, receptacle; support; “that in which the consciousness is now contained ~ mind-life-body”, the psychophysical system comprising the antah.karan.a and the sthūla deha; a
physical object or sensation serving as a support or background for
rūpadr.s.t.i or any other kind of vis.ayadr.s.t.i.
ādhāradr.s.t.i (adhardrishti; adhar drishti) ~ vision of images on a background (sādhāra rūpa).
ādhāra-siddhi (adhara-siddhi) ~ the perfection of the mental-vital-physical system, consisting of the siddhi of the first four catus.t.ayas, so that the ādhāra “becomes a perfect instrument for the Purushottama, the Purusha and Shakti to carry on their Lila”.
adharma ~ not dharma; lawlessness.
adhogati ~ literally “downward movement”; the negation of utthāpanā, especially due to defective laghimā and mahimā.
adhyaks.atva (adhyaksatva, adhyakshatwa) ~ the status of the Divine Being “as the adhyaks.a, he who seated over all in the supreme ether over-sees things, views and controls them from above”.
adhyāropa (adhyaropa) ~ superimposition.
adhyāropita (adhyaropita) ~ superimposed.
adhyāya (adhyaya) ~ chapter.
adı̄natā (adinata)~ freedom from depression; the opposite of dainyam.
adı̄natā ksipratā sthairyam ı̄śvarabhāva (adinata kshiprata sthairyam, ishwarabhava) ~ non-depression, swiftness, steadiness, mastery: the second general formula of the śakti catus.t.aya, consisting of qualities needed for the perfection of all parts of the psycho-physical system.
Aditi ~ the Vedic goddess of infinite being, the mother of the gods, manifested here as the earth-goddess (Pr.thivı̄2); the ādyā-śakti, the indivisible consciousness (cit), force (tapas) and bliss (ānanda) of the Supreme.
adri ~ rock; hill; a Vedic symbol of “formal existence and especially of the physical nature”.
adr.s.t.am (adrishtam) ~ literally “the unseen”; fate.
ādyā mahāśakti (adya mahashakti) ~ the original cosmic Power (mahāśakti), the universal śakti on the highest plane of the eternal manifestation.
adya
ādy
ā par
parasakti
āśakti (adya parashakti) ~ the original supreme Power (parā
śakti), the transcendent śakti who “stands above the worlds and links
the creation to the ever unmanifest mystery of the Supreme”.
ādyā-śakti (adyashakti; adya-shakti) ~ the original Power (śakti),
adya-sakti
both transcendent (ādyā parāśakti) and universal (ādyā mahāśakti).
Aghora ~ literally “not terrible” (though terrible, ghora, in appearance), an epithet of Śiva, the destroyer; a form of Tantra of the
vāmamārga or “left-hand path” which annuls all distinctions; a being
or world characterised by samatā (equality).
Agner bhr
bhrajante
ājante arcayah. (Agner bhrajante archayah) ~ the ﬂaming
radiances of Agni2 blaze forth. [R
. g Veda 1.44.12]
āgneya-sparśa (agneya-sparsha) ~ fiery or burning touch.
agneya-sparsa
agni1 ~ fire; fiery energy; the fire of Agni2, “the ﬂame of divine Force
instinct with divine knowledge”; the bhūta of fire, “the igneous, radiant and electric energy”, also called tejas; the type of akashic material
called “fire”.
Agni2 (Agni; Agnih) ~ the god of Fire; in Sri Aurobindo’s interpretation of the Veda, the deva as the master of tapas, “the divine Consciousness formulating itself in universal energy”; he is the “secret inhabitant of Matter and its forms” and “the power of conscious Being, called by us will, effective behind the workings of mind and body”; his “divine birth-place and home, ~ though he is born everywhere and dwells in all things, ~ is the Truth, the Infinity, the vast cosmic Intelligence in which Knowledge and Force are unified”.
agnimaya ~ fiery; pertaining to the bhūta of agni1; (rūpa or lipi) composed of or containing the akashic material called agni or “fire”.
agnimaya varn. a ~ fiery colour; varn.a mixed with an element of agni .
Agni Rudra ~ Agni2, the god of Force, identified with Rudra2, “the
Divine as master of our evolution by violence and battle”.
Agni Tvasta
Tvas.t.ā (Agni Twashta) ~ Agni2, the universal energy, as Tvas.t.ā,
“the Fashioner of things”.
Agni-Vāyu (Agni-Vayu; Agni Vayu) ~ Agni2, the divine Force, workAgni-Vayu
ing through the vital energy of Vāyu2.
Agni-V
Agni-Vayu-Aryaman
āyu-Aryaman ~ the three forceful gods Agni2, Vāyu2 and
Aryaman unified to form one deity.
Agni-V
Agni-Vayu-Aryaman
āyu-Aryaman bhāva ~ the self-manifestation of the deva as Agni2, Vāyu2 and Aryaman, forming part of devabhāva.
āgraha ~ insistence.
ahaituka ~ causeless; objectless; lacking a hetu; (with reference to
any form of physical ānanda or certain types of subjective ānanda)
manifesting without relation to an outer stimulus or object; short for
ahaituka ānanda.
ahaituka ānanda
ananda ~ “objectless bliss”; a kind of subjective ānanda, “self-existent and independent of objects and particular experiences”, which manifests on the plane of mind (manas) as “an even and tranquil neutral joy”; any form of physical ānanda not associated with an external stimulus.
ahaituk ānanda ~ the form of ānanda corresponding to the mental plane (same as ahaituka ānanda).
aham ~ I; ego, “the sense of a separate self-existence” (same as ahaṅkāra); (“the divine Aham”) the individual consciousness “no longer as an obscured and limited ego, but as a centre of the Divine and of the universal consciousness embracing, utilising and transforming into harmony with the Divine all individual determinations” (same as caitanyakendra).
aham
aha
ṁ bhart
bharta
ā ~ (literally) I am the upholder; the ego-sense in the consciousness that upholds actions.
ahaṁ bhokta ~ (literally) I am the enjoyer; the ego-sense in the consciousness that enjoys experience.
.ahaṁ jñātā ~ (literally) I am the knower; the egoism of the knower.
.ahaṁ kartā ~ (literally) I am the doer; the egoism of the doer.
.aham sāks.ı̄ (aham sakshi) ~ (literally) I am the witness; the ego-sense in the witnessing consciousness.
ahaṅkāra ~ the ego; the subjective principle by which the purus.a is induced to identify himself with prakr.ti and her activities; “the limited ‘I’ in us”, freedom from which is part of the mukti or liberation of the nature: the egoistic consciousness, including the “ego-sense in the life stuff” and the “ego-idea in the mind” which “maintain a constructed symbol of self, the separative ego, which does duty for the hidden real self, the spirit or true being” and whose nature “is a self-limitation of consciousness by a willed ignorance of the rest of its play and its exclusive absorption in one form, one combination of tendencies, one field of the movement of energies”.
aha
ahankara-mukti-siddhi
ṅkāra-mukti-siddhi ~ the perfection of release from the ego
(ahaṅkāra), part of the mukti or liberation of the nature: “the
transformation of the limited ego into a conscious centre of the divine
unity and freedom” (caitanyakendra) through “an uncompromising
abolition of the ego-sense at its very basis and source”, leaving
only an “individualisation for the purposes of the play of universal
consciousness in an individual mind and frame”.
ahāsyam ~ cheerlessness; the negation of hāsya or “laughter”.
ahasyam
ahi ~ serpent; the Time-snake.
ahitena cid arvat
arvata
ā (ahitena chid arvatá) ~ even without urging on the
war-horse (symbol of vehement nervous tapas). [R
. g Veda 8.62.3]
aikyalipsā ~ the urge towards unity, an element of Maheśvarı̄ bhāva.
aikyalipsa
aikyam ~ unity.
ainsi n’est il pas assez rouge pour vous [French] ~ isn’t it red enough
for you like this? (British possessions were traditionally coloured red
or pink on world maps.)
aishwari sthiti ~ see aiśvarı̄ sthiti.
aishwarya, etc. ~ see aiśvarya, etc.
aishwarya
aiskhistos ēstha
estha [Greek] ~ you were the ugliest (or the most infamous).
aisvari sthiti (aishwari sthiti) ~ abiding in the consciousness of the
aiśvarı̄
ı̄śvara.
8
.aisvarya
aiśvarya (aishwarya; aishwaryam; aiswarya; aisvaryam) ~ mastery;
sovereignty; the sense of divine power (same as ı̄śvarabhāva, a quality
common to the four aspects of daivı̄ prakr.ti); one of the three siddhis of
power: effectiveness of the will acting on a person or object without the
kind of direct control established in vaśitā; an instance of so exercising
the will; sometimes equivalent to aiśvaryatraya or tapas.
aiśvaryabhāva (aishwaryabhava) ~ state or sense of sovereign masaisvaryabhava
tery (equivalent to ı̄śvarabhāva).
aiśvaryabodha (aishwaryabodha; aishwarya-bodha; aishwarya boaisvaryabodha
dha) ~ consciousness of sovereign power (equivalent to ı̄śvarabhāva
as a general attribute of daivı̄ prakr.ti).
aiśvarya-ı̄śitā (aishwarya-ishita; aishwarya ishita) ~ the combination
aisvarya-isita
of aiśvarya and ı̄śitā, two of the three siddhis of power.
aiśvarya-ı̄śit
aisvarya-isita-vasita
ā-vaśitā (aishwarya-ishita-vashita) ~ a combination of
the three siddhis of power.
aiśvarya-ı̄śit
aisvarya-isita-vyapti
ā-vyāpti (aishwarya-ishita-vyapti) ~ the combination of
aiśvarya, ı̄śitā and (communicative) vyāpti.
aiśvaryam (aishwaryam; aisvaryam) ~ see aiśvarya.
aisvaryam
aiśvaryamaya
aisvaryamaya tr
trataka
āt.aka (aishwaryamaya tratak) ~ trāt.aka (concentration of the vision) brought about by aiśvarya (exercise of will).
aiśvarya (aishwarya) of exact time ~ aiśvarya applied to bring about
aisvarya
an event at a specific time.
aiśvaryaprayoga
aisvaryaprayoga (aishwaryaprayoga) ~ application of the siddhi of
aiśvarya.
aiśvaryasiddhi (aishwaryasiddhi; aiswaryasiddhi; aishwarya siddhi)
aisvaryasiddhi
~ the supernormal power (siddhi) called aiśvarya; perfection or fulfilment of this power; an instance of its use.
aiśvarya-tapas (aishwarya-tapas; aishwarya tapas) ~ pressure of
aisvarya-tapas
aiśvarya.
aiśvaryatraya (aishwaryatraya; aishwarya-traya; aishwarya traya) ~
aisvaryatraya
the triad of aiśvarya, consisting of the three siddhis of power.
aiśvarya-vaśit
aisvarya-vasita
ā (aishwarya-vashita; aishwaryavashita; aishwarya
vashita) ~ the combination of aiśvarya and vaśitā, two of the three
siddhis of power.
aiśvarya-vaśit
aisvarya-vasita-isita
ā-ı̄śitā (aishwarya-vashita-ishita; aishwarya vashita
ishita) ~ a combination of the three siddhis of power.
aiśvarya-vy
aisvarya-vyapti
āpti (aishwarya-vyapti) ~ the combination of aiśvarya

d (communicative) vyāpti.
.aiśvarya-vy
aisvarya-vyapti-isita
āpti-ı̄śitā (aishwarya-vyapti-ishita) ~ the combination of
aiśvarya, (communicative) vyāpti and ı̄śitā.
.aiswarya ~ see aiśvarya.
.aitihya lipi ~ historical lipi, a means of historical trikāladr.s.t.i.
.ājajññaā ~ command; “thought that is will” (ājñānam); the ājñācakra.
.ājajññacakra
ācakra (ajnachakra; ajna-chakra) ~ the cakra between the eyebrows, the centre of consciousness that governs will, vision and dynamic thought, “not the ordinary outer mental will and sight, but
something more powerful, belonging to the inner being”.
ajñāna (ajnana; ajnanam) ~ ignorance; absence of jñāna; “the forgetfulness of the high and true self”, resulting in bondage to the three modes (trigun.a) of the lower Nature (aparā prakr.ti).
ajñānam ~ see ajñāna.
ājñānam ~ knowledge-will; the operation of consciousness by which it “dwells on an image of things so as to hold, govern and possess it in power”, one of the four functions of active consciousness (of which the others are vijñāna, prajñāna and saṁjñāna) and the means by which the supreme consciousness that is the master of the world (ı̄śvara) exercises control of all things; same as ājñā.
akalyān.a ~ misfortune, adversity; evil.
akalyana
ākāra (akar) ~ form; the manner in which an object appears to the senses.
akāran.a ~ causeless; same as ahaituka.
akarana
akartā ~ the non-doer; inactive.
akarta
akartavya ~ what is not to be done.
akartr.-śama (akartri-shama) ~ inactive peace.
akartr-sama
ākāśa (akasha; akash) ~ ether; the most rarefied condition of material being, “a condition of pure material extension in Space”, the subtlest of the pañcabhūta; the state of physical substance that borders on the supraphysical and is the medium through which the powers of higher worlds act on the material plane (same as sthūla ākāśa); any of various kinds of sūks.ma ākāśa or immaterial ether, “depths of more and more subtle ether which are heavily curtained from the physical sense by the grosser ether of the material universe”; (same as ākāśarūpa or ākāśalipi) images or writing seen in the ākāśa.
ākāśalipi (akashalipi; akasha lipi) ~ “etheric writing”; lipi seen in the
akasalipi

ākāśa.
.akasarupa
ākāśarūpa (akasharupa; akasha rupa) ~ rūpa seen in the ākāśa, either as the result of forming images “by mental-physical pressure” out of akashic material or of “sudden manifestation of form partial or complete out of other akashas into the physical”.
ākāśa-śakti (akasha-shakti) ~ the power of the ākāśa (to resist the akasa-sakti
tapas).
akasha, etc. ~ see ākāśa, etc.
akasha
akashic material ~ “subtle-gross etheric material” of any of seven kinds (called in ascending order chāyā [shadow], dhūma [smoke], tejas [brilliance], jyotih. [light], vidyut [lightning] or varn.a [colour], agni [fire], and prakāśa [radiance]) out of which ākāśarūpa and ākāśalipi are formed.
akashic record ~ the etheric writing (ākāśalipi) “that keeps the record of all things past, transcribes all that is in process in the present, writes out the future”.
akriy
akriya
ā ud
udasinata
āsı̄natā ~ inactive indifference.
aks.ara (akshara) ~ letter, syllable; immutable, unchanging; the imaksara
mutable brahman, “the immobile omnipresent Soul of things”; “the
immutable self-existence which is the highest self-expression of the
Divine and on whose unalterable eternity all the rest, all that moves
and evolves, is founded”, the inactive status of the purus.ottama “in
the freedom of his self-existence unaffected by the action of his own
power in Nature, not impinged on by the urge of his own becoming,
undisturbed by the play of his own qualities”.
aksara
aks
purus.a (akshara purusha) ~ the immutable spirit, the unchang. ara purusa
ing purus.a: “the inactive Purusha free from Prakriti and her works”,
who stands above all things “in his imperturbable immobility of eternal
silence and calm”.
āks.epa (akshepa) ~ disturbance.
aksepa
akshara ~ see aks.ara.
akshepa ~ see āks.epa.
alaks.an.a (alakshana) ~ featureless.
alaksana
ālasya (alasya; alasyam) ~ lassitude.
alasya
ālasyam ~ see ālasya.
alasyam
alpa ~ small, little; limited, deficient; littleness (same as alpam).
alpam ~ littleness, the negation of br.hat.


.ama
āma ~ raw.
.amangala
amaṅgala ~ unfortunate, unfavourable; adverse event (same as amaṅgalam).
.ama
amangalabodha
ṅgalabodha ~ the sense of misfortune or adversity.
.amangalam
amaṅgalam ~ misfortune, unfavourable occurrence, adverse circumstances.
.amara purus
purusa
. a (amara purusha) ~ immortal spirit.
.amavasya
amāvasyā ~ new-moon day.
.ambulando [Latin] ~ walking; see in ambulando.
.amertume [French] ~ bitterness.
.amrta
amr.ta (amrita; amritam) ~ immortality; “the spirit’s timeless existence . . . translated into the Time manifestation”, including in its
fullness “a physical life fit for a divine inhabitant and, ~ in the sense
not of attachment or of restriction to our present corporeal frame but
an exceeding of the law of the physical body, ~ the conquest of death,
an earthly immortality”; the “ambrosia of the gods”, a rejuvenating
“nectar” induced by certain practices of yoga to trickle down from a
subtle centre in the head; identified with soma1, “the sweetness that
comes ﬂowing from the streams of the upper hidden world, . . . the
divine delight hidden in all existence which, once manifest, supports
all life’s crowning activities and is the force that finally immortalises
the mortal”.
aṁśa (ansha; angsha) ~ portion.
amsa
amutra ~ there; beyond this world.
anāhata ~ the cakra in the heart, also called the “heart-lotus”, the
anahata
“mental-vital, emotional centre with the psychic behind it (the soul,
Purusha in the heart)”.
anaikya (anaikya; anaikyam) ~ disunity.
anaikyam ~ see anaikya.
ānanda ~ delight, bliss, ecstasy, beatitude; “a profound concentrated
ananda
intense self-existent bliss extended to all that our being does, envisages,
creates, a fixed divine rapture”; same as sama ānanda, the universal
delight which constitutes active / positive samatā, “an equal delight in
all the cosmic manifestation of the Divine”, whose “foundation is the
Atmajnana or Brahmajnana by which we perceive the whole universe
as a perception of one Being that manifests itself in multitudinous
forms and activities”; the highest of the three stages of active / positive

samatā, “the joy of Unity” by which “all is changed into the full
and pure ecstasy” of the Spirit; the third and highest state of bhukti,
consisting of the delight of existence experienced “throughout the system” in seven principal forms (kāmānanda, premānanda, ahaituka
ānanda, cidghanānanda, śuddhānanda, cidānanda and sadānanda)
corresponding to the seven kośas or sheaths of the being and the seven
lokas or planes of existence; physical ānanda or śārı̄rānanda in its five
forms, also called vividhānanda (various delight), the fourth member
of the śarı̄ra catus.t.aya; (especially in the plural, “anandas”) any of
these forms of ānanda; same as ānandaṁ brahma, the last aspect
of the fourfold brahman; bliss of infinite conscious existence, “the
original, all-encompassing, all-informing, all-upholding delight”, the
third aspect of saccidānanda and the principle manifested in its purity
in janaloka or ānandaloka, also present in an involved or subordinated
form on every other plane.
ānanda-ākāśa (ananda-akasha; ananda akasha) ~ ether of ānanda,
ananda-akasa
“a supra-ethereal . . . ether of bliss . . . which is the matrix and continent of the universal expression of the Self”.
ananda atman
ānanda
ātman ~ delight-self; ānandaṁ brahma seen or experienced
as the ātman, “the calm, motionless, blissful Self within us which is
eternally untroubled and unaffected by the touches of things”.
ananda bh
ānanda
bhava
āva (ananda bhava) ~ condition of spiritual bliss; state of
consciousness on a plane of ānanda.
ānandabhoga (anandabhoga; ananda-bhoga) ~ enjoyment of deanandabhoga
light; same as bhoga as a term for the third and highest stage of
active / positive samatā, also called (sama) ānanda.
ananda bhumi
ānanda
bhūmi ~ the world of bliss, a svargabhūmi.
ānandabodha ~ awareness of bliss.
anandabodha
ananda brahma ~ same as ānandaṁ brahma.
ānanda
ānandabrahmadarśana (anandabrahmadarshana) ~ vision of ānananandabrahmadarsana
daṁ brahma.
ananda brahman ~ same as ānandaṁ brahma.
ānanda
ānandabuddha ~ (vān.ı̄) expressing ānanda on the mental plane.
anandabuddha
ananda candra (ananda chandra) ~ the moon (candra1) as a symbol
ānanda
of ānanda.
ananda cidghana (ananda chidghana) ~ same as śuddha cidghana
ānanda
ānanda.
nanda-cit-sat
ānanda-cit-sat (ananda-chit-sat) ~ Bliss-Consciousness-Being;
cit-ānanda with the terms reversed.
.anandadarsana
ānandadarśana (anandadarshana; ananda-darshana; ananda
13
sat-
darshana) ~ vision of the various forms of the delight of existence in
things and beings.
ānandadhāran.aśakti (anandadharanashakti) ~ the power to sustain
anandadharanasakti
ānanda of any intensity.
ānanda
ananda ideality ~ same as ānanda-vijñāna.
ananda ı̄śvara
ānanda
isvara (ananda ishwara) ~ ānandaṁ brahma seen as an aspect of the Lord.
ānandakośa (anandakosha; ananda-kosha) ~ the sheath (kośa) corresponding to the plane of ānanda, the “bliss-sheath” which is the spiritual body of the “bliss soul” and in which, together with the vijñānakośa, “all the perfection of a spiritual embodiment is to be found, a yet unmanifested divine law of the body”.
ānandaloka (anandaloka; ananda-loka; ananda loka) ~ the world
anandaloka
(loka) of the supreme bliss (ānanda) of saccidānanda, the plane
of “the joy of absolute identity in innumerable oneness”, where all
“consciousness is of the bliss of the Infinite, all power is power of the
bliss of the Infinite, all forms and activities are forms and activities of
the bliss of the Infinite”; there is also “a repetition of the Ananda plane
in each lower world of consciousness”, but “in the lower planes not
only is it reached by a sort of dissolution into it of the pure mind or the
life-sense or the physical awareness, but it is, as it were, itself diluted
by the dissolved form of mind, life or matter, held in the dilution and
turned into a poor thinness wonderful to the lower consciousness but
not comparable to its true intensities”.
ānandam ~ same as ānandaṁ brahma.
anandam
ānanda-mahat ~ (vān.ı̄) expressing ānanda on the plane of vijñāna.
ananda-mahat
ananda manas ~ the principle of ānanda reﬂected in the mental plane.
ānanda
ānandamaya (anandamaya; anandamay) ~ full of or consisting of
anandamaya
ānanda; joyous, delightful, blissful, beatific; characterized by an equal
delight (sama ānanda) in all experiences; having the nature of pure
ānanda of saccidānanda, or of the principle of ānanda involved
in or subordinated to the principle of another plane, such as the
physical, mental, etc.; (“the Anandamaya”) the All-Blissful, short
for ānandamaya ı̄śvara or ānandamaya purus.a; the third degree of

the third intensity of Kr.s.n.adarśana, a kind of vision of the divine
Personality corresponding to ānandaṁ brahma in the impersonal
brahmadarśana.
anandamaya asat (anandamay asat) ~ non-being (asat) conceived as
ānandamaya
“some inexpressible Beatitude [ānanda] . . . into which even the notion
of self-existence seems to be swallowed up”; “a pure causeless eternal
Bliss so intense that we are that alone”, experienced when the mind,
in approaching saccidānanda, dwells exclusively “on the aspect of
delight, Ananda, and existence [sat] and consciousness [cit] then seem
to disappear into a bliss without basis of self-possessing awareness or
constituent being”.
anandamaya asura ~ the sādhyadeva (mind raised to the plane of
ānandamaya
ānanda) of the asura type, who evolves in the eleventh and twelfth
manvantaras of the sixth pratikalpa.
anandamaya brahmamaya ~ consisting of ānandaṁ brahma.
ānandamaya
anandamaya ı̄śvara
ānandamaya
isvara (anandamaya ishwara) ~ “the all-blissful Lord”,
the ı̄śvara as the ānandamaya purus.a, “the Lord of existence and
works and Spirit of bliss”.
anandamaya Kr
ānandamaya
Krsna
. s.n.a (anandamaya Krishna) ~ Kr.s.n.a as the ānandamaya ı̄śvara / purus.a, the deva of whom ānanda is “the subtle body
and being”; Kr.s.n.a seen in the highest form (third degree of the third
intensity) of Kr.s.n.adarśana.
anandamaya lı̄l
ānandamaya
lila
ā ~ the world as a rapturous game of the ānandamaya
ı̄śvara / purus.a.
ānandamaya lı̄lāmaya ~ (brahman or ı̄śvara) full of ānanda exanandamaya
pressed in the lı̄lā of the world; short for ānandamaya lı̄lāmaya
sagun.a or ānandamaya lı̄lāmaya Kr.s.n.a.
anandamaya lı̄l
ānandamaya
lilamaya
āmaya Kr
Krsna
. s.n.a (anandamaya lilamaya Krishna) ~ Kr.s.n.a as the ānandamaya and the lı̄lāmaya, taking divine delight in the
cosmic game.
anandamaya lı̄l
ānandamaya
lilamaya
āmaya saguna
sagun.a ~ ānandamaya sagun.a brahman in its
lı̄lāmaya aspect, seen as the source of the cosmic play.
anandamaya nati ~ ecstatic submission; the highest form of nati,
ānandamaya
which comes when one learns “to take delight in all things even as
the Lord takes delight in them”, becoming “capable of receiving all
contacts with a blissful equality, because we feel in them the touch of
the imperishable Love and Delight, the happiness absolute that hides

ever in the heart of things”.
.ānandamaya
anandamaya purus
purusa
. a (anandamaya purusha) ~ “the Bliss-Self of the
spirit”; the supreme and universal Soul, “the one and yet innumerable
Personality, the infinite Godhead, the self-aware and self-unfolding
Purusha”, whose essential nature is ānanda, a “transcendent Bliss,
unimaginable and inexpressible by the mind and speech”; also called
ānanda purus.a.
anandamaya sagun
ānandamaya
saguna
. a ~ same as ānandamaya sagun.a brahman.
anandamaya saguna
ānandamaya
sagun.a brahman ~ sagun.a brahman perceived as full of
the universal delight that is the nature of ānandaṁ brahma.
anandamaya titiks
ānandamaya
titiksa-udasinata-nati
. ā-udāsı̄natā-nati (anandamaya titiksha-udasinatanati) ~ joyous endurance-indifference-submission; ānandamaya nati
unified with titiks.ā and udāsı̄natā.
anandamaya vvani
ānandamaya
ān.ı̄ ~ beatific voice.
anandam
ānanda
ṁ brahma ~ the realisation of “Brahman as the self-existent
bliss and its universal delight of being”, the last member of the brahma
catus.t.aya; the divine Reality (brahman) realised as a supreme and
all-pervading ānanda, also called brahmānanda.
anandam
ānanda
ṁ brahman ~ same as ānandaṁ brahma.
ānandaṁ brahman.o vidvān na bibheti kutaścana (anandam brahanandam
mano vidván na bibheti kutaschana) ~ he who possesses the delight
of the brahman (see brahmānanda) has no fear from anything in the
world. [Cf. Taittirı̄ya Upanis.ad 2.4]
Ananda Mimamsa
Ānanda
Mı̄māṁsā (Ananda Mimansa) ~ “inquiry into the nature of
bliss”, a Sanskrit work.
anandam
ānanda
ṁ jññanam
ānam anantam
anantaṁ sarvam
sarvaṁ (brahma) ~ brahman as Bliss, as
Knowledge, as the Infinite, as the All; the formula of the brahma
catus.t.aya with its terms in reverse order.
ananda purus
ānanda
purusa
. a (ananda purusha; ananda-purusha) ~ the “supreme
bliss Soul”, the aspect of the divine Personality (purus.a) corresponding
to the impersonal ānandaṁ brahma; same as ānandamaya purus.a.
ānandasiddhi (anandasiddhi; ananda siddhi) ~ the perfection of
anandasiddhi
ānanda, especially in the sense of sama ānanda or any form of
physical ānanda.
ānandatattva (anandatattwa; ananda tattwa) ~ the principle of bliss,
anandatattva
usually referring not to the supreme ānanda of saccidānanda, but to
its diluted manifestation on a lower plane.

.anandavani
ānandavān.ı̄ (anandavani; ananda vani) ~ beatific voice: vān.ı̄ originating on the ānanda plane or expressing the delight of the ānandamaya
ı̄śvara.
ananda-vijñānanda-vij
ñana
āna (ananda-vijnana; ananda vijnana) ~ the principle of
ānanda reﬂected in the plane of vijñāna.
ananda-vijñānanda-vij
ñanamaya
ānamaya ~ (vān.ı̄) expressing the delight and wisdom of
the vijñānamaya ānandamaya ı̄śvara.
anan.imā (ananima; an-anima) ~ defect or denial of an.imā.
ananima
ananta ~ infinite; brahman as the Infinite (short for ananta brahman).
ananta ananda
ānanda ~ the infinite delight (ānanda) of saccidānanda; (in
brahmadarśana) “the sense of the infinite Ananda in each thing”.
ananta brahma; ananta brahman ~ same as anantaṁ brahma.
ananta daśa
dasa diśah
disah. (ananta dasha dishah) ~ the ten directions of infinite space.
anantagun.a (anantaguna; ananta guna; anantagunam) ~ “the infinite
anantaguna
qualities of the spirit” of which “Nature is only the power in being
and the development in action”; brahman as “an Infinite teeming
with innumerable qualities, properties, features”; capable of infinite
qualities; same as anantagun.amaya.
anantagun.am ~ see anantagun.a.
anantagunam
anantagun
anantagunamaya
. amaya ~ full of infinite qualities (anantagun.a); the “Godhead, the spirit manifested in Nature” who “appears in a sea of infinite
quality” expressing his “absolute capacity of boundlessly varied selfrevelation”; Kr.s.n.a seen in the second degree of the third intensity of
Kr.s.n.adarśana, a kind of vision of the divine Personality corresponding
to anantaṁ brahma in the impersonal brahmadarśana.
ananta-jññana
āna ~ same as anantaṁ jñānaṁ brahma.
anantam ~ same as anantaṁ brahma.
ananta
anantam
ṁ brahma ~ the realisation of “the Brahman infinite in being
and infinite in quality”, in which all quality (gun.a) and action is experienced as the play of a “universal and infinite energy”, the second member of the brahma catus.t.aya; the divine Reality (brahman) “realised
in its absolute infinity”, bringing the perception of “Infinite Force and
Quality at play in all forms”. This has two aspects, “one in which the
Infinite Force acts as if it were a mechanical entity, knowledge standing
back from it, the other in which Life Force & Knowledge act together
& the Infinite Force is an intelligent or at least a conscious force”.


.ananta
anantam
ṁ jññanam
ānaṁ (brahma) ~ the union of anantam (brahma) and
jñānam (brahma).
.ananta tapas ~ infinite force.
.anantyam
ānantyam ~ infinity.
.anarambha
anārambha ~ non-initiation of action.
.anarva
anarvā ~ same as anarvan.
.anarvan ~ unopposed; free from struggle.
.anarya
anārya ~ not ārya; ignoble, unaspiring; a human being or supraphysical power opposed to the spiritual effort.
.andha viśv
visvasa
āsa ~ blind faith.
.anekadarśi
anekadarsi ekam (anekadarshi ekam) ~ the One (eka1) seeing the
Many.
.Angirasas
Āṅgirasas ~ an ancient clan of r.s.is in the Veda, the “human fathers”
who discovered the Light, also portrayed as heavenly seers or as powers
of Agni2, “forces of the symbolic Light and Flame”; along with the
Bhr.gus, identified in the Record of Yoga with the Judeo-Christian
“seraphim”, the highest order of angels.
angsha ~ see aṁśa.
angusthamatra
ṅgus.t.hamātra (angushthamatra) ~ the size of a thumb.
an.imā ~ fineness, subtlety; a physical siddhi that frees the body from
anima
the limitations ordinarily imposed by the gross materiality of its substance, such as subjection to stiffness, strain and pain resulting from
exertion.
anima
an
. imā agni ~ the fire of an.imā.
anirdeśyam (anirdeshyam) ~ the indefinable.
anirdesyam
Aniruddha ~ the aspect of the fourfold ı̄śvara whose śakti is Mahāsarasvatı̄, corresponding to the śūdra who represents the cosmic principle of Work in the symbolism of the cāturvarn.ya; his method is that
“of the patient intellectual seeker & the patient & laborious contriver
who occupies knowledge & action inch by inch & step by step”.
Aniruddha-Balar
Aniruddha-Balarama
āma b
balakabhava
ālakabhāva ~ a combination of the Aniruddha and Balarāma aspects of the fourfold ı̄śvara (see BalarāmaAniruddha) enjoying the world-game (lı̄lā) in a mood of divine childlikeness (bālabhāva).
Aniruddha bh
bhava
āva ~ the temperament of Aniruddha; manifestation of
the Aniruddha personality of the fourfold ı̄śvara.
Aniruddha-śakti
Aniruddha-sakti (Aniruddha-shakti) ~ Mahāsarasvatı̄ as the śakti or

devı̄ expressing the Aniruddha aspect of the fourfold ı̄śvara.
.anisa
anı̄śa (anisha) ~ not lord; powerless.
.anisabhava
anı̄śabhāva (anishabhava) ~ the state or sense of not being the lord;
powerlessness; subjection of the soul to the lower Nature; the opposite
of ı̄śvarabhāva.
anı̄śatā (anishata) ~ incapacity; same as anı̄śabhāva.
anisata
anis.t.a (anishta) ~ not chosen, undesired.
anista
anı̄śvara (anishwara) ~ (T2) not fully expressing the omniscience and
anisvara
omnipotence of the ı̄śvara.
anna1 (anna; annam) ~ (literally) food; matter, the principle on which
the physical world (bhū) is based, the lowest of the three principles
of the aparārdha; in its fundamental nature, “a form of the force
of conscious Being [sat], a form given by Mind and realised by Life”;
“the divisible being which founds itself on the constant changeableness
of physical substance”, the material body which, together with the
physical prān.a, composes the sthūla deha.
anna2 ~ a former coin of India with the value of one sixteenth of a
rupee.
annākāśa (annakasha) ~ physical ether.
annakasa
annakośa (annakosha; anna-kosha) ~ literally “food-sheath”; the annakosa bodily case, “the gross physical sheath of this materially visible and sensible frame”; the physical kośa, of which the “body is only the centralised part”.
annam ~ see anna1.
annamaya ~ physical; composed of or pertaining to anna1.
annamaya ātman
atman ~ physical self.
annamaya-citta (annamaya-chitta) ~ the “pervading and possessing action of consciousness” (citta) in the body.
annamaya purus
purusa
. a (annamaya purusha) ~ “the physical conscious being”, the purus.a “as a soul in body, which puts forth life as its activity
and mind as the light of that activity”; it “uses life and mind characteristically for physical experience, ~ all else being regarded as a
consequence of physical experience, ~ does not look beyond the life
of the body and, so far as it feels anything beyond its physical individuality, is aware only of the physical universe and at most its oneness
with the soul of physical Nature”.
anr.ta (anrita) ~ false, wrong; falsehood, error (same as anr.tam).
anrta


.anrtam
anr.tam (anritam) ~ falsehood, error; the negation of r.tam.
.anrtani
anr.tāni (anritani) ~ errors.
.anr
anrta
. ta tejas (anrita tejas) ~ false energy.
.ansha ~ see aṁśa.
.antah. ~ same as antar.
.antahkarana
antah.karan.a (antahkarana; antahkaran) ~ the “inner instrument”,
regarded as comprising the buddhi or intelligence, manas or sensemind and citta or basic consciousness, ordinarily subject to the
ahaṅkāra or ego-sense and pervaded by the sūks.ma prān.a or subtle
life-force.
antah.sukha ~ inner happiness.
antahsukha
antah
antahsukho’ntararamah
. sukho’ntarārāmah. ~ having the inner happiness and inner repose. [Gı̄tā 5.24]
antar ~ within; short for antardarśı̄ or antardr.s.t.a.
antarārāma ~ inner ease and repose.
antararama
antard. ~ abbreviation of antardarśı̄ or antardr.s.t.a.
antardarśı̄ (antardarshi) ~ inward-looking; samādhi in the waking
antardarsi
state with internal vision and experience (same as antardarśı̄ jāgrat).
antardarśı̄
antardarsi jjagrat
āgrat (antardarshi jagrat) ~ jāgrat samādhi of the inwardlooking (antardarśı̄) type, in which images or other objects of subtle
sensory experience are perceived internally in a subtle ether such as the
cittākāśa or cidākāśa, usually with the eyes closed.
antardarśı̄
antardarsi rupa
rūpa (antardarshi rupa) ~ subtle images seen in antardarśı̄
jāgrat or the faculty of seeing such images.
antardr.s.t.a (antardrishta) ~ (images, etc.) seen or perceived within;
antardrsta
samādhi in the waking state with such vision or perception (same as
antardarśı̄ jāgrat); same as antardr.s.t.a lipi or antardr.s.t.a rūpa.
antardr
antardrsta
āgrat (antardrishta jagrat) ~ samādhi in the waking state
. s.t.a jjagrat
in which images, etc., are perceived internally; same as antardarśı̄
jāgrat.
antardr
antardrsta
jāgrat samadhi
samādhi (antardrishta jagrat samadhi) ~ same as
. s.t.a jagrat
antardr.s.t.a jāgrat.
antardrsta
antardr
. s.t.a lipi (antardrishta lipi) ~ writing seen in the state of antardarśı̄ jāgrat, the second type of lipi in the lipi catus.t.aya.
antardr
antardrsta
rūpa (antardrishta rupa) ~ images seen with an internal
. s.t.a rupa
vision in the waking state of samādhi; same as antardarśı̄ rūpa.
antardr
antardrsta
samādhi (antardrishta samadhi) ~ same as antardr.s.t.a
. s.t.a samadhi

jāgrat.
.antardrsti
antardr.s.t.i (antardrishti) ~ internal vision (in the waking state of
samādhi); same as antardarśı̄ jāgrat.
.antariksa
antariks.a (antariksha) ~ the mid-region between earth and heaven;
the “intermediate dynamic, vital or nervous consciousness” connecting the physical and mental planes, the world of the life-force, same as
bhuvar.
antarjyotih. (antarjyotih; antarjyoti) ~ inner light.
antaryāmı̄ ~ the inner Control, the inner Guide.
antaryami
anti ~ close, near.
anucara (anuchara) ~ follower, attendant, servant.
anumantā ~ giver of the sanction.
anumanta
anumati ~ consent, sanction.
anupalabdhi ~ absence of experience.
anusmaran.a ~ remembrance, attention.
anusmarana
apah. ~ same as apas2.
apakars.an.a (apakarshana) ~ tearing away; cutting off; one of the five
apakarsana
forms of pain to be turned into raudrānanda.
apāna ~ the vital current that moves “in the lower part of the trunk”
apana
from the mūlādhāra to the navel; one of the pañcaprān.a, that which
“gives away the vital force out of the body” and so is called “the breath
of death”.
apara ~ lower.
aparā ~ lower (feminine of apara).
apara
apara
apar
ā prakr
prakrti
. ti (apara prakriti) ~ the lower (mental-vital-physical)
Nature which is derived from the higher Nature or parā prakr.ti;
prakr.ti in the lower hemisphere of existence (aparārdha), also called
traigun.yamayı̄ prakr.ti because its process is limited to the action of
the three modes of the traigun.ya or trigun.a.
aparārdha ~ “the lower half of world-existence”, the hemisphere of
aparardha
the triloka (three worlds) of manas, prān.a and anna1 or mind, life and
matter; these three principles “are in themselves powers of the superior
principles” (of the higher hemisphere, parārdha), “but wherever they
manifest in a separation from their spiritual sources, they undergo as a
result a phenomenal lapse into a divided in place of the true undivided
existence . . . oblivious of all that is behind it and of the underlying
unity, a state therefore of cosmic and individual Ignorance” (avidyā).


.apar
apara
ā trik
trikaladrsti
āladr.s.t.i (apara trikaldrishti) ~ the lower form of trikāladr.s.t.i, i.e., telepathic trikāladr.s.t.i.
.apar
apara
ā vidya
vidyā ~ the lower knowledge; the knowledge of the world, “the
lower science which diffuses itself in an outward knowledge of phenomena, the disguises of the One and Infinite as it appears to us in or
through the more exterior forms of the world-manifestation around
us”.
aparigrahah. ~ freedom from the idea of possession.
apas1 ~ work, action.
apas2 ~ waters (accusative of āpas)
āpas ~ waters; (in Vedic symbolism) the “waters of being”, representing existence in its manifold movement on various planes.
apasi svasr̄
svasrnam
. n.ām (apasi swasrinam) ~ in the work of the sisters (the
divine Waters). [R
. g Veda 3.1.3]
apikars.an.a (apikarshana) ~ injuring; breaking; one of the five forms
apikarsana
of pain to be turned into raudrānanda.
apo m
matarisva
ātariśvā dadhati
dadhāti (apo Matariswá dadhati) ~ Mātariśvan governs action (apas1). [Īśā Upanis.ad 4]
aprakāśa (aprakasha) ~ absence of light (prakāśa); lack of clarity;
aprakasa
nescience.
apramatta ~ free from negligence and distraction.
apramattatā ~ attentiveness.
apramattata
aprasāda ~ discontent; lack of (ātma)prasāda.
aprasada
apravr.tti (apravritti) ~ inactivity; inertia; the negation of pravr.tti.
apravrtti
apriya (apriya; apriyam) ~ unpleasant, disliked; that which is disliked;
the sense of disliking.
apriyam ~ see apriya.
apsaras (Apsara) ~ nymph of heaven.
apsu ~ in the waters (āpas).
āptavya-anāptavya ~ (the sense of) what is to be obtained and what
aptavya-anaptavya
is not to be obtained.
Arabindo, mandir karo, mandir karo [Bengali] ~ “Aurobindo, make
a temple, make a temple.”
ārambha ~ personal initiation of action.
arambha
Aran.yānı̄ ~ the Vedic goddess of the forest (aran.ya, wilderness, perAranyani
haps equivalent in the esoteric sense of the Veda to vana, forest,
symbolising for Sri Aurobindo “the growths of the earth, our material

existence”).
.arasah. ~ distaste; lack of appreciation.
.archevêque [French] ~ archbishop.
.ardhajññanam
ānam ~ half-knowledge.
.arogya
ārogya (arogya; arogyam) ~ health; freedom from disease (roga) in all
its forms, part of physical perfection (śārı̄rasiddhi); the first member
of the śarı̄ra catus.t.aya, “the state of being healthy”, whose first stage
is when “the system is normally healthy and only gets disturbed by
exceptional causes”, its second stage when “even exceptional causes
or great overstrain cannot disturb the system”, while its culmination
would be immortality (amr.ta) in the body; same as ārogyaśakti.
ārogyam ~ see ārogya.
arogyam
ārogyam utthāpanā saundaryaṁ vividhānanda iti śarı̄ra catus.t.ayam
arogyam
(arogyam, utthapana, saundaryam, vividhananda iti sharirachatushtayam) ~ ārogya, utthāpanā, saundarya and vividhānanda: these
constitute the śarı̄ra catus.t.aya.
ārogyaprakr.ti (arogyaprakriti) ~ healthy nature.
arogyaprakrti
arogya sadhana
ārogya
sādhana ~ the process leading to ārogyasiddhi.
ārogyaśakti (arogyashakti; arogya-shakti; arogya shakti) ~ the force
arogyasakti
of health maintaining ārogya and repelling tendencies or attacks of
roga.
ārogyaśarı̄ra (arogyasharira) ~ healthy body.
arogyasarira
ārogyasiddhi (arogyasiddhi; arogya-siddhi; arogya siddhi) ~ the perarogyasiddhi
fection of health (ārogya); the movement towards this perfection or
the power working to bring it about.
arogya tapas (arogya tapas; arogya-tapas) ~ will-power (tapas) acting
ārogya
on the body to maintain or restore health.
artha ~ meaning.
arthabodha (arthabodha; artha-bodha) ~ perception of the meaning.
articulate thought ~ same as vāṅmaya thought.
ārya ~ noble, aspiring; a follower of the ideals of the ancient Indian
arya
spiritual culture; a superhuman power helping men to realise these
ideals.
Aryaman ~ “the Aspirer”, a Vedic god, one of the Four who represent
the “working of the Truth in the human mind and temperament”; he is
“the deity of the human journey” who “sums up in himself the whole
aspiration and movement of man in a continual self-enlargement and

self-transcendence to his divine perfection”, bringing to this movement
a “mighty strength and perfectly-guided happy inner upsurging”.
Aryaman-Bhaga ~ the combination of Aryaman and Bhaga, “the Aspirer” and “the Enjoyer”, in which the power of Aryaman is “the
effective term of the self-discovering and self-seizing movement by
which Being and Consciousness realise themselves as Bliss”.
āśā (asha) ~ hope, expectation.
asa
asad atman
ātman ~ the Self (ātman) as Non-being (asat), “the negation of
all this existence and yet something inconceivable to mind, speech or
defining experience”; this negation is “the affirmation by the Unknowable . . . of Its freedom from all cosmic existence, ~ freedom, that is
to say, from all positive terms of actual existence which consciousness
in the universe can formulate to itself”, not denying these terms “as a
real expression of Itself”, but denying “Its limitation by all expression
or any expression whatsoever”.
asadgraha ~ false conception.
āsakti ~ attachment.
asakti
aśakti (ashakti) ~ incapacity; lack of śakti.
asakti
asam
asamahita
āhita aś
asanta-manusa
ānta-mānus.a (asamahita ashanta-manusha) ~ “unconcentrated unquiet man”, the ordinary human being who lacks the
power of spiritual concentration and quietude.
asāmarthya ~ incapacity.
asamarthya
asamatā ~ inequality; lack of equanimity; defect or failing of samatā;
asamata
sometimes restricted to passive / negative asamatā.
āsana (asana; asan) ~ sitting; any of various postures assumed in
asana
hat.hayoga with a view to “the habituating of the body to certain
attitudes of immobility” in order “to force it to hold the Pranic energy
instead of dissipating and squandering it”; any position of the body,
especially those that involve keeping different limbs raised in exercises
for developing secondary utthāpanā.
aśānti (ashanti; asanti) ~ disquiet, disturbance, trouble; the negation
asanti
of śānti.
asantos.a (asantosha) ~ dissatisfaction.
asantosa
aśasti (ashasti) ~ non-expression.
asasti
asat ~ non-existent, unreal; non-being, nothingness; “the Negation of
things” made possible by “the Spirit’s potency of presenting to itself
the opposites of its own truths of being ~ an abyss of non-existence,

a profound Night of inconscience, a fathomless swoon of insensibility
from which yet all forms of being, consciousness and delight of existence [saccidānanda] can manifest themselves”; (same as asat brahma)
“something beyond the last term to which we can reduce our purest
conception and our most abstract or subtle experience of actual being
as we know or conceive it while in this universe”, not a mere negation
but “a zero which is All or an indefinable Infinite which appears to the
mind a blank, because mind grasps only finite constructions”.
asat brahma ~ brahman as “Non-Being in the sense, not of an inexistent Nihil but of an x which exceeds our idea or experience of existence”; it is “that which is not manifested and beyond manifestation
and is not contained in the basis of manifestation”.
aśatru (ashatru) ~ free from (internal) enemies.
asatru
asatya ~ untrue, false; falsehood (same as asatyam).
asatya dvesa
dves.a (asatya dwesha) ~ aversion for falsehood.
asatyam ~ untruth, falsehood; the negation of satyam.
asatya tapas ~ false power.
asatya tejas ~ false energy.
asaundarya (asaundarya; asaundaryam) ~ absence of beauty; ugliness; the negation of saundarya.
asaundaryam ~ see asaundarya.
a-śaurya (a-shaurya) ~ lack of heroism or courage (śaurya), perhaps
a-saurya
referring to a deficiency of abhaya and sāhasa, two attributes of the
ks.atriya.
asha ~ see āśā.
ashakti ~ see aśakti.
ashanti ~ see aśānti.
ashasti ~ see aśasti.
ashatru ~ see aśatru.
a-shaurya ~ see a-śaurya.
ashiva ~ see aśiva.
ashivam ~ see aśivam.
ashtasiddhi ~ see as.t.asiddhi.
ashu ~ see āśu.
ashubham ~ see aśubham.
ashuddha ~ see aśuddha.
ashuddhi ~ see aśuddhi.


.asiddha ~ imperfect.
.asiddhi ~ failure; imperfection; negation of siddhi; denial of progress
in yoga, relapse; the power that works against the achievement of
perfection in the yoga or in any part of the yoga.
aśiva (ashiva) ~ inauspicious, evil.
asiva
aśivam (ashivam) ~ inauspicious circumstances, misfortune, adverasivam
sity.
asmaran.a ~ forgetfulness, inattentiveness; without attention.
asmarana
aśraddhā ~ lack of faith; doubt, scepticism, distrust, “unfaith”; the
asraddha
negation of śraddhā.
āśrama ~ spiritual community.
asrama
astāra ~ invincible.
astara
as.t.asiddhi (ashtasiddhi; ashta siddhi) ~ the eight siddhis or superastasiddhi
normal powers (prākāmya, vyāpti, vaśitā, aiśvarya, ı̄śitā, mahimā,
laghimā and an.imā), constituting the third member of the vijñāna
catus.t.aya. When the members of the vijñāna catus.t.aya are listed as five
rather than four, with rūpadr.s.t.i as the third, as.t.asiddhi is omitted and
is replaced by tapas, meaning the siddhis of power (vaśitā, aiśvarya and
ı̄śitā), as the fourth member; the siddhis of knowledge (prākāmya and
vyāpti) are then treated as belonging to trikāladr.s.t.i, and the siddhis
of the body (mahimā, laghimā and an.imā) are regarded as part of
utthāpanā.
āstikyam ~ belief in God.
astikyam
asu ~ life-breath; energy, force.
āśu (ashu) ~ swift.
asu
aśubham (ashubham) ~ bad.
asubham
aśuddha (ashuddha; asuddha) ~ impure.
asuddha
aśuddha
asuddha pravr
pravrtti
. tti (ashuddha pravritti) ~ impure impulsion; the activity of an impure nature, action impelled by desire and emotion.
aśuddhi (ashuddhi; asuddhi) ~ impurity, “confusion and disorder
asuddhi
among the functions”, the opposite of śuddhi.
asukha (asukha; asukham) ~ unhappiness; grief; the negation of
sukha.
asukham ~ see asukha.
asundara (asundara; asundaram) ~ not beautiful; absence of beauty;
the sense of ugliness.
asundaram ~ see asundara.

.asunvan ~ “who presses not out the nectar”; void of active delight.
.asura ~ (in the Veda) “the mighty Lord”, an epithet of the supreme deva; a Titan (daitya); a kind of anti-divine being of the mentalised vital plane; the sixth of the ten types of consciousness (daśa-gāvas) in the evolutionary scale: mind concentrated on the buddhi; (on page 1280) a being of a world of “might & glory”. 
asuradeva ~ the combination of asura and deva, making vijñāna serve the buddhi, which evolves in the general asura type in the ninth manvantara of the sixth pratikalpa.
asura-paśu (asura-pashu) ~ the asura stage of the paśu, which evolves in the general asura type early in the sixth pratikalpa.
asura rāks.asa (asura rakshasa) ~ the combination of asura and rāks.asa, seeking from the buddhi the satisfaction of heart and senses, which evolves in the general asura type in the (current) seventh manvantara of the sixth pratikalpa.
āsurı̄ṁ rāks.ası̄ñcaiva prakr.tim āpannāh. (asurim rakshasincaiva prakritim apannah) ~ possessed of the Asuric and Rakshasic nature. 
[Cf. Gı̄tā 9.12, 16.20]
Asuro-Rakshasa ~ same as asura rāks.asa.
asurya
as
ūryā jan
janah
āh. ~ sunless peoples.
a su surmonter toutes les difficultés et s’assurer une vie durable [French]
~ was able to overcome all difficulties and secure a lasting life.
aśva (aswa) ~ the horse, Vedic symbol of vital energy.
asva
āsvāda (aswada) ~ taste (in a literal or figurative sense); the subtle
asvada
sense of taste (rasadr.s.t.i).
aśvāh. ~ horses; nervous energies.
asvah
aśvā(h.) patvabhih. śaphānām (aswá patwabhih śaphánám) ~ horses
asva(h)
(symbolic of vital energies) with tramplings of their hooves. [Cf. R
.g
Veda 5.6.7]
asvapna (a-swapna) ~ absence of dream-vision.
aśvattha (aswattha) ~ fig tree (Vedantic symbol of the cosmic maniasvattha
festation).
Aśvins (Aswins) ~ the “Riders on the Horse”, the name of two Vedic
Asvins
gods; “twin divine powers whose special function is to perfect the
nervous or vital being in man in the sense of action and enjoyment”.
athanatogen [coined from Greek] ~ that which produces immortality.
athūmia [Greek] ~ faintheartedness, despondency.
athumia


.atma
ātmā ~ same as ātman.
.ātmaiv
atmaivabhud
ābhūd bh
bhutani
ūtāni ~ the Self (ātman) has become all beings. [Īśā
Upanis.ad 7]
.ātmaj
atmajññana
āna ~ knowledge of the Self (ātman).
.atman
ātman ~ self; “a Self that is neither our limited ego [ahaṅkāra] nor
our mind, life or body, world-wide but not outwardly phenomenal, yet
to some spirit-sense . . . more concrete than any form or phenomenon,
universal yet not dependent for its being on anything in the universe or
on the whole totality of the universe”; brahman known in its subjective
aspect as “the Self or immutable existence of all that is in the universe”,
as “the cosmic Self, but also as the Supreme Self transcendent of its own
cosmicity and at the same time individual-universal in each being”.
atmani ātm
ātmani
atmanam
ānam ātman
atmana
ā ~ the self in the self by the self. [Gı̄tā 13.25]
ātmaprakāśa (atmaprakasha) ~ self-luminous, self-revealing; selfatmaprakasa
luminosity.
ātmaprasāda (atmaprasada; atmaprasad) ~ “a state of clearness,
atmaprasada
purity and contentment in the whole self”, the last member of the
samatā / śānti catus.t.aya, which in its most positive form is called
hāsya; an element of Maheśvarı̄ bhāva.
ātmarati ~ delight in the Self. [cf. Gı̄tā 3.17]
atmarati
atma śakti
ātma
sakti (atma shakti) ~ “a high idea of the power that is in one’s
self”, an attribute of the ks.atriya, equivalent to ātmaślāghā.
ātmasamarpan.a ~ self-surrender, “the giving of one’s self without
atmasamarpana
demanding a return”, an attribute of the śūdra.
ātmaślāghā (atmaslagha; atma slagha) ~ self-affirmation, “the high
atmaslagha
self-confidence of power, capacity, character and courage indispensable
to the man of action”, an attribute of the ks.atriya.
ātmatr.pta (atmatripta) ~ self-contented.
atmatrpta
atri ~ literally “devourer”, a type of hostile being in the Veda.
at.t.ahāsya (attahasya; attahasyam) ~ loud laughter, “the laughter that
attahasya
makes light of defeat and death and the powers of the ignorance”, an
element of Mahākālı̄ bhāva or Can.d.ı̄bhāva, and the principal form of
devı̄hāsya.
at.t.ahāsyam ~ see at.t.ahāsya.
attahasyam
a ūhate
ā
uhate ~ “so that he bears up thy activities” (Sri Aurobindo’s interpretation of ohate in R
. g Veda 1.176.4).
AUM ~ another spelling of the mystic syllable OM; its three letters,

A, U and M, symbolise the states of brahman as, respectively, “the
spirit of the gross and external” (virāt.), “the spirit of the subtle and
internal” (hiran.yagarbha), and “the spirit of the secret superconscient
omnipotence” (prājña), while the syllable as a whole represents the Absolute (turı̄ya), “the supreme Intangible, the original Unity, the timeless
Mystery self-existent above all manifestation in supernal being”.
avahelā ~ contempt.
avahela
avaraka tamas ~ covering darkness.
āvaraka
āvaran.am ~ covering, obstruction.
avaranam
avas ~ presence.
avasthā ~ state, condition.
avastha
avatāra (avatar) ~ divine incarnation; the “descent into form” of the Godhead (deva, ı̄śvara, purus.ottama), “when the divine Consciousness and Power, taking upon itself the human form and the human mode of action, possesses it not only by powers and magnitudes, by degrees and outward faces of itself but out of its eternal self-knowledge” in order “to exemplify the possibility of the Divine manifest in the human being” and “to leave the inﬂuence of that manifestation vibrating in the earth-nature and the soul of that manifestation presiding over its upward endeavour”; any of the ten incarnations of Vis.n.u described in the Hindu tradition, regarded by Sri Aurobindo as “a parable of evolution”.
āvega ~ enthusiasm.
avega
āvegamaya ~ enthusiastic.
avegamaya
avegamaya sraddha
āvegamaya
śraddhā ~ enthusiastic faith.
avegamaya tejas ~ enthusiastic energy.
āvegamaya
āveśa (avesh) ~ inrush of inspiration or spiritual force.
avesa
āveśamaya (aveshamaya) ~ inspired; enthusiastic.
avesamaya
avic
avicara
āra samadhi
samādhi (avichara samadhi) ~ a type of samādhi in which the
mind ceases to judge and perceive.
avidyā ~ ignorance; the power by which “the Spirit dwells . . . in the
avidya
consciousness of multiplicity and relativity”; “the knowledge of the
Many” (bahu), which “becomes no longer knowledge at all but ignorance, Avidya” because it “takes the Many for the real fact of existence
and views the One [eka1] only as a cosmic sum of the Many”.
avikalpa samadhi
samādhi ~ samādhi with cessation of variety of inner experience.


.avira
avı̄ra ~ lacking in strength.
.avisrsti
avisr.s.t.i (avisrishti) ~ absence of visr.s.t.i.
.avyakta (avyakta; avyaktam) ~ unmanifest; the Unmanifest.
.avyaktam ~ see avyakta.
.avyakta par
paratpara
ātpara ~ the unmanifest Supreme.
.ayath
ayatharthabodha
ārthabodha ~ incorrect perception.
.bahirdarsa
bahirdarśa (bahirdarsha) ~ same as bahirdarśı̄.
.bahirdarsi
bahirdarśı̄ (bahirdarshi) ~ outward-looking; samādhi in the waking
state with externalised vision and experience (same as bahirdarśı̄
jāgrat).
bahirdarśı̄
bahirdarsi āk
akasa
āśa (bahirdarshi akasha) ~ the vision of ākāśarūpa in
bahirdarśı̄ jāgrat.
bahirdarśı̄
bahirdarsi jjagrat
āgrat (bahirdarshi jagrat) ~ jāgrat samādhi of the outward-looking (bahirdarśı̄) type, in which images or other objects of
subtle sensory experience are perceived as if outside oneself.
bahirdarśı̄
bahirdarsi rupa
rūpa (bahirdarshi rupa) ~ subtle images seen in bahirdarśı̄
jāgrat or the faculty of seeing such images.
bahirdr.s.t.a (bahirdrishta) ~ (images, etc.) seen or perceived outside
bahirdrsta
oneself; samādhi in the waking state with such vision or perception
(same as bahirdarśı̄ jāgrat).
bahu ~ many; the multiplicity, “the play or varied self-expansion of
the One [eka1], shifting in its terms, divisible in its view of itself,
by force of which the One occupies many centres of consciousness,
inhabits many formations of energy in the universal Movement”.
bāhyasparśa (bahyasparsha; bahyaspars) ~ outward touch.
bahyasparsa
bala1 (bala; balam) ~ strength; a term in the first general formula of
the śakti catus.t.aya; “an abounding strength, energy and puissance of
outgoing and managing force”, an element of dehaśakti.
Bala2 ~ the name of a daitya or Titan, regarded by Sri Aurobindo as a
force from the mahat, the plane of the vastness of vijñāna, descended
into the mental plane and there “disturbing evolution by a premature
effort towards perfection”.
bāla ~ child, boy (see bāla-Kr.s.n.a).
bala
bālā ~ girl (see bālā-Kālı̄).
bala

.balabhava
bālabhāva ~ the state of being (like) a child; childhood; childlikeness;
the childlikeness of the free physical mind, “a state of pure happy and
free irresponsibility of action”; “the royal and eternal childhood whose
toys are the worlds and all universal Nature is the miraculous garden
of the play that tires never”.
bala
ālā bh
bhava
āva ~ girlish aspect.
balākā ~ female crane.
balaka
bālaka ~ child, boy.
balaka
bālakabhāva ~ same as bālabhāva.
balakabhava
balaka
ālaka Kr
Krsna
. s.n.a (balaka Krishna) ~ same as bāla-Kr.s.n.a.
bālā-Kālı̄ (bala-Kali; bala Kali) ~ the girl Kālı̄, “the force of Nature
bala-Kali
that whirls the stars in their orbits, lightly as a child might swing a
ball”; the śakti as the playmate of bāla-Kr.s.n.a.
bala-kisora-bhava
āla-kiśora-bhāva (bala-kishora-bhava; bala-kishore-bhava) ~ the
young boy aspect (of the lı̄lāmaya Kr.s.n.a).
bāla-Kr.s.n.a (bala-Krishna; bala Krishna) ~ the boy Kr.s.n.a, “the divine
bala-Krsna
Child” at play in the worlds in “the free infinity of the self-delight
of Sachchidananda”; Kr.s.n.a as the lı̄lāmaya purus.a in a condition of
bālabhāva.
balam ~ see bala1.
Balarāma (Balarama; Balaram) ~ the aspect of the fourfold ı̄śvara
Balarama
whose śakti is Mahākālı̄, corresponding to the ks.atriya who represents
the cosmic principle of Power in the symbolism of the cāturvarn.ya; his
qualities include “strength, grandeur, rushing impetuosity, overbearing
courage” and he is identified with Rudra2.
Balar
Balarama-Aniruddha
āma-Aniruddha (Balarama-Aniruddha; Balaram-Aniruddha) ~
the combination of the Balarāma and Aniruddha aspects of the fourfold ı̄śvara, corresponding to the Mahākālı̄-Mahāsarasvatı̄ combination of the aspects of the śakti; the temperament proper to this
combination (short for Balarāma-Aniruddha bhāva).
Balar
Balarama-Aniruddha
āma-Aniruddha bha
bhava
v̄a (Balarama-Aniruddha bhava; Balaram-)
~ the Balarāma-Aniruddha temperament; a combination of Balarāma bhāva and Aniruddha bhāva.
Balar
Balarama
āma bhava
bhāva ~ the temperament of Balarāma; manifestation of
the Balarāma personality of the fourfold ı̄śvara.
balaślāghā ~ assertion of strength (bala1), an element of dehaśakti.
balaslagha
bālavat ~ like a child.
balavat


.bali1 ~ offering, oblation.
.Bali2 ~ a daitya or Titan subdued by Vis.n.u in his fifth avatāra, at the
first stage of fully human evolution, when he incarnated in “man as
dwarf, small and undeveloped and physical but containing in himself
the godhead and taking possession of existence”; Bali is associated
in the Record of Yoga with obstinacy of the will (hat.ha) as a quality
needed in the complete psychological state.
bandhu ~ kinsman; brother.
bandini d
bandinı̄
dasi
āsı̄ ~ literally “captive slave-girl”, the dāsı̄ as the captive of
her divine Lover and Master, a symbol of the state of madhura dāsya.
barhih. ~ in the Veda, the seat of sacred grass on which the gods are
invited to sit at the sacrifice.
barhis ~ same as barhih..
bauddha ~ relating to the buddhi; intellectual.
bauddha
bauddh
ā nar
narah
āh. ~ literally “intellectual men”, powers of the buddhi.
b. darshana ~ abbreviation of “brahma darshana” (see brahmadarśana).
Bhadrakālı̄ ~ name of a goddess, a form of Durgā (see Durgā-Kālı̄).
Bhadrakali
bhadr
bhadra
ā pramati ~ happy state of mind. [R
. g Veda 1.94.1]
Bhaga ~ “the Enjoyer”, a Vedic god, one of the Four who represent
the “working of the Truth in the human mind and temperament”;
he brings into the human consciousness “the divine beatitude, the
illimitable joy of the Truth, of the infinity of our being”.
bhagavān (bhagavan; bhagawan) ~ God, the Divine, “the Lord of Love and Delight”.
bhāgavata ~ relating to bhagavān; divine; the name of the highest
bhagavata
svarga.
bhagavati sraddha
śraddhā ~ faith in the Divine; same as śraddhā bhagavati.
bhagavati svaśakty
svasaktyam
ām (bhagavati swashaktyam) ~ (faith) in God and
in the power within oneself.
bhagawan ~ see bhagavān.
bhāgya ~ destiny.
bhagya
bhakta ~ devotee, God-lover.
bhakti ~ devotion, “love and adoration and the soul’s desire of the
Highest”.
bhartā ~ upholder.
bharta
bhartr. (bhartri) ~ (brahman as) the upholder.

.bhasa
bhās.ā (bhasha; bhasa) ~ language; the linguistic faculty (bhās.āśakti),
one of the “special powers” whose development is related to literary
work (sāhitya); the study of languages and reading of texts for the
sake of cultivating this faculty.
bhās.āśakti (bhashashakti) ~ linguistic faculty; the power of underbhasasakti
standing languages, especially by intuition, inspiration and other
means proper to vijñāna.
bhās.āsiddhi (bhashasiddhi) ~ perfection of the linguistic faculty.
bhasasiddhi
bhās.ātattva (bhashatattwa) ~ the principles of language; the systembhasatattva
atic study of these principles, usually referred to as nirukta or philology.
bhās.ya (bhashya) ~ commentary; scriptural interpretation; the capacbhasya
ity of exegesis “in faithful subordination to the strict purport &
connotation of the text”.
bhauta ~ physical; relating to the five bhūtas and their balance in the
body.
bhauta asiddhi ~ the negation of bhautasiddhi.
bhautasiddhi (bhautasiddhi; bhauta-siddhi; bhauta siddhi) ~ a term
that occurs in 1912-13 in connection with utthāpanā, also associated
with the vijñāna catus.t.aya; it is perhaps a collective term for the
siddhis of the body, which are the basis of utthāpanā and form part
of as.t.asiddhi in the vijñāna catus.t.aya.
bhauta tejas ~ (excess of) the element tejas (fire) in the body; body
heat.
bhāva ~ becoming; state of being (sometimes added to an adjective to form an abstract noun and translatable by a suffix such as “-ness”, as in br.hadbhāva, the state of being br.hat [wide], i.e., wideness); condition of consciousness; subjectivity; state of mind and feeling; physical indication of a psychological state; content, meaning (of rūpa); spiritual experience, realisation; emotion, “moved spiritualised state of the affective nature”; (madhura bhāva, etc.) any of several types of relation between the jı̄va and the ı̄śvara, each being a way in which “the transcendent and universal person of the Divine conforms itself to our individualised personality and accepts a personal relation with us, at once identified with us as our supreme Self and yet close and different as our Master, Friend, Lover, Teacher”; attitude; mood; temperament; aspect; internal manifestation of the Goddess (devı̄), in her total divine Nature (daivı̄ prakr.ti or devı̄bhāva) or in the “more seizable because more defined and limited temperament” of any of her aspects, as in Mahākālı̄ bhāva; a similar manifestation of any personality or combination of personalities of the deva or fourfold ı̄śvara, as in Indrabhāva or Aniruddha bhāva; in the vision of Reality (brahmadarśana), any of the “many aspects of the Infinite” which “disclose themselves, separate, combine, fuse, are unified together” until “there shines through it all the supreme integral Reality”; especially, the various “states of perception” in which the divine personality (purus.a) is seen in the impersonality of the brahman, ranging from the “general personality” of sagun.a brahman to the “vivid personality” of Kr.s.n.akālı̄.
bh
bhavasamrddhi
āvasamr.ddhi ~ richness of feeling; an element of Mahālaks.mı̄
bhāva.
bh
bhava-saundarya
āva-saundarya (bhava-saundarya; bhava saundarya) ~ beauty in
the state of mind and feeling; inner beauty.
bhavitavyam ~ that which is to be.
bhaya ānandamaya
anandamaya ~ fear turned into delight.
bheda ~ division.
bhedabuddhi ~ dividing mind.
bhoga ~ enjoyment; a response to experience which “translates itself into joy and suffering” in the lower being, where it “is of a twofold kind, positive and negative”, but in the higher being “it is an actively equal enjoyment of the divine delight in self-manifestation”; (also called sama bhoga) the second stage of active / positive samatā, reached when the rasagrahan.a or mental “seizing of the principle of delight” in all things takes “the form of a strong possessing enjoyment . . . which makes the whole life-being vibrate with it and accept and rejoice in it”; the second stage of bhukti, “enjoyment without desire” in the prān.a or vital being; (when prı̄ti is substituted for bhoga as the second stage of positive samatā or bhukti) same as (sama) ānanda, the third stage of positive samatā or bhukti, the “perfect enjoyment of existence” that comes “when it is not things, but the Ananda of the spirit in things that forms the real, essential object of our enjoying and things only as form and symbol of the spirit, waves of the ocean of Ananda”.
bhoga h
hasyam
āsyaṁ karmalips
karmalipsa
ā samabhāva ~ enjoyment, cheerfulness, the urge to work, equality.
.bhogalipsa
bhogalipsā ~ the urge towards enjoyment, an attribute of the vaiśya.
.bhogas
bhogasamarthya
āmarthya (bhogasamarthya; bhogasamarthyam; bhoga samarthyam) ~ “the capacity to take all enjoyment of the world without desire but also without exhaustion and satiety”, an element of
prān.aśakti.
bhogas
bhogasamarthyam
āmarthyam ~ see bhogasāmarthya.
bhojanānanda ~ delight in eating.
bhojanananda
bhoktā ~ enjoyer.
bhokta
bhoktr. (bhoktri) ~ (brahman as) the enjoyer.
bhrājantah. ~ blazing; radiant.
bhrajantah
bhraṁśa ~ a fall (from the path of yoga).
bhramsa
bhras.t.a (bhrashta) ~ fallen (from the path of yoga).
bhrasta
bhrātra ~ brotherhood; the relation (bhāva) with the ı̄śvara in which
bhratra
the relation of friend (sakhya) is “raised to brother”.
Bhr.gu (Bhrigu) ~ the name of a Vedic r.s.i, progenitor of an ancient
Bhrgu
clan of sages who went by his name, also described as heavenly seers or
symbolically as “burning powers of the Sun, the Lord of Knowledge”;
along with the Āṅgirasas, they are identified in the Record of Yoga
with the Judeo-Christian “seraphim”, the highest order of angels.
bhrsta
bhr
tavisi
. s.t.a tavis
. i (bhrista tavishi) ~ afﬂicted force.
bhū ~ earth, the plane of terrestrial existence; the world of Matter
bhu
(anna1), which is “Sachchidananda represented to His own mental
experience as a formal basis of objective knowledge, action and delight
of existence”, the lowest world of the triloka; it includes the physical
plane, along with its vital and mental envelopes (triloka in bhū), and
the subtle bhū.
bhūh. ~ same as bhū.
bhuh
bhūh.-prakr.ti (bhuh-prakriti) ~ physical nature.
bhuh-prakrti
bhukti ~ enjoyment; the “enjoyment of our liberated being which
brings us into unity or union with the Supreme”; the third member of the siddhi catus.t.aya, resulting from śuddhi and mukti and
consisting of “the Delight of existence in itself, independent of every
experience and extending itself to all experiences”. It has three states
(rasagrahan.a, bhoga and ānanda), each with three intensities (rati,
ratna and rātha), on each of seven levels corresponding to the seven
planes of existence.

.bhuma
bhūmā ~ largeness.
.bh
bhumaya
ūmaya āk
akasa
āśa (bhumaya akasha) ~ the ākāśa of bhū; the physical
ether.
.bh
bhumayi
ūmayı̄ prakr
prakrti
. ti (bhumayi prakriti) ~ terrestrial nature.
.bhumi
bhūmi ~ earth; world; place of manifestation.
.bhur
bhūr ~ same as bhū.
.bhurloka
bhūrloka ~ the world (loka) of terrestrial existence; same as bhū.
.bhurmaya
bhūrmaya ~ physical.
.bhusvarga
bhūsvarga (bhuswarga) ~ a heavenly world (svarga) belonging to the
higher levels associated with the terrestrial plane (bhū) or to the subtle
bhū.
bhūta ~ creature; any of the pañcabhūta, the five “subtle conditions
bhuta
of material energy” which are “called by the names of the five concrete elements of ancient thought, ether, air, fire, water and earth”; all
objects are said to be “created by the combination of these five subtle
conditions or elements” which are “nowhere to be found in their purity
in the gross material world”.
bhūtaprakr.ti (bhutaprakriti) ~ material Nature.
bhutaprakrti
bhūtaśuddhi ~ purification of the combination of the bhūtas in the
bhutasuddhi
body.
bhuvah. ~ same as bhuvar.
bhuvar ~ the plane of the life-principle (prān.a), consisting of “multiple dynamic worlds formative of the Earth”, the second plane of the
triloka; the vital layer of the material world (see bhuvar of bhū).
bhuvarloka ~ the world (loka) called bhuvar; the vital world.
bhuvarmaya ~ consisting of the energy of bhuvar; vital.
bhuvarmaya tapas ~ same as bhuvar tapas.
bhuvarmayı̄ ~ vital (feminine of bhuvarmaya).
bhuvarmayi
bhuvar of bh
bhu
ū ~ the vital world within the physical; the vital layer of
the earth-consciousness or plane of material existence, the second level
of the triloka in bhū.
bhuvar tapas ~ the power that belongs to the vital plane; manifesting
through this medium, “the Will tends to produce powerfully immediate
results & more intermittently, often by indirect means & after much
tergiversation, final results”.
bı̄bhatsa ~ disgusting.
bibhatsa
bibhatsa virati ~ avoidance of what is repellent.
bı̄bhatsa

.bija
bı̄ja ~ seed; also spelled vı̄ja.
.blague [French] ~ humbug.
.bodha ~ awareness, consciousness, perception.
.bodhi-sattva (Bodhi-sattwa) ~ in Mahayana Buddhism,
“a being
who, though having the right to enter Nirvana, deliberately renounces
it, electing to work under the conditions and possibly renewed temptations of the world, for the love of one’s fellow man or of the whole
sentient world” (The Theosophical Path, March 1915, p. 160).
brahma ~ same as brahman.
Brahmā ~ the Creator, one of the “three Powers and Personalities of the One Cosmic Godhead”, of which the other two are Vis.n.u, the Preserver, and Śiva or Rudra2, the Destroyer.
brahmabhāva ~ consciousness of the impersonal brahman in all things; inner realisation of brahman.
brahmabodha (brahmabodha; brahma bodha) ~ awareness of brahman.
brahmabuddhi ~ awareness of brahman.
brahmacārı̄ (brahmachari) ~ unmarried religious student.
brahmacari
brahma catus. t.aya (brahma chatusthaya; brahmachatusthaya; brahmachatushtaya) ~ the sixth catus.t.aya, the quaternary of the divine Reality (brahman), consisting of sarvaṁ brahma, anantaṁ brahma, jñānaṁ brahma and ānandaṁ brahma (combined in sarvam anantaṁ jñānam ānandaṁ brahma, the formula of the fourfold brahman).
brahmadarsana (brahmadarshana; brahma-darshana; brahma darshana; brahmadarshan) ~ the vision (darśana) of brahman in all things and beings; the perception of the fourfold brahman as “the impersonal Sarvam Anantam Jnanam Anandam” (also called “simple Brahmadarshana”), sometimes extended to the perception of “the Personal in & embracing the Impersonal”, the latter perception including ı̄śvaradarśana and such specific forms of darśana as Nārāyan.adarśana, Kr.s.n.adarśana and Kr.s.n.akālı̄ darśana. The vision of “the one and indivisible eternal transcendent and cosmic Brahman that is in its seeming divided in things and creatures” is in its nature a “spiritual seeing of God and world” which is a “direct experience [upalabdhi] and as real, vivid, near, constant, effective, intimate as to the mind its sensuous seeing and feeling of images, objects and persons”.
brahmadr.s.t.i (brahmadrishti) ~ same as brahmadarśana.
.brahmajññana āna ~ knowledge of the brahman.
.brahmaloka ~ the world of the brahman in which the soul is one with the infinite existence and yet able to enjoy differentiation in the oneness.
brahmamaya ~ consisting of brahman.
brahmamaya ı̄śvara
isvara (brahmamaya ishwara) ~ the ı̄śvara with brahman as his impersonal aspect.
brahman ~ (in the Veda) “the soul or soul-consciousness emerging from the secret heart of things” or “the thought, inspired, creative, full of the secret truth, which emerges from that consciousness and becomes thought of the mind”; (in Vedanta) the divine Reality, “the One [eka1] besides whom there is nothing else existent”, the Absolute who is “at the same time the omnipresent Reality in which all that is relative exists as its forms or its movements”. Its nature is saccidānanda, infinite existence (sat), consciousness (cit) and bliss (ānanda), whose second element can also be described as consciousness-force (cit-tapas), making four fundamental principles of the integral Reality; brahman seen in all things in terms of these principles is called in the Record of Yoga the fourfold brahman, whose aspects form the brahma catus.t.aya. The complete realisation of brahman included for Sri Aurobindo not only the unification of the experiences of the nirgun.a brahman (brahman without qualities) and sagun.a brahman (brahman with qualities), but the harmonisation of the impersonal brahman which is “the spiritual material and conscious substance of all the ideas and forces and forms of the universe” with the personal ı̄śvara in the consciousness of parabrahman, the brahman in its supreme status as “a transcendent Unthinkable too great for any manifestation”, which “is at the same time the living supreme Soul of all things” (purus.ottama) and the supreme Lord (parameśvara) and supreme Self (paramātman), “and in all these equal aspects the same single and eternal Godhead”. Brahman is represented in sound by the mystic syllable OM.
brahman.ā ~ by the soul-thought (brahman in the Vedic sense). [Cf.
brahmana
. g Veda 2.2.10]
brāhman.a ~ the soul-type representing “the Divine as knowledge in man”, the first element in the fourfold personality symbolised by the cāturvarn.ya.
brahmānanda ~ the bliss of brahman, “the self-existent bliss of the spirit which depends on no object or circumstance”; it “can be described as the eternity of an uninterrupted supreme ecstasy”, a bliss of which “peace . . . is the intimate core and essence”.
brāhman.yam ~ “Brahminhood”; the inner nature of the brāhman.a.
brahmanyam
brahmaprema ~ love of the brahman in all.
brahmaśakti (brahmashakti) ~ the soul-power of knowledge which reveals itself in the brāhman.a.
brahmasiddhi ~ the siddhi of the brahma catus.t.aya.
brahmatejas ~ the energy that manifests itself in the brāhman.a temperament.
brahmātmabhāva ~ realisation of the Self as one with brahman.
brahmavarcasya (brahmavarchasya; brahmavarchasyam) ~ “spiritual force which comes from knowledge and purity”, an attribute of the brāhman.a. 
brahmavarcasyam (brahmavarchasyam) ~ see brahmavarcasya.
brahmin ~ same as brāhman.a.
brahmi
br
āhmı̄ sthiti ~ abiding in the consciousness of the brahman.
br.had (brihad) ~ same as br.hat.
brhad
brhad
br
. had arcis (brihad archis) ~ vast ray.
br.hadbhāva (brihadbhava) ~ wideness.
brhadbhava
brhad
br
. had rrtam
. tam (brihad ritam) ~ same as br.hat r.tam.
br.hallipsā ~ the urge towards vastness; an element of Maheśvarı̄
brhallipsa
bhāva.
Br.haspati (Brihaspati) ~ a Vedic god, the “Master of the creative
Brhaspati
Word”; the universal deva as the “self-expressive Soul”, giver of the
supreme word by which is effected the “manifestation of the different world-planes in the conscient human being” culminating “in the
manifestation of the superconscient, the Truth and the Bliss”.
br.hat (brihat) ~ wide, large, vast; wideness, largeness; vast abundance;
brhat
“vast self-awareness”, one of the three terms expressing the nature of
vijñāna (see satyam r.taṁ br.hat).
brhat
br
. hat rrtam
. tam (brihat ritam; brihad ritam) ~ large ordered truth.
brhat
br
hat
satya
(brihat satya; brihat satyam) ~ large essential truth.
br
brhat
hat
satyam
rrtam
. tam (brihat satyam ritam) ~ vastness, essential truth
and ordered truth; see satyam r.taṁ br.hat.
brhat
br
. hat siddhi (brihat siddhi) ~ large perfection.

.brhattara
br.hattara (brihattara) ~ wider; very wide.
.brhattva
br.hattva (brihattwa) ~ wideness.
.brihad
brihad, etc. ~ see br.had, etc.
.Brihaspati ~ see Br.haspati.
.brihat
brihat, etc. ~ see br.hat, etc.
.brume [French] ~ fog.
.bubhuksa
bubhuks.ā (bubhuksha) ~ appetite.
.buddha ~ mental; the mental plane, the plane of buddhi.
.buddha bh
bhava
āva ~ mental condition; intellectual state of consciousness.
.buddha tapas ~ mental will-power; same as intellectual / mental
tapas.
.buddha vvani
ān.ı̄ ~ mental voice; a communication from a spirit belonging
to the mental plane.
.buddher ~ of the intelligence.
.buddhi ~ intelligence; the thinking mind, the highest normal faculty
of the antah.karan.a, also called the mānasa buddhi or mental reason, whose three forms are the habitual mind, pragmatic reason and
truth-seeking reason. The buddhi as “the discerning intelligence and
the enlightened will” is “in its nature thought-power and will-power
of the Spirit turned into the lower form of a mental activity” and
thus “an intermediary between a much higher Truth-mind not now
in our active possession, which is the direct instrument of Spirit, and
the physical life of the human mind evolved in body”; its powers of
perception, imagination, reasoning and judgment correspond respectively to the higher faculties of revelation, inspiration, intuition and
discrimination belonging to vijñāna, which may act in the mind to
create “a higher form of the buddhi that can be called the intuitive
mind” or vijñānabuddhi. In compound expressions, the word buddhi
sometimes refers to a particular mentality or state of consciousness and
may be translated “sense of”, as in dāsyabuddhi, “sense of surrender”.
buddhicāturya ~ acuteness of intelligence, an element of Mahābuddhicaturya
sarasvatı̄ bhāva.
buddhigr
buddhigrahyam
āhyam atı̄ndriyam
atindriyam ~ seizable by the reason but beyond the
senses. [Gı̄tā 6.21]
buddhiśakti (buddhishakti) ~ the power, capacity and right state of
buddhisakti
activity of the thinking mind, one of the four kinds of śakti forming
the second member of the śakti catus.t.aya.
.buddhi-yoga ~ a method of yoga, “the Yoga of the self-liberating
intelligent will”.
.bujruki [Bengali] ~ hocus-pocus; imposture.
.caitanya (chaitanya; chaitanyam) ~ consciousness; same as cit.
.caitanyakendra (chaitanyakendra) ~ centre of consciousness;
the
“true centre” which “is a luminous formulation of the one Consciousness and a pure channel and instrument of the one Existence”,
supporting “the individual manifestation and action of the universal
Force” and revealing “the true Person in us, the central eternal being,
an everlasting being of the Supreme, a power and portion of the
transcendent Shakti”.
caitanyaloka (chaitanyaloka) ~ the world of pure and infinite consciousness (usually not distinguished from tapoloka).
caitanyam (chaitanyam) ~ see caitanya.
caitanyamaya (chaitanyamaya) ~ having the nature of caitanya, the
principle of pure consciousness (cit) that is the second aspect of saccidānanda; expressing the principle of caitanya or cit contained in the
principle of any other plane, such as the physical.
cakra (chakra) ~ any of the seven centres of consciousness in the subtle
body (sūks.ma deha), each of which “is the centre and the storing-house
of its own particular system of psychological powers, energies and operations, ~ each system corresponding to a plane of our psychological
existence”; these centres or “lotuses”, connected with certain centres
in the physical nervous system and arranged “in a line corresponding
to the spinal cord”, are called (from the highest to the lowest) sahasradala, ājñācakra, viśuddha, anāhata, man.ipura, svādhis.t.hāna and
mūlādhāra, of which man.ipura (the nābhicakra or “navel centre”)
and especially svādhis.t.hāna (the “penultimate chakra” or, counting
from the bottom, the “second chakra”, also called the kāmacakra or
simply “the chakra”) are often mentioned in the Record of Yoga in
connection with ārogya and kāmānanda.
cakra-śakti (chakra-shakti) ~ strength of the cakra or cakras, recakra-sakti
ferring especially to the kāmacakra, but possibly including the
nābhicakra.

.caksuh
caks.uh. (chakshu) ~ the eye; the sense-organ or indriya (especially the
subtle sense-organ or sūks.ma indriya) of sight (darśana).
.caksus
caks.us (chakshush) ~ same as caks.uh..
.caksusa
cāks.us.a (chakshusha; chakshush) ~ ocular, visual; pertaining to the
eye or to the physical or subtle sense of vision (caks.us); the visual form
of subtle sense-perception (vis.ayadr.s.t.i), also called darśana.
ccaksusa
āks.us.a ananda
ānanda (chakshush ananda) ~ visual ānanda, delight in all
that is seen with the eyes, a kind of indriya-ānanda.
çama ~ see śama.
cama
çamamaya
camamaya ~ see śamamaya.
çamas ~ see śamas.
camas
cca
āñcalya (chanchalya) ~ restlessness.
can.d.a (chanda) ~ fierce, ardent, intense.
canda
canda
can
ānanda (chanda ananda) ~ same as can.d.ānanda.
. d.a ananda
can.d.ānanda (chandananda) ~ intense delight.
candananda
can
canda
samānanda (chanda samananda) ~ intense equal delight.
. d.a samananda
canda
can
sukham
(chanda sukham) ~ ardent happiness.
..
can.d.atā (chandata) ~ fierceness, ardour, intensity.
candata
canda
can
. d.a tejas (chanda tejas) ~ ardent energy (tejas).
Can.d.ı̄ (Chandi) ~ fierce (feminine of can.d.a); “the fierce one”, an
Candi
epithet of Kālı̄.
Can.d.ı̄bhāva (Chandibhava; Chandi bhava; Chandibhavah) ~ “the
Candibhava
force of Kali manifest in the temperament” (see Kālı̄), a term used
early in the Record of Yoga for devı̄bhāva or daivı̄ prakr.ti, sometimes
referring to a combination of the four personalities of the divine śakti
with Mahākālı̄ as the dominant aspect, sometimes referring specifically
to the force of Mahākālı̄ and almost equivalent to Mahākālı̄ bhāva.
candra1 (chandra) ~ moon; the lunar orb as a symbol of the mind,
especially the intuitive mind, which reﬂects the light of vijñāna symbolised by sūrya1, the sun; also a symbol of ānanda, sometimes identified
with soma1.
Candra2 (Chandra) ~ the god of the moon (candra1); the deity of
mind.
cāndra (chándra; chandra) ~ lunar, relating to the moon; mild, cold;
candra
belonging to the intuitive mind.
candraloka (chandraloka) ~ the world of the moon (candra1, symbol
of the mind reﬂecting the light of sūrya1, the sun of Truth); the higher

of the two planes of svar, corresponding to buddhi (intelligence).
.candraman
candramandala
. d.ala (chandramandala) ~ the orb of the moon (candra ),
symbolising intuitive mind.
.candramaya (chandramaya) ~ full of the light of candra1; having the
nature of intuitive mind.
.ccandra
āndra tejas (chandra tejas) ~ lunar (i.e., reﬂected, indirect) light and
energy.
.Candra Vamsa
Vaṁśa (Ch. Vsa) ~ lunar dynasty (the line of ancient Indian
kings traditionally regarded as descendants of Candra2, the moongod).
çanti ~ see śānti.
canti
cāpalyam (chapalyam) ~ restlessness.
capalyam
cāran.a (charana) ~ a celestial singer.
carana
çarira
carira siddhi ~ see śārı̄rasiddhi.
cars.an.iprā (charshanipra) ~ “filling the actions” (see the sortilege of
carsanipra
13 December 1912 from R
. g Veda 1.177.1).
catholiques . . brahmaniques [French] ~ Catholic . . Brahminic (both
in plural).
cāturvarn.ya (chaturvarnya) ~ the ancient Indian system of the four orders (brāhman.a, ks.atriya, vaiśya, śūdra), representing four psychological types whose combination is necessary for the complete personality; these four types are symbolic of “four cosmic principles, The Wisdom that conceives the order and principle of things, the Power that sanctions, upholds and enforces it, the Harmony that creates the arrangement of its parts, the Work that carries out what the rest direct”. 
caturyuga (chaturyuga) ~ a series of four ages (satyayuga, tretā, dvāpara and kaliyuga), one hundredth of a pratikalpa, forming a cycle of apparent decline leading to a new cycle beginning on a higher level in a “cosmic circling movement” through which “God is perpetually leading man onwards to loftier & more embracing manifestations of our human perfectibility”.
catus.t.aya (catustaya, chatushtaya; chatusthaya; chatusthay; chatustaya) ~ group of four, tetrad, quaternary; any of the seven parts of the sapta catus.t.aya, the system received by Sri Aurobindo as a programme for his yoga. The seven catus.t.ayas are: (1) samatā catus.t.aya or śānti catus.t.aya, (2) śakti catus.t.aya, (3) vijñāna catus.t.aya, (4) śarı̄ra catus.t.aya, (5) karma catus.t.aya or lı̄lācatus.t.aya, (6) brahma catus.t.aya, (7) (saṁ)siddhi catus.t.aya or yoga catus.t.aya. The first four catus.t.ayas are the catus.t.ayas of the ādhāra-siddhi; the last three are the general catus.t.ayas. The word catus.t.aya may also be applied to other groups of four, such as lipi catus.t.aya. 
catvāro manavah. (chatvaro manavah; chatwaro manavah) ~ the four Manus, archetypal mental beings through whom the fourfold active nature of the Godhead is expressed in the fourfold character of humanity. [Gı̄tā 10.6]
ces.t.ā (cheshta) ~ struggle, effort.
cesta
chaitanya, etc. ~ see caitanya, etc.
chaitanya
chakra ~ see cakra.
chakshu ~ see caks.uh..
chakshush ~ see caks.us, cāks.us.a.
chakshusha ~ see cāks.us.a.
chanchalya ~ see cāñcalya.
chanda, etc. ~ see can.d.a, etc.
chanda
Chandi ~ see Can.d.ı̄.
Chandibhava ~ see Can.d.ı̄bhāva.
chandra, etc. ~ see candra, etc.
chandra
chapalyam ~ see cāpalyam.
charana ~ see cāran.a.
charshanipra ~ see cars.an.iprā.
chaturvarnya ~ see cāturvarn.ya.
chaturyuga ~ see caturyuga.
chatushtaya ~ see catus.t.aya.
chatustaya ~ see catus.t.aya.
chatusthaya; chatusthay ~ see catus.t.aya.
chatvaro manavah ~ see catvāro manavah..
chatwaro manavah ~ see catvāro manavah..
chāyā (chhaya; chaya) ~ shadow; the lowest of the seven kinds of
chaya
akashic material; rūpa or lipi composed of this material.
chāyāghana (chhayaghan) ~ dense chāyā.
chayaghana
chāyāloka (chhayaloka) ~ the shadowy world; same as pātāla.
chayaloka
chāyāmaya (chhayamaya; chhayamay; chayamaya; chayamay) ~
chayamaya
shadowy; (rūpa or lipi) composed of or containing chāyā.
ch
chayamaya
āyāmaya rupa
rūpa (chhayamaya rupa) ~ rūpa composed of chāyā.
chāyāmaya tejas (chhayamaya tejas) ~ shadowy brilliance; tejas
chayamaya


mixed with an element of chāyā.
.chayamaya
chāyāmaya tejomaya (chhayamaya tejomaya) ~ shadowy-brilliant
rūpa; tejomaya mixed with an element of chāyā.
.ch
chayamaya
āyāmaya varna
varn.a (chhayamay varna)~shadowy colour; varn.a mixed
with an element of chāyā.
.chayamayi
chāyāmayı̄ (chhayamayi) ~ shadowy (feminine of chāyāmaya, agreeing with implied dr.s.t.i, “vision”); the shadowy vision of the underworld.
chāyā-prakāśa (chhaya-prakasha) ~ rūpa composed of chāyā and
chaya-prakasa
prakāśa combined.
chāyārūpa (chhayarupa) ~ rūpa composed of chāyā.
chayarupa
chāyāvr.ta (chhayavrita) ~ enveloped in shadows.
chayavrta
chāyāyukta (chhayayukta) ~ containing chāyā.
chayayukta
cheshta ~ see ces.t.ā.
chhaya, etc. ~ see chāyā, etc.
chhaya
chid., etc. ~ see cid., etc.
chid.
chinmaya, etc. ~ see cinmaya, etc.
chinmaya
chintana ~ see cintana.
chit ~ see cit.
chitra, etc. ~ see citra, etc.
chitra
chitta, etc. ~ see citta, etc.
chitta
cid. (chid.) ~ abbreviation of cidghanānanda.
cidākāśa (chidakasha; chidakash) ~ the ether of pure consciousness
cidakasa
(cit); a subtle ether (sūks.ma ākāśa) or “inner space” behind the
cittākāśa; its accessibility to the mind in antardarśı̄ jāgrat and svapnasamādhi and its mention in connection with the cittākāśa suggest
that the cidākāśa referred to by Sri Aurobindo is the ether of cit on the
mental plane, not on its own highest plane.
cidānanda (chidananda) ~ (also called nirgun.a, qualitiless) “Ananda
cidananda
of pure consciousness [cit] without the gunas”, one of the seven
principal forms of ānanda, corresponding to the principle of ānanda
involved in cit-tapas, an “infinite inalienable delight” implicit in the
“infinite imperishable force of self-conscious being”.
cidghana (chidghana) ~ the “dense light of essential consciousness”
belonging to the vijñāna or gnosis, “in which the intense fullness of
the Ananda can be”: “a dense luminous consciousness, . . . the seedstate of the divine consciousness in which are contained living and


concrete all the immutable principles of the divine being and all the
inviolable truths of the divine conscious-idea and nature”; short for
cidghanānanda.
cidghana ahaituka ānanda
ananda (chidghana ahaituka ananda) ~ ahaituka
ānanda combined with cidghanānanda.
cidghana ānanda
ananda (chidghana ananda) ~ same as cidghanānanda.
cidghan
cidghanananda
ānanda (chidghanananda) ~ bliss of “dense self-luminous
consciousness” (cidghana), ānanda possessed not “by reﬂection in the
mental experience” (see ahaituka ānanda) but “with a greater fullness
and directness in the massed and luminous consciousness . . . which
comes by the gnosis”; the form of subjective ānanda connected with
the plane of vijñāna.
cidghana suddha
śuddha (chidghana shuddha) ~ same as cidghana-śuddhānanda.
cidghana-śuddh
cidghana-suddhananda
ānanda (chidghana-shuddhananda) ~ śuddhānanda
combined with cidghanānanda; śuddhānanda on the plane of vijñāna.
cinmaya (chinmaya; chinmay) ~ consisting of pure consciousness
(cit).
cinmaya aiśvarya
aisvarya (chinmay aishwarya) ~ same as cinmayaiśvarya.
cinmayaiśvarya
cinmayaisvarya (chinmayaishwarya) ~ aiśvarya with full divine consciousness, “free from all element of struggle, in which force and
pressure will only be present to stress the energy of fulfilment and
not for overcoming resistance”.
cintana (chintana) ~ thought.
cit (chit) ~ consciousness; the infinite self-awareness that is “the elemental origin and primal completeness of all this varied consciousness
which is here used for various formation and experience”, the second
term of saccidānanda; “an inherent self-consciousness” in brahman,
“inseparable from its being [sat] and throwing itself out as a force
[tapas] of movement of consciousness which is creative of forces, forms
and worlds”; the “universal conscious-stuff of existence”, the “original
Consciousness” which “modifies itself so as to become on the Truthplane the supermind, on the mental plane the mental reason, will,
emotion, sensation, on the lower planes the vital or physical instincts,
impulses, habits of an obscure force not in superficially conscious
possession of itself”.
citra (chitra) ~ picture; two-dimensional image (rūpa) or writing (lipi)

“formed from the material provided by the background, by the mental
eye acting through the material”; short for citra-dr.s.t.i.
citra-dr.s.t.i (chitra-drishti) ~ vision of citra rūpa and citra lipi.
citra-drsti
citra lipi (chitralipi; chitra-lipi; chitra lipi) ~ pictorial writing: twodimensional lipi seen on a background from which the mental eye
draws its material.
citraratha (chitraratha) ~ another term for citra ratih., taken from a
sortilege from Kādambarı̄; Citraratha, king of the gandharvas, is in
Kādambarı̄ the husband of Madirā and father of Kādambarı̄.
citra ratih. (chitra ratih) ~ various delight; a combination of different
forms of ānanda.
citra rupa
rūpa (chitrarupa; chitra rupa) ~ pictorial image: two-dimensional rūpa seen on a background from which the mental eye draws its
material.
citra tejas (chitra tejas) ~ pictorial rūpa composed of tejas.
cit-śakti (chit-shakti; chitshakti) ~ consciousness-force, same as citcit-sakti
tapas; “the Consciousness-Force of the eternal Existence” who “is the
universal creatrix”.
cit samudra (chit samudra) ~ ocean of consciousness.
citta (chitta) ~ the “primary stuff of consciousness” which is “universal in Nature, but is subconscient and mechanical in nature of
Matter”; the “pervading and possessing action of consciousness” in
the living body which forms into the sense-mind (manas); it consists
of a lower layer of passive memory in which “the impressions of all
things seen, thought, sensed, felt are recorded”, and a higher layer (also
called manas-citta) of the emotional mind where “waves of reaction
and response . . . rise up from the basic consciousness”; also short for
cittākāśa.
cittākāśa (chittakasha; chittakash) ~ the ether (ākāśa) of the citta
cittakasa
or basic mental consciousness, a mental ākāśa defined as the “ether
of the pranic manas”, whose contents are experienced especially in
antardarśı̄ jāgrat and svapnasamādhi.
cit-tapas (chit-tapas; chittapas; chit tapas) ~ consciousness-force;
knowledge-power; the unity of cit and tapas; “the infinite divine selfawareness which is also the infinite all-effective Will”, represented by
cit in the description of the nature of divine being as sat-cit-ānanda or
saccidānanda; the “divine Conscious-Force” which “is omnipresent

in the material cosmos, but veiled, operative secretly behind the actual
phenomenon of things, and it expresses itself there characteristically
through its own subordinate term, Life” (prān.a).
cittaśakti (chittashakti) ~ the power, capacity and right state of activcittasakti
ity of the emotional being, one of the four kinds of śakti forming the
second member of the śakti catus.t.aya.
cittaśuddhi (chittashuddhi; chittasuddhi) ~ purification of the emotional being.
cittasya (chittasya) ~ of the emotional being.
cit-tattva (chit-tattwa) ~ the principle of consciousness (cit).
clari [Latin] ~ of a clear (consciousness).
combined sam
samadhi
ādhi ~ the simultaneous experience of different states
of samādhi, in the form of double samādhi or triple samādhi.
comme une partie de la famille [French] ~ like a part of the family.
communicative vy
vyapti
āpti ~ the form of vyāpti by which “you can send
or put your own thought, feeling etc. into someone else”.
composite bh
bhava
āva ~ a fusion of the different types of relation (bhāva)
between the jı̄va and the ı̄śvara, who is perceived as “the perfect
Personality capable of all relations even to the most human, concrete
and intimate; for he is friend, comrade, lover, playmate, guide, teacher,
master, ministrant of knowledge or ministrant of joy, yet in all relations
unbound, free and absolute”; in the composite bhāva, the various relations are unified in a “deepest many-sided relation” based on “love
from which all things ﬂow, love passionate, complete, seeking a hundred ways of fulfilment, every means of mutual possession, a million
facets of the joy of union”.
çraddha
craddha ~ see śraddhā.
çravana
cravana ~ see śravan.a.
çruti ~ see śruti.
cruti
çukshma
cukshma ~ see sūks.ma.

.D3 ~ short for tertiary dāsya.
.dahi
dahı̄ [Hindi] ~ curd.
.daihika śakti
sakti (daihik shakti) ~ same as daihikı̄ śakti.
.daihikı̄
daihiki śakti
sakti (daihiki shakti) ~ bodily force; same as dehaśakti.
.dainyam ~ depression; timidity.
.daitya ~ an enemy of the gods (devas), the “opposing or too violently
forward-striving Titan”; any of the sons of Diti, meaning “the division,
the separative consciousness”, who is the mother of the Titans as Aditi
is the mother of the gods.
daiva ~ divine; short for daiva karma.
daiva aiśvaryabh
aisvaryabhava
āva (daiva aishwaryabhava) ~ divine sense of sovereignty.
daivabhāva ~ divine condition.
daivabhava
daiva karma ~ the “religious” part of Sri Aurobindo’s life-work (see
ādeśa), involving the establishment of a new system of Yoga and
imparting it to others.
daivaśakti ~ divine Force.
daivasakti
daivi prakr
daivı̄
prakrti
. ti (daivi prakriti) ~ divine nature, the third member of
the śakti catus.t.aya, also called devı̄bhāva or (at an earlier stage)
Can.d.ı̄bhāva; the divinising of human nature by calling in the divine
Power (śakti) “to replace our limited human energy so that this may be
shaped into the image of and filled with the force of a greater infinite
energy”. In this process, four aspects of the śakti are manifested and
combined: Maheśvarı̄, the śakti of wideness and calm; Mahākālı̄, the
śakti of strength and swiftness; Mahālaks.mı̄, the śakti of beauty, love
and delight; and Mahāsarasvatı̄, the śakti of skill and work.
daivya ~ divine.
daivya ketu ~ divine perception.
daivya tapas ~ the divine power (tapas) “by which the Self dwells
gathered in itself, by which it manifests within itself, by which it
maintains and possesses its manifestation, by which it draws back
from all manifestation into its supreme oneness”.
daks
daksa
. a (daksha) ~ intuitive discernment; same as viveka or discrimination, a faculty of jñāna.
Daks
Daksa
. a (Daksha) ~ the Vedic deity who represents “the discriminating
and distributing Thought of the divine Mind”.
Daks
Daksina
maghonı̄ (Dakshina maghoni) ~ Daks.in.ā (the Vedic goddess
. in.ā maghoni
“whose function is to discern rightly, dispose the action and the offering and distribute in the sacrifice to each godhead its portion”) in her
plenitude; “the discernment in its fullness”. [R.g Veda 2.11.21, etc.]
damyam ~ (on page 83) a misreading of dainyam.


.dana
dāna ~ giving; generosity; an attribute of the vaiśya, who “pours himself out on the world in order to get back what he has given increased
a hundredfold”; an attribute of Pradyumna.
dānagrahan.a ~ accepting gifts.
danagrahana
dānaṁ, vyayah., kauśalaṁ, bhogalipsā (danam, vyayah, kaushalam,
danam,
bhogalipsa) ~ giving, spending, skill, the urge towards enjoyment (the
attributes of the vaiśya).
dānaṁ, vyayah., kauśalaṁ, bhogalipsā, iti vaiśyaśaktih. (danam,
danam,
vyayah, kaushalam, bhogalipsa, iti vaishyashaktih) ~ giving, spending, skill, the urge towards enjoyment: these express the vaiśya
soul-power.
darśana (darshana; darshan) ~ vision; the subtle sense (sūks.ma indarsana
driya) of sight, “a sight that is independent of the physical eye”, one
of the faculties of vis.ayadr.s.t.i, called darśana (as opposed to rūpadr.s.t.i)
especially when it is a vision not of symbolic images but of the actual
forms of supraphysical things; the perception of brahman in all things
and beings: a spiritual seeing by which “the eye gets a new and transfigured vision of things and of the world around us” and “there comes
through the physical sense to the total sense consciousness within and
behind the vision a revelation of the soul of the thing seen and of the
universal spirit that is expressing itself in this objective form of its own
conscious being”; a similar perception of any impersonal or personal
aspect (bhāva) of brahman or ı̄śvara, as in Kr.s.n.adarśana, etc.; (as part
of sāhitya) philosophy.
dāsa ~ (in the Veda) a destructive power, enemy of the ārya.
dasa
daśa-gāvas (dasha-gavas; dashagava) ~ the ten rays; the ten types or
dasa-gavas
forms of consciousness in the evolutionary scale: the paśu, vānara,
piśāca, pramatha, rāks.asa, asura, deva, sādhyadeva (or siddhadeva),
siddhadeva (or siddhāsura) and satyadeva (or siddha purus.a or siddhadeva).
daśagu (dashagu) ~ same as daśa-gāvas.
dasagu
dāsatya ~ a coined term for an active form of dāsya.
dasatya
dāsı̄ ~ literally “slave-girl”; a symbol of the jı̄va or prakr.ti serving the
dasi
ı̄śvara in a relation of dāsya.
dāsı̄bhāva ~ the temperament or attitude of the servant-girl; the subdasibhava
missive relation of the dāsı̄ to the ı̄śvara.
dāsı̄-ı̄śvarı̄ (dasi-ishwari; dasi iswari) ~ slave-girl and queen; she who
dasi-isvari

serves and rules.
.ddasuse
āśus.e mayas (dasushe mayas) ~ bliss for the giver (of the sacrifice).
[R
. g Veda 1.93.1]
.dasya
dāsya (dasya; dasyam) ~ service, “a service of God in the world of which the controlling power is the Divinity within us in whom we are one self with the universe and its creatures”; submission, surrender, “a surrender and submission to That which is beyond us enabling the full and free working of its Power”; the relation (bhāva) between the jı̄va (or prakr.ti) and the ı̄śvara that is compared to that of a servant or slave with his or her master: “a giving up of one’s own will to be the instrument of the Master of works, and this not with the lesser idea of being a servant of God, but, eventually at least, of such a complete renunciation both of the consciousness and the works to him that our being becomes one with his being and the impersonalised nature only an instrument and nothing else”, an attitude that “must lead finally to an absolute union of the personal with the Divine Will and, with the growth of knowledge, bring about a faultless response of the instrument to the divine Power and Knowledge”; an element of Mahāsarasvatı̄ bhāva. 
dāsyabhāva ~ the relation (bhāva) of dāsya, in which one feels oneself dasyabhava to be a servant or slave of the ı̄śvara.
dāsyabuddhi (dasyabuddhi; dasya-buddhi) ~ awareness of dāsya, the dasyabuddhi
sense of surrender or submission to the will of the ı̄śvara.
dāsyalipsā ~ the urge towards service (dāsya); “the desire to serve”, dasyalipsa which “in the perfect man becomes the desire to serve God-in-all”, an attribute of the śūdra: “the abnegation that is ready to bear the yoke of the Master and make the life a free servitude to Him and under his direction to the claim and need of his creatures”.
dāsyam ~ see dāsya.
dasyam
dasya-madhura
āsya-madhura (dasya-madhura; dasya madhura) ~ same as madhura dāsya, the relation (bhāva) of loving servitude of the jı̄va to the
ı̄śvara.
dasyam
āsyaṁ buddhicaturyam
buddhicāturyaṁ karmalipsa
karmalipsā pritih
prı̄tih. ~ service, acuteness of intelligence, the urge to work, gladness (the attributes of Mahāsarasvatı̄).
dāsyatā ~ the state of dāsya.
dasyata
dasya
āsya vaira ~ enmity (vaira) as a form of service (dāsya), enforcing
“with more or less violence the higher in place of the lower aims” of

those whom it serves by opposing their desires.
.dasyu ~ (in the Veda) an enemy, plunderer or destroyer; any of various
powers of darkness and ignorance who oppose the seeker of truth and
immortality.
daurbalyam ~ weakness.
dayā ~ compassion; “oneness, a participating sympathy, a free idendaya
tity, with all energies in all beings and therefore a spontaneous and
fruitful harmony with all the divine will in the universe”, a quality
common to the four aspects of daivı̄ prakr.ti.
dayā ı̄śvarabhāvah. karmasāmarthyam (daya ishwarabhavah kardaya
masamarthyam) ~ compassion, sovereignty, capacity for action (see
next).
dayā ı̄śvarabhāvah. sarvakarmasāmarthyam ~ compassion, soverdaya
eignty, capacity for all action (the attributes common to all four
aspects of daivı̄ prakr.ti).
decisive intuition ~ decisive trikāladr.s.t.i by means of intuition.
decisive seer tapas ~ tapas acting in the full revelatory ideality, the
highest form of seer tapas.
decisive seer trik
trikaladrsti
āladr.s.t.i (trikaldrishti) ~ decisive trikāladr.s.t.i in the
full revelatory ideality.
decisive telepathic trik
trikaladrsti
āladr.s.t.i (trikaldrishti) ~ telepathic trikāladr.s.t.i
combined with decisive trikāladr.s.t.i, seeing the forces at work and the
result that is to emerge.
decisive trik
trikaladrsti
āladr.s.t.i (trikaldrishti) ~ trikāladr.s.t.i with a decisive perception of future eventualities, often identified with non-telepathic
trikāladr.s.t.i.
défaillances [French] ~ failings.
defaillances
deha ~ the body.
dehaśakti (dehashakti; deha-shakti) ~ the power, capacity and right
dehasakti
state of activity of the physical being, one of the four kinds of śakti
forming the second member of the śakti catus.t.aya.
dehasiddhi ~ the perfection of the body, which “has to submit to a
mutation and be no longer the clamorous animal or the impeding
clod it now is, but become instead a conscious servant and radiant
instrument and living form of the spirit”; the siddhi of the śarı̄ra
catus.t.aya.
dehaśuddhi ~ purification of the body.
dehasuddhi

.dehasya ~ of the body.
.demain matin [French] ~ tomorrow morning.
.de nombreux accidents eurent lieu [French] ~ many accidents occurred.
.derivative vvanmaya
āṅmaya ~ same as refulgent vāṅmaya.
.desa
deśa (desha) ~ place.
.deva ~ a god, a divinity; “a dynamic being manifested in Prakriti for the works of the plane to which he belongs”; any of the “cosmic godheads presiding over the action of cosmic principles”, brahman “representing Itself in cosmic Personalities expressive of the one Godhead who, in their impersonal action, appear as the various play of the principles of Nature”; the Divine, the supreme and universal Deity (ı̄śvara, purus.a) “of whom all the gods are different Names and Powers”; the seventh of the ten types of consciousness (daśa-gāvas) in the evolutionary scale: mind concentrated in vijñāna, exceeding itself.
deva Agni ~ the god Agni2; the deva as “a ﬂaming Force of knowledge”.
deva-asura ~ same as devāsura.
devabhāva ~ the presence in the consciousness of the deva, the “one
devabhava
Divine Existence who manifests Himself in many names and forms”,
accomplishing the Vedic work of “the formation of the godhead in its
manifold forms in the human being”.
devāsura ~ a combination of deva and asura; the deva of the asura
devasura
type, who evolves in the tenth manvantara of the sixth pratikalpa.
devatā ~ deity; a being of a higher world; any of the beings of various
devata
planes who act as agents of the ı̄śvara.
devı̄ ~ goddess; the consort of the deva; the śakti of the ı̄śvara in her “outer or executive side” as Nature (prakr.ti); the śakti as the ı̄śvarı̄, “the conscious Power and universal Goddess all-creative from eternity and armed with the Spirit’s omnipotence”.
devı̄bhāva (devibhava; devi-bhava; devi bhava) ~ the devı̄ or divine
devibhava
śakti manifest in the temperament in a combination of her four aspects
(Maheśvarı̄, Mahākālı̄, Mahālaks.mı̄ and Mahāsarasvatı̄), another
term for daivı̄ prakr.ti, gradually replacing the earlier Can.d.ı̄bhāva.
devı̄hāsya (devihasya; devi-hasya; devi hasya; devihasyam) ~ laughter of the Goddess, “the laughter of the Shakti doing luminously the work of the Divine and taking his Ananda in all the worlds”; a union of the four kinds of hāsya proper to the four aspects of devı̄bhāva. .dhairya (dhairya; dhairyam) ~ steadiness, calmness, patience; the temperament of the thinker (dhı̄ra); an attribute of the brāhman.a.
.dhairyam ~ see dhairya.
.dhairyam
dhairyaṁ śuddhatānantyalipsā mahadbhāvah. ~ calmness, purity,
the urge towards infinity, greatness.
.dhama
dhāma ~ seat, domain.
.dhana ~ wealth; gain; (symbolically) spiritual plenitude.
.dhan
dhananam
ānāṁ ssatih
ātih. ~ safety of the gains.
.dharana
dhāran.a ~ holding, containing; short for dhāran.asāmarthya.
.dh
dharananyunata
āran.anyūnatā ~ deficiency of containing power.
.dharanasakti
dhāran.aśakti (dharanashakti) ~ the “faculty of holding”; the body’s
“power to hold whatever force is brought into it by the spirit and
to contain its action without spilling and wasting it or itself getting
cracked”; same as dhāran.asāmarthya.
dh
dharanasamarthya
āran.asāmarthya (dharanasamarthya; dharana-samarthya; dharanasamarthyam; dharana samarthyam) ~ the capacity of the body
to contain “without strain or reaction any working however intense
and constant, of energy however great and puissant”, an element of
dehaśakti.
dh
dharanasamarthyam
āran.asāmarthyam ~ see dhāran.asāmarthya.
dharanashakti ~ see dhāran.aśakti.
dh
dharane
āran.e asamarthya
asāmarthya ~ inability to hold; lack of dhāran.asāmarthya.
dharma ~ law of being; “a fundamental law of our nature which
secretly conditions all our activities”; the law of religious and spiritual
life; the religious or spiritual part of karma.
dharma-karma ~ work of dharma.
dharma-sa
dharma-sankara
ṅkara ~ confusion of functions.
dhāsi ~ foundation. [Etymologically = Greek thēsis]
dhasi
dhātu ~ Sanskrit verbal root.
dhatu
dhı̄ra ~ steady, calm, patient; the calm and wise mind, “the thinker
dhira
who looks upon life steadily and does not allow himself to be disturbed
and blinded by his sensations and emotions”.
dhir m
dhı̄r
manusa
ānus.ā ~ the mental thought [Cf. R
. g Veda 2.2.10]
dhotı̄ [Hindi] ~ loincloth.
dhoti
dhr.ti (dhriti) ~ firmness, fortitude; persistence of the will.
dhrti
dhūma ~ smoke; one of the seven kinds of akashic material.
dhuma

.dhuminah
dhūminah. ~ smoky.
.dhumramaya
dhūmramaya ~ smoky; (rūpa or lipi) composed of or containing
dhūma.
.dhyana
dhyāna ~ concentration.
.Dieu sorti de l’école
l’ecole [French] ~ God who has left school.
.disah
diśah. (dishah) ~ the regions of space.
.discrimination ~ same as viveka, one of the two components of smr.ti,
a faculty of jñāna; on the plane of vijñāna or ideality it “is hardly
recognisable as a separate power, but is constantly inherent in the
three others [intuition, inspiration and revelation] and is their own
determination of the scope and relations of their knowledge”.
discriminative ~ involving the faculty of intuitive discrimination
(viveka); same as vivekamaya.
discriminative revelatory logistic ~ having the nature of revelatory logistis on its lowest scale (intuitive revelatory logistis), with discrimination taken up into the revelation.
discriminative trik
trikaladrsti
āladr.s.t.i (trikaldrishti) ~ same as vivekamaya trikāladr.s.t.i.
dishah ~ see diśah..
div ~ heaven; the plane of pure intelligence.
divah. ~ heavens; levels of mind.
divine gnosis ~ the highest form of gnosis, the “invincible Gnosis of
the Divine”, also called (from 29 October 1927 onwards) supermind
gnosis or supermind, “the secret Wisdom which upholds both our
Knowledge and our Ignorance” and “which creates, governs and upholds the worlds”.
divine h
hasya
āsya ~ same as devı̄hāsya.
divine reason ~ the luminous reason, which “although not of the mental stamp and although an operation of the direct truth and knowledge, . . . is a delegated power for a range of purposes greater in light,
but still to a certain extent analogous to those of the ordinary human
will and reason”.
divine tapas ~ same as daivya tapas.
divya ~ divine.
divya ketu ~ divine perception.
dos.a (dosha) ~ defect.
dosa
dos.ā (dosha) ~ “in the Night”; under the cover of darkness and undosa


consciousness.
.double ddasya
āsya (dasyam) ~ an intermediate form of dāsya, also called
secondary / prakritic dāsya, in which, unlike simple dāsya, “there is
no active & constant freedom, but only a general & ultimate freedom
which is used little”, for “we do not determine what is God’s will and
act thereby or order Prakriti to act thereby, but leave everything to
God to determine; the whole responsibility is His & a given impulse
of Prakriti fulfils itself or not as He chooses without our interference”.
double sam
samadhi
ādhi ~ simultaneous experience of two states of samādhi,
especially svapnasamādhi and jāgrat samādhi, so that one is “aware
in the dream-trance of the outer physical world through the subtle
senses which belong to the subtle body”.
doulos [Greek] ~ slave.
dras.t.ā (drashta) ~ one who sees; seer; one who knows by means of
drasta
revelation (dr.s.t.i); same as dras.t.r..
drasta
dras
ānanda (drashta ananda) ~ same as dras.t.r. ānanda.
. t.ā ananda
drasta
dras
ā
. . logos (drashta logos) [Sanskrit and Greek] ~ a term used in
1920, equivalent to the seer logistis of the previous year; same as
revelatory logistis or full revelatory ideality.
dras.t.ā (drashta) luminous reason ~ same as revelatory logistis.
drasta
drasta
dras
sakti (drashta shakti) ~ śakti illumined by dr.s.t.i.
. t.ā śakti
dras.t.r. (drashtri; drastri) ~ that which sees; knowing by means of
drastr
revelation (dr.s.t.i); belonging to the seer ideality or seer / revelatory
logistis.
drastr
dras
ānanda (drashtri ananda; drastri ananda) ~ ānanda experi. t.r. ananda
enced in the revelatory logistis.
dras.t.r. (drashtri) logistis; dras.t.r. reason ~ same as seer / revelatory lodrastr
gistis.
drastr
dras
. t.r. tapas (drashtri tapas) ~ tapas acting in the revelatory logistis;
same as seer tapas.
drastr
dras
ñana
āna (drashtri vijnana) ~ same as seer ideality, usually in the
. t.r. vijñsense of seer / revelatory logistis.
dravyajññana
āna ~ knowledge of matter; physical science.
drishta ~ see dr.s.t.a.
drishti ~ see dr.s.t.i.
drishtimaya ~ see dr.s.t.imaya.
drishya ~ see dr.śya.

.drishyarupa ~ see dr.śyarūpa.
.dristi ~ see dr.s.t.i.
.drisya ~ see dr.śya.
.drsta
dr.s.t.a (drishta) ~ thing seen (in samādhi).
.drsti
dr.s.t.i (drishti; dristi) ~ vision; subtle sight, including rūpadr.s.t.i and sometimes lipidr.s.t.i; subtle sense-perception (vis.ayadr.s.t.i) in general; trikāladr.s.t.i, the knowledge of the past, present and future; perception of brahman or ı̄śvara in things and beings (same as darśana); revelation, the truth-seeing faculty of jñāna whose nature is “a direct inner seizing or a penetrating and enveloping luminous contact of the spiritual consciousness with its object”. In the last sense, dr.s.t.i is the essence of the seer ideality and present in all forms of logistic ideality with a revelatory element; in 1920 it often means revelatory logistis or full revelatory ideality.
dr.s.t.i (drsti, drishti) intuition ~ same as revelatory intuition.
dr.s.t.imaya (drstimaya, drishtimaya) ~ having the nature of dr.s.t.i; revelatory.
dr.śya (drsya, drishya; drisya) ~ visible object, “thing seen”; scene or object seen in samādhi; subtle sight (darśana), especially vision of actual forms belonging to subtle worlds.
dr.śyarūpa (drishyarupa) ~ same as rūpadr.śya.
drsyarupa
duh.kha (duhkha; duhkham) ~ unhappiness, suffering, grief.
duhkha
duh.kha-bhoga ~ feeling of unhappiness.
duhkha-bhoga
duh.kham ~ see duh.kha.
duhkham
dūn.āśa (dunasha) ~ “oppressed in hope” (in Sri Aurobindo’s interpretation of R.g Veda 1.176.4).
dūre ~ far; from a distance.
dure
Durgā-Kālı̄ ~ the Goddess (devı̄), combining two of her forceful personalities as Durgā, “the conquering and protecting aspect of the Universal Mother” and as Kālı̄.
dūta ~ messenger.
duta
dvaita (dwaita) ~ duality.
dvaitabhāva (dwaitabhava) ~ sense of duality.
dvaitabhava
dvandva (dwandwa) ~ duality; any of the pairs of opposites that “are
the positive and negative terms in which the ego soul of the lower
nature enjoys the universe”, freedom from which is part of the mukti
or liberation of the nature, also applied to pairs of related terms that are
not opposites, such as hunger and thirst; the “discordant and divided


experience” that consists of “an oscillation between or a mixture of
constant pairs of contraries”, due to “an ignorance which is unable to
seize on the spiritual truth of things and concentrates on the imperfect
appearances, but meets them not with a mastery of their inner truth,
but with a strife and a shifting balance of attraction and repulsion,
capacity and incapacity, liking and disliking, pleasure and pain, joy
and sorrow, acceptance and repugnance”.
dvandva rragadvesa
āgadves.a (dwandwa ragadwesha) ~ attraction and repulsion with regard to the dualities of experience.
dvāpara (dwapara) ~ the third age in a caturyuga, whose master-spirit
dvapara
is the vaiśya; a period of the world in which the harmony created in the
satyayuga and upheld by force of will in the tretā breaks down further
and “has to be maintained at every step by a careful & laborious
regulation”.
dvaya (dwaya) ~ duality.
dvayāvin (dwayavin) ~ “dualiser”; a type of hostile being in the Veda.
dvayavin
dves.a (dwesha) ~ disliking, repulsion.
dvesa
Dvita (Dwita) ~ (literally “second or double”) the purus.a of the vital
or dynamic consciousness, the “second soul” or Life-soul between
Eka2 and Trita: “the god or Rishi of the second plane of the human
ascent”, which “is that of the Life-Force, the plane of fulfilled force,
desire, free range of the vital powers which are no longer limited by
the strict limitations of this mould of Matter”.
dynamic ~ same as tapomaya; (in 1919) having the nature of dynamic
gnosis or pragmatic ideality, which gives “the tapas of the future, the
will at work now and hereafter for effectuation”.
dynamic gnosis ~ same as pragmatic ideality.
dynamic highest gnostic tapas ~ same as dynamic seer tapas.
dynamic inspirational revelation ~ the dynamic gnosis or pragmatic
ideality raised to the inspired revelatory logistis.
dynamic logistis ~ same as pragmatic ideality.
dynamic seer tapas ~ tapas acting in the dynamic inspirational revelation, the middle form of seer tapas.
dynamic seer trik
trikaladrsti
āladr.s.t.i (trikaldrishti) ~ trikāladr.s.t.i in the dynamic
inspirational revelation.
dyumna ~ luminous power.

.ebhih. stomebhih. ~ by these hymns of affirmation. [R.g Veda 7.62.2]
.effective ~ (vāk) having the qualities of the second level of style,
more dynamic and powerfully expressive than the adequate style and
characterised by “aptness and vividness and richness and beauty of
phrase”.
effective-adequate ~ (vāk) combining the qualities of the two lowest
levels of style.
effective half (of the fifth catus.t.aya) ~ karma and kāma1, the third
and fourth members of the karma catus.t.aya.
effective illuminative ~ (vāk) combining the qualities of the second
and third levels of style.
effective telepathy; effective vy
vyapti
āpti ~ same as communicative vyāpti.
efﬂeure seulement pendant le quart d’un second [French] ~ touches
lightly for just a quarter of a second.
effulgent vvanmaya
āṅmaya ~ the movement of vāṅmaya thought in which the
thought comes “as speech self-born out of the truth and complete in
its own right and carrying in itself its own vision and knowledge”.
egoistic d
dasya
āsya ~ same as primary / simple dāsya, also called personal
dāsya, the form of dāsya in which “between the various impulses
of Prakriti, we have the sense of choosing, of an active & constant
freedom, & although we choose what we understand to be God’s will,
it is still our choice that determines the action in the adhara & not His
direct and imperative Will”.
eisidein [Greek] ~ to look at, see, perceive.
eka1 (eka; ekam) ~ one; the One, the sole Reality, brahman or saccidānanda, seen “as one Existence, Being gathered in itself and Being displayed in all existences; as one Consciousness concentrated in the unity of its existence, extended in universal nature and many-centred in innumerable beings; one Force static in its repose of self-gathered consciousness and dynamic in its activity of extended consciousness; one Delight blissfully aware of its featureless infinity and blissfully aware of all feature and force and forms as itself”.
Eka2 ~ (literally “one or single”, taken by Sri Aurobindo to be a name of the sage called in ancient legend Ekata, the brother of Dvita and Trita) the purus.a of the material consciousness.

.eka anandamaya
ānandamaya purus
purusa
. a (eka anandamaya purusha) ~ the one allblissful Spirit.
.ekadanti
ekadantı̄ ~ having one tusk.
.ekam ~ see eka1.
.ekaṁ brahma ~ the one Reality; brahman as the One (eka1), realised as “Being one in itself”, but also as “one everywhere, in all its poises and in every aspect, in its utmost appearance of multiplicity as in its utmost appearance of oneness”.
ekam evadvitiyam
evādvitı̄yam (ekam evadwitiyam) ~ One without a second.
[Chāndogya Upanis.ad 2.6.1]
ekas tisthati
tis.t.hati viras
vı̄ras tisthati
tis.t.hati ~ he stands alone, he stands as a hero.
ekatvadr.s.t.i (ekatwadrishti) ~ vision of unity; the perception of a “oneness unaffected by any multitudinousness of objects and details”, a vision in which “the identity of the Eternal, the unity of the Brahman” is apparent “not only to the subtler consciousness but to the mere sense, to the illumined physical sight itself”.
ekhani paris
pariskar
. kār korbbo? [Bengali] ~ shall I clean it right now?
electric ānanda
ananda ~ same as vaidyutānanda.
elementary utth
utthapana
āpanā ~ same as primary utthāpanā.
éloignement [French] ~ withdrawal.
eloignement
en depit
dépit de l’opposition le surhomme se dépeint dans l’homme actuel
[French] ~ in spite of the opposition, the superman outlines himself in
present-day man.
engus [Greek] ~ near.
enimvero [Latin] ~ certainly, indeed.
enisus [Latin] ~ strenuous, earnest.
eniteo [Latin] ~ to shine forth, become bright, be eminent.
enitesco [Latin] ~ same as eniteo.
enitor [Latin] ~ to climb, make an effort, struggle.
enixe [Latin] ~ strenuously, earnestly.
enixus [Latin] ~ strenuous, earnest.
eno [Latin] ~ to swim away, swim across.
enodate [Latin] ~ clearly, plainly.
enodatio [Latin] ~ untying; explanation.
en préparation
preparation [French] ~ in preparation.
episkherō [Greek] ~ successively, in order, thence, afterwards.
episkhero
es
esa
jāgarti suptesu
suptes.u (esha jagarti supteshu) ~ this wakes in those who
. a jagarti


sleep. [Cf. Kat.ha Upanis.ad 2.2.8]
.espion [French] ~ spy.
.essential mukti ~ the liberation of the spirit, the “freedom of the soul”
which is “an opening out of mortal limitation into the illimitable
immortality of the Spirit”.
etad vai tat ~ this is That. [Kat.ha Upanis.ad 2.1.3, etc.]
etat ~ this (being or world).
éveil [French] ~ awakening.
eveil
.ﬂottement [French] ~ ﬂoating, wavering.
.fonder l’enseignement morale [French] ~ to found the moral teaching.
.formative mmaya
āyā ~ (c. 1931, in the diagram on page 1360) overmind
in its fundamental power of measuring and limiting consciousness
(māyā), regarded as the essential form of overmind proper (see overmind system); “the original cosmic Maya, not a Maya of Ignorance
but a Maya of Knowledge, yet a Power which has made the Ignorance
possible, even inevitable”.
Four, the ~ same as the fourfold ı̄śvara; the four Vedic gods (Varun.a,
Four
Mitra, Aryaman and Bhaga) who “build up the whole divine state
into its perfection by the natural interaction of its four essential elements”, the four gods representing respectively “the all-pervading
purity” of sat (Varun.a), “the all-uniting light” of cit (Mitra), “the
movement and all-discerning force” of tapas (Aryaman) and “the allembracing joy” of ānanda (Bhaga), thus being “practically the later
essential trinity of Sachchidananda, ~ Existence, Consciousness, Bliss
with self-awareness and self-force, Chit and Tapas, for double terms
of Consciousness”.
fourfold brahman ~ the omnipresent Reality, brahman, “seen everywhere in the whole & in each object” in the four aspects that constitute
the brahma catus.t.aya; sarvaṁ brahma is seen “when we realise one
thing in the universe”, anantaṁ brahma “when we realise Infinite
Force and Quality at play in all forms”, jñānaṁ brahma “when
we realise a consciousness in everything which is aware of all”, and
ānandaṁ brahma “when we realise in that consciousness a delight in
all things”.

.fourfold isvara
ı̄śvara (ishwara) ~ the ı̄śvara in his four personalities, usually
referred to in the Record of Yoga as Mahāvı̄ra, Balarāma, Pradyumna
and Aniruddha, to whom correspond the four aspects of his śakti and
the four psychological types of the cāturvarn.ya; each of these personalities is not a separate deity, but an aspect of the ı̄śvara or Kr.s.n.a, “Four
who are One, One who is Four”, often combined with one or more
of the other three aspects. Sri Aurobindo adapted the Vaishnava tradition of the caturvyūha (fourfold manifestation of the purus.ottama) in
giving to the four aspects names associated with Kr.s.n.a as an avatāra.
Mahāvı̄ra (“the great hero”) designates Śrı̄kr.s.n.a himself, Balarāma was his elder brother, Pradyumna his son and Aniruddha his grandson; they figure together in the legend of Us.ā and Aniruddha told in the Bhāgavata Purān.a. Other names that are sometimes used in the Record of Yoga for these aspects of the ı̄śvara are Maheśvara or Śiva for the first aspect (Mahāvı̄ra), Rudra2 for the second (Balarāma) and Vis.n.u
for the third (Pradyumna).
full dras
drasta
. t.ā (drashta) luminous reason ~ a term used in 1920, equivalent to the highest seer logistis of the previous year; same as full
revelatory ideality.
full logistic revelation ~ same as full revelatory ideality.
full revelation ~ same as full revelatory ideality.
full revelatory ~ having the nature of the highest scale of revelatory
logistis, on its own plane as full revelatory ideality or acting in the
mentality to form the highest revelatory mentality.
full revelatory gnosis ~ same as full revelatory ideality.
full revelatory ideality ~ the highest scale of revelatory logistis, also
called the full dras.t.ā luminous reason, whose three forms are described
as (1) “revelation with interpretation but the front representative”,
(2) “the front interpretative with intuition involved in the drishti”,
and (3) “the whole drishti with the two other powers taken into the
drishti”; these three forms are also referred to as the representative,
interpretative and imperative elements of representative vijñāna in the
higher sense (highest representative ideality or logos vijñāna).
future trik
trikaladrsti
āladr.s.t.i (trikaldrishti) ~ “the prophetic knowledge of the
future”, the kind of time-vision most often meant in the Record of
Yoga by trikāladr.s.t.i.

.gâchis [French] ~ mess.
.ggadha-supta
ād.ha-supta svapna (gadha-supta swapna) ~ svapnasamādhi in profound sleep; the deepest sus.upta-svapna.
.gana
gan.a ~ group; (in the Indian tradition) a group of attendants, especially the demigods attending on Śiva; (in the Record of Yoga) devatās
acting as agents of the ı̄śvara.
gan.aloka ~ the world of the gan.as.
ganaloka
gandha ~ scent, smell; a non-material (sūks.ma) odour; the sūks.ma
vis.aya of subtle smell; (short for gandhadr.s.t.i) the subtle sense of smell.
gandhadr.s.t.i (gandhadrishti) ~ the perception of odours imperceptible
gandhadrsti
to the ordinary physical sense; a subtle sense (sūks.ma indriya), “the
essential inhalation grossly represented in physical substance by the
sense of smell”, one of the faculties of vis.ayadr.s.t.i.
gandharasa (gandharasa; gandha-rasa) ~ the (subtle) taste of things
smelt, a form of rasadr.s.t.i.
gandharva (gandharva; gundharva) ~ a kind of supernatural being,
traditionally a celestial musician, belonging to a world of beauty and
enjoyment; in the evolutionary scale, a sub-type of the deva type, imparting grace and refinement to lower types with which it is combined.
gandharva-paśu
gandharva-pasu (gandharva-pashu; gandharva pashu) ~ a combination of the gandharva and paśu, forming a kind of paśu deva or
divinised paśu, which evolves in the asura type in the first manvantara
of the sixth pratikalpa.
gāndharvı̄ ~ female gandharva; Kālı̄ manifested in the gandharva
gandharvi
type.
garimā ~ heaviness; “the power of increasing the size and weight of
garima
the body”, a physical siddhi related to or included in mahimā; a sense
of heaviness due to a defect of the physical siddhis.
Gaurı̄ ~ the goddess Pārvatı̄, consort of Śiva, identified with MaheGauri
śvarı̄.
gāvas ~ rays; forms of consciousness; see daśa-gāvas.
gavas
ge
gē [Greek] ~ earth; “territoriality”; the physical nature.
general catus
catustayas
. t.ayas ~ the last three of the seven parts of the sapta
catus.t.aya, namely the karma catus.t.aya, brahma catus.t.aya and siddhi
catus.t.aya, which when combined constitute “an ideal action of the

Divine through our perfected being in the largeness of the Brahmic
unity”.
general formula ~ either of two lists of four terms, each formula being
related to one of the first two members of the śakti catus.t.aya and consisting of attributes that are to be common (sāmānya) to all elements
of that member of the catus.t.aya. The first general formula, tejo balaṁ
pravr.ttir mahattvam, is related to vı̄rya; the second general formula,
adı̄natā ks.ipratā sthairyam ı̄śvarabhāvah., is related to śakti.
geōrgos [Greek] ~ tiller of the soil, farmer.
georgos
geruyā [Bengali] ~ cloth dyed with red ochre, worn by sannyāsı̄s.
geruya
ghana ~ deep; (referring to rūpa) dense; a dense mass.
ghana caitanya (ghana chaitanya) ~ dense consciousness.
ghana rupa
rūpa ~ dense image, “consisting of material developed into
substance of consistency”.
ghat.anā ~ happening, event, incident.
ghatana
ghrān.a ~ the sense of smell; same as gandhadr.s.t.i.
ghrana
ghr.n.ā (ghrina) ~ pity; repulsion, disgust.
ghrna
ghr.tam (ghritam) ~ clarified butter (ghee), Vedic symbol of “a rich
ghrtam
and bright mental activity”.
gnāh. ~ (in the Veda) the female powers who are “the energies of
gnah
Nature”.
gnana ~ see jñāna.
gnanam brahma ~ see jñānaṁ brahma.
gnōrisis [Greek] ~ acquaintance, intimate knowledge; “spontaneous
gnorisis
judgment”, a quality of the intuitional ideality.
gnosis ~ “a power above mind working in its own law, out of the direct identity of the supreme Self”, a faculty superior to buddhi or intellect, possessing not only the “concentrated consciousness of the infinite Essence”, but “also and at the same time an infinite knowledge of the myriad play of the Infinite”; (in 1919-20) the supra-intellectual consciousness (also called ideality or vijñāna) with its three planes of logistic, hermetic and seer gnosis, each successive level being more “intense and large in light, imperative, instantaneous, the scope of the active knowledge larger, the way nearer to the knowledge by identity, the thought more packed with the luminous substance of self-awareness and all-vision”; (in most of 1927 before 29 October) a plane of consciousness usually referred to as above the supreme supermind and descending into it to form supreme supermind gnosis, also rising to the “invincible Gnosis of the Divine”; (in April 1927) a term encompassing three degrees of supramental gnosis (corresponding to planes later redefined as parts of the overmind system) and a fourth degree of divine gnosis; (from 29 October 1927 onwards) equivalent to “divine gnosis”, a grade of consciousness above overmind (but sometimes distinguished from supermind, which occupies a similar position) and descending into it to form gnostic overmind or gnosis in overmind.
gnosis in overmind ~ (in late 1927 or 1928) the highest plane in the series of planes at the summit of the overmind system later called overmind gnosis, where overmind borders on supermind or divine gnosis.
gnostic ~ (in 1919) same as vijñānamaya or ideal; (c. 1927-28) having the nature of gnosis, in various senses according to the date; sometimes regarded as higher than supramental.
gnostic intuition ~ (in 1919) same as ideal intuition; (in April 1927)
intuition as the first degree of supramental gnosis, probably corresponding to the later intuitive overmind.
gnosticised supreme supermind ~ same as supreme supermind gnosis
or the later supramentalised overmind.
gnostic overmind ~ (in late 1927 or 1928) the highest series of planes
in the overmind system, where overmind is filled with divine gnosis;
one of the higher planes in this series.
gnostic supermind ~ (in April 1927) the highest degree of supramental gnosis; it corresponds apparently to gnosis (above the supreme supermind) in the terminology of January 1927 and gnostic overmind (in the sense of the later overmind gnosis) in the terminology adopted by the end of 1927.
gnostic T ~ (in January 1927) same as T (which is evidently possible
only in the unitary consciousness of the gnosis), a fusion of the elements
of T3 and T2 into a faculty which “when it acts . . . is of the nature of
omniscience and omnipotence”.
gnostic T2 ~ (in early 1927) T2 in the gnosis above or in the supreme
supermind.
gnostic tapas ~ (in 1919) same as ideal tapas.
gnostic thought ~ (in 1919) same as ideal thought; (in early 1927)
thought in the gnosis above or in the supreme supermind.

.goagram asvapesasam
aśvapeśasam (goagram aswapeshasam) ~ in whose front is
the cow (symbol of Light) and whose form is the horse (symbol of vital
energy). [R
. g Veda 2.1.16]
goloka ~ the Vaishnava heaven of eternal beauty and bliss.
gr.ha (griha) ~ house (a symbol of the body).
grha
gun.a ~ quality, property, feature; any of “the numberless and infinite
guna
qualities” (anantagun.a) of the sagun.a brahman “into which all the
cosmic action can be resolved”; the quality which the ı̄śvara “perceives
in each different object of experience (vishaya) and for the enjoyment
of which He creates it in the lila”; any of the three modes (trigun.a)
of the energy of the lower Nature (aparā prakr.ti), called sattva, rajas
and tamas, which in the transition to the higher Nature (parā prakr.ti)
are transformed into pure prakāśa, tapas (or pravr.tti) and śama.
gundharva ~ see gandharva.
gun.ı̄ ~ possessor of qualities; same as sagun.a.
guni
guru ~ spiritual guide; “the secret and universal Teacher who is seated
in the hearts of all”.
guru-sakhā ~ the ı̄śvara as teacher and friend, combining his guruguru-sakha
śiśya and sakhya relations with the jı̄va.
guru-śiśya (guru-shishya) ~ the teacher-disciple relation (bhāva), in
guru-sisya
which the ı̄śvara is perceived as “the teacher and guide” who “leads
us to knowledge; at every step of the developing inner light and vision,
we feel his touch like that of the artist moulding our clay of mind, his
voice revealing the truth and its word”, until there is “a transformation
of our mentality into his and more and more he becomes the thinker
and seer in us”.
.habitual mind ~ the lowest form of the thinking mind (buddhi), consisting of an “undercurrent of mechanically recurrent thought” and a
movement that reduces “all new experience . . . to formulas of habitual
thinking”.
hāṁd.ı̄ (handi) [Bengali, Hindi] ~ pot.
hamdi
haṁsa (hansa) ~ the goose or swan, “a symbol of the soul on the
hamsa
higher plane”.
hars.a (harsha) ~ joy.
harsa
.hasya
hāsya (hasya; hasyam) ~ literally “laughter”; “a clear joy and laughter of the soul embracing life and existence”, a stronger form of
ātmaprasāda, the last member of the samatā / śānti catus.t.aya; sometimes equivalent to devı̄hāsya.
hāsyam ~ see hāsya.
hasyam
hasyamaya
āsyamaya ānanda
ananda ~ delight full of laughter; (sama) ānanda full of
hāsya.
hāsyasiddhi ~ the perfection of hāsya; hāsya as an element in the
hasyasiddhi
siddhi of the samatā catus.t.aya.
hat.ha ~ coercive force; obstinacy, an attribute of Vali or Bali2.
hatha
hat.hayoga ~ a strenuous psycho-physical system of yoga whose chief
hathayoga
processes are āsana and prān.āyāma.
hat.ha-yogin ~ one who practises hat.hayoga.
hatha-yogin
hébété [French] ~ dazed.
hebete
hermēneusis [Greek] ~ interpretation; “inspired interpretation”, the
hermeneusis
distinguishing feature of the hermetic ideality and interpretative revelatory vijñāna.
hermeneutic ~ having the nature of hermēneusis; interpretative.
hermesis ~ same as hermetic ideality.
hermetic ~ closed, sealed, esoteric; relating to hermetic ideality on its
own plane or in a modified form as an element of some of the highest
levels of logistic ideality.
hermetic gnosis ~ same as hermetic ideality.
hermetic ideality ~ (in 1919) the second of the three planes of ideality, the plane whose essence is śruti (inspiration), later called śrauta
vijñāna. Whereas the logistic ideality “remembers at a second remove
the knowledge secret in the being but lost by the mind in the oblivion
of the ignorance”, the hermetic ideality “divines at a first remove a
greater power of that knowledge”. The first “resembles the reason, is
a divine reason”, the second is said to be of the nature of “inspired
interpretation”.
hermetic logistic ideality ~ (in 1919) a high level of logistic ideality suffused by the light of the hermetic ideality; perhaps the same as the later interpretative revelatory vijñāna.
hermetic logistis ~ same as hermetic logistic ideality.
hermetic vijññāna ~ same as hermetic ideality.
hermetised logistis ~ same as hermetic logistic ideality.
hetu ~ cause; an object or external stimulus (usually a touch) associated with the experience of sahaituka ānanda.
higher mind ~ (c. 1931, in the diagram on page 1360) a plane of consciousness with three levels: “liberated intelligence”, “intuitive [higher mind]” and “illumined [higher mind]” (in ascending order). The first level may correspond to vijñānabuddhi in the earlier terminology of the Record of Yoga. The “intuitive” and “illumined” levels may be what Sri Aurobindo soon after making the diagram began to refer to as “higher mind” (defined as “a luminous thought-mind, a mind of spiritborn conceptual knowledge”) and “illumined mind” (characterised by “an intense lustre, a splendour and illumination of the spirit”); cf. logistic ideality (also called luminous reason) and hermetic ideality or śrauta vijñāna (distinguished by “a diviner splendour of light and blaze of fiery effulgence”) in the terminology of 1919-20.
higher revelatory ~ (in 1920) same as full revelatory.
higher trik
trikaladrsti
āladr.s.t.i (trikaldrishti) ~ same as non-telepathic trikāladr.s.t.i.
highest dras
drasta
. t.ā logos (drashta logos) ~ same as full revelatory ideality
or its highest form.
highest dras
drastr
. t.r. tapas (drashtri tapas) ~ same as decisive seer tapas.
highest gnosis ~ same as highest ideality.
highest gnostic tapas ~ same as revelatory / seer tapas.
highest ideality ~ same as revelatory logistis (the highest level of logistic ideality) or seer ideality (the highest of the three planes of ideality).
highest inspired revelatory ideal reason ~ same as highest inspired revelatory gnosis.
highest inspired revelatory gnosis ~ the highest of the three forms of
inspired revelatory logistis.
highest logistic gnosis; highest logistic ideality; highest logistic vijñāna;
highest logistis ~ same as revelatory logistis or full revelatory ideality.
highest mind ~ (c. 1931, in the diagram on page 1360) the plane of
intuitive consciousness below overmind, possibly corresponding to seer
ideality in entries of 1919.
highest representative ideality ~ in October 1920, equivalent to logos
vijñāna in the sense of full revelatory ideality; also called representative vijñāna, which is said to have three elements: representative,
interpretative and imperative. The meaning of “representative” earlier

in 1920, when it referred to the highest intuitive revelatory logistis, was
preserved at this time in the definition of logos reason as the “lower
representative idea”.
highest revelation; highest revelatory gnosis ~ same as full revelatory
ideality.
highest revelatory tapas ~ tapas acting in the full revelatory ideality;
same as decisive seer tapas.
hiran
hiranmaya
patra
ātra ~ golden lid. [Īśā Upanis.ad 15]
. maya p
hiran.ya ~ short for hiran.yagarbha.
hiranya
hiran.yagarbha ~ “the Golden Embryo of life and form”, brahman
hiranyagarbha
manifest in the second of the three states symbolised by the letters of
AUM as “the Spirit in the inner planes”; the Self (ātman) supporting the
dream state (svapna) or subtle (sūks.ma) consciousness, “the Dreamself which is the continent of all subtle, subjective or supraphysical
experience”.
Hiran
Hiranyakasipu
. yakaśipu (Hiranyakashipu) ~ a daitya or Titan who persecuted
his son Prahlāda for his devotion to Vis.n.u and was destroyed by Vis.n.u
as Narasiṁha; regarded as an example of the asura rāks.asa “in which
the intellectual ego & the emotional, sensational ego enter into an
equal copartnership for the grand enthronement & fulfilment of the
human ahankara”.
historical trik
trikaladrsti
āladr.s.t.i ~ a form of trikāladr.s.t.i of the past.
hotra
hotr
ā avı̄t
avitah
āh. ~ unmanifested energies of the sacrifice. [R
. g Veda 4.48.1]
hr.daya (hridaya) ~ heart.
hrdaya
hvara ~ crooked.

.ideal ~ having the nature of ideality; same as vijñānamaya.
.ideal ideality ~ true ideality (vijñāna), distinguished from intellectual
ideality as well as ideal intellectuality.
.ideal intellectuality ~ same as intuitive mind or a form of it.
.ideal intuition ~ intuition in the ideality or vijñāna, in contrast to
mental intuition.
.idealised ~ brought under the control or inﬂuence of ideality; rendered
“perfectly & spontaneously true & luminous”.
.idealised intellectuality ~ same as idealised mentality.

.idealised mmanasa
ānasa ~ same as idealised mental.
.idealised mental ~ having the nature of idealised mentality.
.idealised mentality ~ same as intuitive mind, a faculty created by the
action of the ideality in the intellectual mentality.
.idealised mind ~ same as idealised mentality.
.ideality ~ the supra-intellectual faculty (vijñāna) with its powers of
smr.ti (consisting of intuition and discrimination), śruti (or inspiration)
and dr.s.t.i (or revelation), usually distinguished from (but sometimes
including) vijñānabuddhi or intuitive mind. The plane of ideality or
vijñāna generally referred to in the early period of the Record of Yoga
appears to be what in 1918 was designated primary / inferior ideality,
above which Sri Aurobindo then distinguished a secondary / superior
ideality. In 1919, the lower plane came to be called logistic ideality in a
scheme of three planes, of which the higher two were termed hermetic
ideality (later śrauta vijñāna) and seer ideality. Up to 1920, “ideality”
by itself continued to refer mainly to the first of these planes.
ideality II ~ same as superior ideality.
ideal logistis ~ same as logistic ideality.
ideal mind ~ same as ideality.
ideal reason ~ same as luminous reason (logistic ideality).
ideal śraddh
sraddha
ā ~ supra-intellectual (vijñānamaya) faith.
ideal supermind ~ see triple ideal supermind.
ideal tapas ~ tapas in the ideality, “working by the swabhava” (essential nature of things), same as vijñānamaya tapas.
ideal thought ~ thought elevated to the plane of ideality; same as
vijñānamaya thought, especially in the form of perceptive thought.
ideal trik
trikaladrsti
āladr.s.t.i (trikaldrishti) ~ trikāladr.s.t.i in the ideality.
ideal truth tapas ~ tapas acting in the revelatory logistis.
ideation ~ same as perceptive thought.
iha ~ here; in this world.
ihabhāva ~ literally “here-ness”; present association.
ihabhava
ihalokadr.s.t.i (ihalokadrishti) ~ vision of this world by means other
ihalokadrsti
than the physical senses, a form of lokadr.s.t.i; it includes the knowledge,
by direct perception or through symbolic images, of “things concealed
from the limited receptivity or beyond the range of the physical organs,
distant forms, scenes and happenings, things that have passed out of
physical existence or that are not yet in physical existence”.

.ilaspade
il.aspade ~ “in the seat of revelation”.
.illuminative ~ (vāk) having the qualities of the third level of style,
which gives “the pure untranslated language of intuitive vision” full of
“a greater illumination in which the inner mind sees and feels object,
emotion, idea not only clearly or richly or distinctly and powerfully,
but in a ﬂash or outbreak of transforming light which kindles the
thought or image into a disclosure of new significances of a much
more inner character, a more profoundly revealing vision, emotion,
spiritual response”.
illumined higher mind ~ (c. 1931, in the diagram on page 1360) the
third (“illumined”) level of higher mind, perhaps corresponding to
hermetic ideality or śrauta vijñāna in the terminology of 1919-20.
imperative ~ (in 1920) being of the nature of a “revealingly imperative
power of the spirit’s knowledge by identity”, the element in the logos
vijñāna or highest representative ideality (see full revelatory ideality)
that deals with “the imperatives of the infinite”, connected with revelation in much the same way as representative with intuition and
interpretative with inspiration, and evidently entering into the logistic
ideality from a higher plane of imperative vijñāna; (in early 1927)
a plane related to, but higher than, the imperative vijñāna of 1920,
apparently occupying a position between the supreme supramental and
the supreme supermind, for one of its forms “acts as an intermediary
force, lifting the former into the latter”. The forms of “the imperative”
in 1927 are perhaps the “intuitive forms” which by January of that
year had been arranged “in the gnosis”, making them part of what at
the end of October is called the overmind system.
imperative vijññana
āna ~ a term used in the last dated entry of 1920 for
a plane of consciousness whose arrangement “on the lower levels of
the ideal thought-powers” had then begun; in view of evidence for the
connection of the term imperative with revelation or dr.s.t.i, imperative
vijñāna is perhaps the same as the earlier seer ideality, whose “deputed
power” in the logistic ideality was mentioned in 1919.
in ambulando [Latin] ~ while walking.
independent T2 ~ same as original T2.
Indo vr
vrsa
.g
. s.ā (Indo vrisha) ~ O Indu (Soma ), strong and abundant. [R
Veda 1.176.1]
Indra ~ “the Puissant”, a Vedic god, lord of svar, the luminous world;

the deva as “the master of mental force”. As Agni2 “is one pole of Force
instinct with knowledge that sends its current upward from earth to
heaven, so Indra is the other pole of Light instinct with force which
descends from heaven to earth”; he “comes down into our world as
the Hero” and “slays darkness and division with his lightnings, pours
down the life-giving heavenly waters [svarvatı̄r apah.], finds in the trace
of the hound, Intuition [Saramā], the lost or hidden illuminations,
makes the Sun of Truth [sūrya1] mount high in the heaven of our
mentality”.
Indrabhāva ~ the self-manifestation of the deva as Indra, “the Power
Indrabhava
of pure Intelligence”, forming part of devabhāva.
Indra brhat
br.hat ~ Indra, the vast.
indriya (indriya; indriyam) ~ sense-organ, especially any of “the five
perceptive senses of hearing, touch, sight, taste and smell, which make
the five properties of things their respective objects” (see vis.aya);
the sense-faculty in general, “fundamentally not the action of certain physical organs, but the contact of consciousness with its objects” (saṁjñāna). Each of the physical senses has two elements, “the
physical-nervous impression of the object and the mental-nervous
value we give to it”; the mind (manas) is sometimes regarded as a
“sixth sense”, though “in fact it is the only true sense organ and the rest
are no more than its outer conveniences and secondary instruments”.
indriyaindriya-ananda
ānanda (indriya-ananda; indriya ananda) ~ sense-delight; the
ānanda of the indriyas in general or of any particular indriya, “a beatitude of the senses perceiving and meeting the One [eka1] everywhere,
perceiving as their normal aesthesis of things a universal beauty [sarvasaundarya] and a secret harmony of creation”; the sahaituka form
of vis.ayānanda.
indriya bhukti ~ liberated sensory enjoyment.
indriyam ~ see indriya.
indriya-nir
indriya-nirananda
ānanda ~ the opposite of indriya-ānanda; sensational discomfort.
indriya rasa ~ rasa of the senses.
Indu ~ same as Soma2.
inevitable ~ (vāk) having the qualities of the highest level of style,
which brings the “absolute and revealing word”, either in the pure
inevitable form or as a “magical transformation” of a lesser style

“raised to inevitability” in its own line.
.in extremis [Latin] ~ in desperate circumstances; at the point of death.
.inferior ideality ~ a term used mainly in May-June 1918 for the lower
plane of ideality, that which “takes up the whole intellectual action
and transforms it into vijnana”; cf. the logistic ideality of 1919-20.
inferior seer logistis ~ the lowest form of seer logistis; perhaps the
same as intuitive revelatory logistis.
iṅgita ~ gesture.
ingita
in motu [Latin] ~ in motion.
inspiration ~ same as śruti, truth-hearing, the faculty of jñāna which
“comes as a vibration which carries the Truth in it and sometimes it
comes as the actual word”; also, an instance of the working of this
faculty; sometimes equivalent to inspired logistis, the middle plane of
logistic ideality; (of vāk) the characteristic of the fourth level of style
(see inspired).
inspirational ~ having the nature of inspiration; same as inspired.
inspirational gnosis ~ same as inspired logistis.
inspirational ideality ~ (in 1918-19) same as inspired logistis; (in
1920) same as śrauta vijñāna (hermetic ideality).
inspirational intuitional ~ same as inspirational intuitive.
inspirational intuitive ~ having the nature of inspired intuition.
inspirational intuitive idealised mind ~ the inspirational intuitive form
of idealised mentality, same as inspired intuitional intellectuality.
inspirational intuivity ~ same as inspired intuitivity.
inspirational logistis ~ same as inspired logistis.
inspirational mental ~ having the nature of inspirational mentality.
inspirational mentality ~ the middle level of idealised mentality, a
“mind of luminous inspiration” which, in dealing with the movement
in time, sees things “in the light of the world’s larger potentialities”;
its defect is that it may be liable “to a hesitation or suspension of
determining view as between various potential lines of the movement
or even to a movement away from the line of eventual actuality and
following another not yet applicable sequence”.
inspirational revelation ~ revelation with an element of inspiration;
(in 1919) same as inspired revelatory logistis.
inspirational-revelatory ~ having the nature of inspirational revelation.


.inspirational tapas ~ tapas acting in the inspired logistis.
.inspirational telepathic trik
trikaladrsti
āladr.s.t.i (trikaldrishti) ~ telepathic trikāladr.s.t.i in the inspired logistis, a form of inspirational trikāladr.s.t.i.
.inspirational trik
trikaladrsti
āladr.s.t.i (trikaldrishti) ~ trikāladr.s.t.i by means of inspiration; the second level of ideal trikāladr.s.t.i.
.inspirational vijññana
āna ~ same as inspired logistis or inspirational mentality.
.inspired ~ having the nature of inspiration (śruti), as it acts on the
level of inspired logistis or another level of ideality or intuitive mind,
often in combination with intuition or revelation; (vāk) having the
qualities of the fourth level of style, which “brings to us not only pure
light and beauty and inexhaustible depth, but a greater moved ecstasy
of highest or largest thought and sight and speech”.
inspired gnosis; inspired ideality ~ same as inspired logistis.
inspired intellectuality ~ (mentioned only in the form of intuitional
inspired intellectuality) same as inspirational mentality.
inspired intuition ~ intuition with an element of inspiration; the middle form of intuitional ideality.
inspired intuitional intellectuality ~ intuitional intellectuality with an
element of inspiration, raising it towards inspirational mentality.
inspired intuitional logistis ~ same as inspired intuition.
inspired intuitive mentality ~ same as inspired intuitional intellectuality.
inspired intuitivity ~ a working of the intuitive mind related to inspirational mentality and pragmatic intuitivity.
inspired logistic revelation ~ same as inspired revelatory logistis.
inspired logistis ~ the middle level of logistic ideality, where inspiration (śruti) determines the predominant character of the working of the
luminous reason; also, the second gradation of this level, between the
intuitional inspired and revelatory inspired forms of logistic ideality.
inspired revelation ~ same as inspired revelatory logistis.
inspired revelatory ~ having the nature of inspired revelatory logistis,
or the second of its three forms, or the corresponding form of revelatory
mentality.
inspired revelatory gnosis; inspired revelatory ideal reason ~ same as
inspired revelatory logistis.
inspired revelatory logistis ~ the second scale of revelatory logistis, in

which inspiration is taken up into revelation.
.inspired vijññana
āna ~ same as inspired logistis.
.in statu [Latin] ~ in place, not moving.
.intellectual ideality ~ same as uninspired intuition, the lowest form of
intuitional ideality, sometimes regarded not as true ideality, but as a
transitional stage between intuitive mind and vijñāna.
intellectual intuition ~ same as mental intuition.
intellectual śraddh
sraddha
ā ~ mental faith; belief.
intellectual tapas ~ will-power on the plane of the buddhi, where it
introduces a stress of speculation and intellectual preference that is an
obstacle to knowledge; same as mental tapas.
interpretative ~ (in 1920) being of the nature of an “ideative vision
and thought” that “interpret . . . the illimitable unity and variety of the
Infinite”, the characteristic of the hermetic ideality or śrauta vijñāna,
the plane of vijñāna whose essence is śruti, also attributed to the
highest forms of logistic ideality containing an element of inspiration;
specifically, pertaining to the highest form of inspired revelatory logistis, called interpretative revelatory vijñāna, to the second element in
the highest representative ideality or to the śrauta vijñāna itself, from
which these derive; (in 1927) short for interpretative imperative.
interpretative dr
drsti
. s.t.i ~ same as interpretative revelatory vijñāna.
interpretative ideality ~ same as interpretative revelatory vijñāna or
śrauta vijñāna.
interpretative imperative ~ (c. 1920) a form of logos vijñāna formed
by a combination of its interpretative and imperative elements; (in
early 1927) an intermediate form of “the imperative”, evidently interpretative ideality taken up into imperative vijñāna and that again
elevated to one of the lower planes of what by the end of 1927 was
called overmind.
interpretative logistical vijñana
ñāna ~ same as interpretative revelatory
vijñāna.
interpretative-representative highest ideality ~ representative revelatory vijñāna (the highest intuitive revelatory logistis) in combination
with interpretative revelatory vijñāna (the highest inspired revelatory
logistis).
interpretative revelatory ~ having the nature of interpretative revelatory vijñāna.

.interpretative revelatory vijññana
āna ~ (in 1920) the highest, most revelatory form of inspired revelatory logistis.
.interpretative rev. V. ~ short for interpretative revelatory vijñāna.
.interpretative vijññana
āna ~ same as interpretative revelatory vijñāna.
.intuition ~ the faculty of jñāna that “suggests a direct and illumining
inner idea of the truth, an idea that is its true image and index, . . .
a representation, but a living representation”; one of the two components of smr.ti, it “does the work of reasoning without the necessity of reasoning to arrive at a conclusion”; also, an instance of
the working of this faculty; sometimes equivalent to intuitional ideality, the lowest level of logistic ideality; (in 1927) same as gnostic
intuition.
intuitional ~ having the nature of intuition, as it acts on the level of
intuitional ideality or another level of ideality or intuitive mind, often
in combination with inspiration or revelation.
intuitional gnosis ~ same as intuitional ideality.
intuitional ideality ~ the lowest level of logistic ideality, where intuition (along with discrimination or viveka, the other component
of smr.ti) determines the predominant character of the working of
the luminous reason, the other faculties of jñāna being inactive or
subordinate to it.
intuitional ideal mind ~ same as intuitional ideality.
intuitional inspired ~ having the nature of intuitive inspiration.
intuitional inspired intellectuality ~ the lowest form of inspirational
mentality, in which intuition is taken up into inspiration.
intuitional inspired logistis ~ the lowest form of inspired logistis, in
which intuition is taken up into inspiration.
intuitional intellectuality ~ the lowest level of idealised mentality, the
“primary intuitive action” of the intuitive mind, which “dealing with
the triple time movement . . . sees principally the stream of successive
actualities in time, even as the ordinary mind, but with an immediate
directness of truth and spontaneous accuracy of which the ordinary
mind is not capable”.
intuitional mind ~ same as intuitive mind.
intuitional reason ~ same as intuitional intellectuality.
intuitional revelation; intuitional revelatory ideality ~ same as intuitive revelatory logistis.

.intuitional trik
trikaladrsti
āladr.s.t.i (trikaldrishti) ~ trikāladr.s.t.i by means of intuition; the lowest level of ideal trikāladr.s.t.i.
.intuitional vijññana
āna ~ same as intuitional ideality.
.intuitive ~ same as intuitional.
.intuitive consciousness ~ (c. 1931, in the diagram on page 1360) the
plane of highest mind below overmind; evidently equivalent to “Intuition” in the sense in which Sri Aurobindo used this word in his later
writings, where it is “a power of consciousness nearer and more intimate [than Higher Mind or Illumined Mind] to the original knowledge
by identity”, differing from Overmind in that it “sees in ﬂashes” and
combines them, while Overmind “sees calmly, steadily, in great masses
and large extensions of space and time and relation, globally”.
intuitive gnosis ~ same as intuitional ideality.
intuitive higher mind ~ (c. 1931, in the diagram on page 1360) the
second (“intuitive”) level of higher mind, perhaps corresponding to
logistic ideality in the terminology of 1919-20.
intuitive idealised mind ~ (mentioned only in the form of inspirational
intuitive idealised mind) same as intuitional intellectuality.
intuitive ideality ~ same as intuitional ideality.
intuitive inspiration ~ intuition taken up into inspiration (on the plane
of idealised mentality or logistic ideality); the same as intuitional
inspired intellectuality or intuitional inspired logistis.
intuitive-inspirational ~ having the nature of intuitive inspiration.
intuitive inspired revelatory ~ having the nature of intuition taken up
into inspired revelatory logistis or the corresponding form of revelatory
mentality.
intuitive intellect; intuitive intellectuality; intuitive intelligence ~ same
as intuitive mind or intuitional intellectuality.
intuitive m
manasa
ānasa ~ same as intuitive mind.
intuitive mental ~ having the nature of intuitive mind.
intuitive mentality ~ same as intuitive mind or intuitional intellectuality.
intuitive mental power ~ śakti or tapas acting in the forms proper to
the intuitive mind.
intuitive mental trik. ~ abbreviation of next.
intuitive mental trik
trikaladrsti
āladr.s.t.i (trikaldrishti) ~ trikāladr.s.t.i in the intuitive mind.


.intuitive mind ~ same as vijñānabuddhi, a higher form of the buddhi
whose “inspirations, revelations, intuitions, self-luminous discernings
are messages from a higher knowledge-plane”, but which “can perceive the truth only by a brilliant reﬂection or limited communication
and subject to the restrictions and the inferior capacity of the mental
vision”.
intuitive overmind ~ (c. 1931, in the diagram on page 1360) intuitive consciousness taken up into overmind, where its “movement is
more comprehensive, global, many-faceted, more wide and potent in
its truth-force”.
intuitive reason ~ same as intuitive mind.
intuitive representative vijñana
ñāna ~ same as lower representative.
intuitive rev. ~ short for intuitive revelatory.
intuitive revelation ~ intuition taken up into revelation; same as intuitive revelatory logistis.
intuitive revelatory ~ having the nature of intuitive revelatory logistis
or the corresponding form of revelatory mentality; when distinguished
from representative, which is described as the highest intuitive revelatory logistis, “intuitive revelatory” apparently refers to a lower form
of intuitive revelatory logistis.
intuitive revelatory logistis ~ the lowest scale of revelatory logistis, in
which intuition is taken up into revelation.
intuitive revelatory reason; intuitive revelatory vijññana
āna ~ same as intuitive revelatory logistis.
intuitive tapas ~ tapas acting in the intuitional ideality.
intuitive telepathic trik
trikaladrsti
āladr.s.t.i (trikaldrishti) ~ telepathic trikāladr.s.t.i
in the intuitional ideality, a form of intuitional trikāladr.s.t.i.
intuitive vijññana
āna ~ same as intuitional ideality.
intuitivity ~ (in 1919-20) a term for intuitive mind (also called intuivity), used especially with reference to three levels (“mechanical”,
“pragmatic” and “truth-reﬂecting”) regarded as higher counterparts
of levels of the intellectual reason; (in April 1927) apparently the same
as gnostic intuition, the first degree of supramental gnosis.
intuivity ~ (in 1919-20) same as intuitivity.
is. (ish) ~ force of impulsion.
ı̄śa (isha) ~ Lord (same as ı̄śvara).
isa
is.ah. (ishah; isha) ~ impulsions.
isah

.ish ~ see is..
.isha ~ see ı̄śa, is.ah..
.ishita ~ see ı̄śitā.
.ishitasiddhi ~ see ı̄śitāsiddhi.
.ishta ~ see is.t.a.
.ishwara
ishwara, etc. ~ see ı̄śvara, etc.
.ishwari ~ see ı̄śvarı̄.
.ishwaribhava ~ see ı̄śvarı̄bhāva.
.isita
ı̄śitā (ishita) ~ effectiveness of pure lipsā in the citta without a deliberate act of will, one of the three siddhis of power; an instance of this
effectiveness.
ı̄śitāsiddhi (ishitasiddhi; ishita-siddhi) ~ the supernormal power (sidisitasiddhi
dhi) called ı̄śitā; perfection or fulfilment of this power; an instance of
its use.
ı̄śitā-vaśitā (ishita-vashita) ~ the combination of ı̄śitā and vaśitā, two
isita-vasita
of the three siddhis of power.
ı̄śitā-vyāpti-aiśvarya (ishita-vyapti-aishwarya) ~ the combination of
isita-vyapti-aisvarya
ı̄śitā, (communicative) vyāpti and aiśvarya.
is.t.a (ishta) ~ chosen, desired.
ista
isthi hina mathēs
mathes thēr
ther [Greek] ~ know in order to understand the
beast (the physical consciousness).
isthi philos ēstha
estha [Greek] ~ know you were a friend.
ı̄śvara (ishwara; iswara) ~ lord; the supreme Being (purus.ottama)
isvara
as the Lord, “the omniscient and omnipotent All-ruler” who by his
conscious Power (śakti) “manifests himself in Time and governs the
universe”, ruling his self-creation with “an all-consciousness in which
he is aware of the truth of all things and aware of his own all-wisdom
working them out according to the truth that is in them”; identified
with Kr.s.n.a; the individual soul (purus.a or jı̄va) as the master of its
own nature.
ı̄śvarabhāva (ishwarabhava; iswarabhava) ~ lordship, “the temperaisvarabhava
ment of the ruler and leader”; mastery, sovereignty; a term in the
second general formula of the śakti catus.t.aya; “a sense of the Divine
Power”, a quality common to the four aspects of daivı̄ prakr.ti; the
personal aspect of brahman seen as the ı̄śvara.
isvara brahma (ishwara brahma) ~ brahman as the Lord (ı̄śvara); the
ı̄śvara
omnipresent Reality “revealed as possessor, enjoyer of his own self-

existence, creator of the universe and one with it . . . and yet superior
to it”.
ı̄śvaradarśana (ishwaradarshana; ishwara-darshana; ishwara darisvaradarsana
shana; ishwaradarshan) ~ the vision of the Lord (ı̄śvara) who “knows,
lives in, identifies himself with all and yet is not subjugated by the
reactions or limited in his knowledge, power and Ananda by the
limitations of the mind and life and physical being in the universe”, a
form of darśana related to brahmadarśana or regarded as part of it.
isvaradarsana sarvabhutesu
ı̄śvaradarśana
sarvabhūtes.u (ishwaradarshana sarvabhuteshu) ~ vision of the Lord in all existences.
ı̄śvaraprema (ishwaraprema) ~ love of the ı̄śvara in all.
isvaraprema
ı̄śvara-śakti (ishwara-shakti) ~ “the dynamic Duality” of ı̄śvara and
isvara-sakti
śakti, which in “the superconscient truth of the Self-Existence . . . are
fused and implied in each other, one and indistinguishable, but in the
spiritual-pragmatic truth of the dynamism of the universe, they emerge
and become active . . . as a dual principle”.
ı̄śvara
isvara T2 ~ T2 expressing the omniscience and omnipotence of the
ı̄śvara.
ı̄śvarı̄ (ishwari; iswari) ~ the all-ruling Goddess (devı̄), “the Worldisvari
Mother, creatrix of the universe, putting forth the Gods and the worlds
and all things and existences out of her spirit-substance”.
ı̄śvarı̄bhāva (ishwaribhava; iswaribhava; ishwari bhava) ~ the temisvaribhava
perament of the ruling Goddess; “the supreme sense of the masteries
of the eternal Ishwari”, sometimes mentioned instead of ı̄śvarabhāva
as a general quality of daivı̄ prakr.ti.
iswara ~ see ı̄śvara.
iswarabhava ~ see ı̄śvarabhāva.
iswari ~ see ı̄śvarı̄.
iswaribhava ~ see ı̄śvarı̄bhāva.
itihāsa ~ history; narrative.
itihasa

.jada
jad.a ~ inert.
.jad
jada
. a Bharata ~ name of a sage, example of the state of liberation in
which the outward nature is inert and inactive.
.jad
jada
nirānanda ~ inert joylessness.
. a nirananda
.jad
jada
prakr.ti (jada prakriti) ~ inert nature.
. a prakrti
.jadatva
jad.atva (jadatwa) ~ inertness, “the inert irresponsibility of the free
physical mind”.
.jadis [French] ~ formerly, of old.
.jagat ~ literally “that which moves”; the universe as “the perpetual
movement”; a world (loka); any object, regarded as “a knot of habitual
motion”.
jagatı̄ ~ literally “she that moves”; the earth; the universe; Nature
jagati
(prakr.ti) as “the ever moving”.
jaghanya virati ~ avoidance of what is low and vulgar.
jāgrad ~ same as jāgrat.
jagrad
jjagrad
āgrad antardarsi
antardarśı̄ (jagrad antardarshi) ~ same as antardarśı̄ jāgrat.
jjagrad
āgrad antardrsta
antardr.s.t.a (jagrad antardrishta) ~ same as antardr.s.t.a jāgrat.
jjagrad
āgrad drsti
dr.s.t.i (jagrad drishti) ~ waking vision; rūpadr.s.t.i in jāgrat
samādhi.
jjagrad
āgrad rupa
rūpa ~ same as jāgrat rūpa.
jjagrad
āgrad rupa
rūpa antardrsta
antardr.s.t.a (jagrad rupa antardrishta) ~ rūpa in antardr.s.t.a jāgrat.
jāgrat ~ awake, waking; the waking consciousness, in which one is
jagrat
aware of the outer world through the physical senses; the state of jāgrat
samādhi (sometimes restricted to bahirdarśı̄ jāgrat); (the condition of
being) inwardly wakeful and self-possessed in states of samādhi in
which the consciousness is withdrawn from the surface.
jjagrat
āgrat antardarsi
antardarśı̄ (jagrat antardarshi) ~ same as antardarśı̄ jāgrat.
jjagrat
āgrat antardrsta
antardr.s.t.a (jagrat antardrishta) ~ same as antardr.s.t.a jāgrat.
jjagrat
āgrat antardrsti
antardr.s.t.i (jagrat antardrishti) ~ internal vision in the waking
state of samādhi; same as antardarśı̄ jāgrat.
jjagrat
āgrat bahirdarsi
bahirdarśı̄ (jagrat bahirdarshi) ~ same as bahirdarśı̄ jāgrat.
jjagrat
āgrat caitanya (jagrat chaitanya) ~ wakeful consciousness.
jjagrat
āgrat cittakasa
cittākāśa (jagrat chittakasha) ~ the waking cittākāśa; a mental
ether in which images are seen in jāgrat samādhi.
jjagrat
āgrat rupa
rūpa (jagrat rupa; jagrat-rupa) ~ subtle images seen in the waking consciousness; vision of such images.
jjagrat
āgrat sabdadrsti
śabdadr.s.t.i (jagrat shabdadrishti) ~ perception of subtle sounds
in the waking consciousness.
jjagrat
āgrat samadhi
samādhi ~ samādhi in the waking state, “when in the waking
consciousness, we are able to concentrate and become aware of things


beyond our [normal] consciousness”. This has two forms, antardarśı̄
(inward-looking) and bahirdarśı̄ (outward-looking), in which images
are seen “with the bodily eyes closed or open, projected on or into a
physical object or medium or seen as if materialised in the physical
atmosphere or only in a psychical ether revealing itself through this
grosser physical atmosphere; seen through the physical eyes themselves
as a secondary instrument and as if under the conditions of the physical vision or by the psychical vision alone and independently of the
relations of our ordinary sight to space”.
jjagrat
āgrat suksmavisaya
sūks.mavis.aya (jagrat sukshmavishaya) ~ same as jāgrat vis.aya.
jāgrat-sus.upta (jagrat-sushupta) ~ sus.upta samādhi with inner wakejagrat-susupta
fulness.
jāgrat-svapna (jagrat-swapna) ~ svapnasamādhi with inner wakefuljagrat-svapna
ness; light svapnasamādhi bordering on antardarśı̄ jāgrat.
jāgrattā ~ wakefulness in the deeper states of samādhi; conscious
jagratta
self-possession and overcoming of the tendency to nidra (sleep) and
incoherent dreaming.
jāgrat vis.aya (jagrat vishaya) ~ subtle sense-objects (usually other
jagrat
than images) perceived in the waking state; the perception of such
objects (subtle sounds, touches, odours, tastes) in jāgrat samādhi.
jala (jala; jalam) ~ water; the liquid condition of material being, one
of the pañcabhūta or “five elemental states of Substance”; urine;
urination (short for jalavisr.s.t.i).
jala bh
bhuta
ūta ~ the liquid state of substance.
jalabindu ~ drop of water.
jalam ~ see jala.
jalamaya (jalamaya; jalamay) ~ watery; liquid; consisting of or relating to jala.
jalarodha ~ retention of ﬂuids (in the form of urine).
jalavisr.s.t.i (jalavisrishti; jala-visrishti; jala visrishti) ~ discharge (vijalavisrsti
sr.s.t.i) of waste matter in liquid form; same as mūtra.
jalya ~ relating to jala; watery.
jana ~ same as janaloka.
janaloka ~ the world (loka) of the “creative delight of existence”, the plane of ānanda, also called ānandaloka, where the “soul may dwell . . . in the principle of infinite self-existent delight and be aware of the divine Ananda creating out of its self-existence by its energy whatever harmony of being”.
janamaya dr. s.t.i (jnanamaya dristi, janamaya drishti) ~ vision on the plane of jana or ānanda.
janmāntara dr. s.t.i (janmantara drishti) ~ knowledge of other (past an future) lives, a form of trikāladr.s.t.i.
jarā ~ old age.
jara
jarat sabara
śabara (jarat shabara) ~ old savage.
jātavedas ~ knower of all things born (a Vedic epithet of Agni2).
jatavedas
jayājayau ~ victory and defeat.
jayajayau
jayalābha ~ attainment of victory.
jayalabha
jı̄va ~ “the living entity”; the soul, the individual purus.a, “a spirit and self, superior to Nature” which “consents to her acts, reﬂects her moods”, but “is itself a living reﬂection or a soul-form or a self-creation of the Spirit universal and transcendent”, an expression of the “principle of multiplicity in the spiritual being of the one divine Existence”; the jı̄va as a partial manifestation of the ı̄śvara, participating in all his powers as “witness, giver of the sanction, upholder, knower, lord”, is also “the meeting-place of the play of the dual aspect of the Divine, Prakriti and Purusha, and in the higher spiritual consciousness he becomes simultaneously one with both these aspects, and there he takes up and combines all the divine relations created by their interaction”.
jı̄vanta(h.) ~ living; lifelike.
jivanta(h)
jı̄va-prakr.ti (jiva-prakriti; jivaprakriti) ~ the jı̄va aware of its unity
jiva-prakrti
with prakr.ti, a unity realised in secondary / double dāsya (also called
prakritic dāsya) when the “individual on the side of action has disappeared into oneness with universal Prakriti”.
jı̄va-śakti (jiva-shakti) ~ the soul (jı̄va) that has merged its active injiva-sakti
dividuality in the working of the universal śakti, but is aware of its
personal existence as the individual purus.a “enabling by his participation the divine Shakti to do in him the works and the will of the
Ishwara” and “enjoying all the relations with him [the ı̄śvara] which
are created by her workings”.
jı̄vātmā ~ same as jı̄vātman.
jivatma
jı̄vātman ~ individual soul (jı̄va), “the self of the living creature”;
jivatman
the Self (ātman) seeming “to limit its power and knowledge so as
to support an individual play of transcendent and universal Nature”;


same as ks.ara purus.a.
.jñāna (jnana; jnanam; gnana) ~ knowledge; “that power of direct and divine knowledge which works independently of the intellect & senses or uses them only as subordinate assistants”, the first member of the vijñāna catus.t.aya, consisting primarily of the application of any or all of the supra-intellectual faculties of smr.ti, śruti and dr.s.t.i “to the things of thought, ideas and knowledge generally”; sometimes extended to include other instruments of vijñāna such as trikāladr.s.t.i and telepathy; also, short for jñānaṁ brahma; wisdom, an attribute of Mahāvı̄ra; (on page 1281) the name of a svarga.
jññana
āna atman
ātman ~ knowledge-self; jñānaṁ brahma seen or experienced
as the ātman.
jññana
āna brahma; jñana
ñāna brahman ~ same as jñānaṁ brahma.
jññana
āna deva ~ a god of knowledge.
jññanadharanasamarthyam
ānadhāran.asāmarthyam ~ the capacity to contain all knowledge;
same as jñānasāmarthyam.
jññanadipena
ānadı̄pena bhāsvatā (jnanadipena bhaswata) ~ with the blazing
lamp of knowledge. [Gı̄tā 10.11]
jññana-hasyam
āna-hāsyam ~ laughter of knowledge, expressing “felicity of illumination”, an element of Maheśvarı̄ bhāva and a form of devı̄hāsya.
jññanalipsa
ānalipsā ~ the urge towards knowledge, an attribute of the brāhman.a.
jññanalipsa
ānalipsā jñānaprakāśo brahmavarcasyaṁ sthairyam iti brahmatejah. (jnanalipsa jnanaprakasho brahmavarchasyam sthairyam iti brahmatejah) ~ the urge towards knowledge, light of knowledge,
spiritual force, steadiness: these express the energy of the brāhman.a temperament.
jññanaloka
ānaloka ~ the world of knowledge.
jññanam
ānam ~ same as jñāna or jñānaṁ brahma.
jññanam
ānam anandam
ānandaṁ (brahma) ~ brahman as Knowledge and Bliss, the
last two elements of the brahma catus.t.aya.
jññanamaya
ānamaya ~ full of knowledge.
jññanamaya
ānamaya saguna
sagun.a ~ jñānaṁ brahma with qualities.
jññanam
ānaṁ brahma (jnanam brahma; gnanam brahma) ~ the realisation of “Brahman as self-existent consciousness and universal knowledge”, bringing a perception of “all knowledge and conscious experience as the outﬂowing of that consciousness”, the third member of the brahma catus.t.aya; the divine Reality (brahman) realised as “a consciousness in everything which is aware of all”.
jñanam, trikāladr.s.t.ir, as.tasiddhih., samādhir, iti vijñānacatus.t.ayam (jnanam, trikaldrishtir, ashtasiddhih, samadhir, iti vijnanachatusthayam) ~ jñāna, trikāladr.s.t.i, as.tasiddhi and samādhi: these constitute the vijñāna catus.t.aya. 
jñanaprakasa ānaprakāśa (jnanaprakasha) ~ light of knowledge, “clearness of mind and its tendency to be easily illuminated by ideas and to receive the truth”, an attribute of the brāhman.a.
jñanaprakaso, jñānalipsā, brahmavarcasyaṁ, sthairyam (jnanaprakasho, jnanalipsa, brahmavarchasyam, sthairyam) ~ light of knowledge, the urge towards knowledge, spiritual force, steadiness (the attributes of the brāhman.a).
jñanasamarthyam (jnanasamarthyam; jnana samarthyam) ~ capacity for knowledge, “the power of the mind to receive and adapt itself to any kind of knowledge without feeling anywhere a limit or an incapacity”, an element of buddhiśakti.
jñanı̄ ~ man of knowledge.
jñanoparati ~ cessation of knowledge.
jññata
ātā ~ knower.
jññata-purusa
ātā-purus.a (jnata-purusha) ~ the soul or conscious being as the knower.
jññatr
ātr. brahma (jnatri brahma) ~ brahman as the knower.
jonāki [Bengali] ~ fireﬂy.
jonaki
journalier [French] ~ “daily” (evidently a word seen by Sri Aurobindo
in lipi).
jugupsā ~ “self-protecting recoil”, repulsion, “the shrinking of the
jugupsa
limited being from that which is not himself and not sympathetic or in
harmony with himself, its impulse of self-defence”.
jugupsita ~ repellent.
jyoti(h.) ~ light; light of spiritual consciousness or ideal knowledge;
jyoti(h)
one of the seven kinds of akashic material; rūpa or lipi composed of
this material.
jyotika (jyotik) ~ same as jyotirmaya.
jyotir ~ same as jyoti(h.).
jyotir daksa
daks.a (jyotir daksha) ~ light and discernment. [Cf. R
. g Veda
9.61.18]


.jyotirmaya (jyotirmaya; jyotirmay) ~ luminous; full of light of vijñāna; (rūpa or lipi) composed of jyoti(h.).
.jyotirmaya lipi (jyotirmaya lipi) ~ lipi composed of jyoti(h.).
.jyotirmaya prak
prakasa
āśa (jyotirmaya prakasha) ~ illumined clarity.
.K.A. ~ abbreviation of “Kama Ananda” (see kāmānanda).
.kacca
kaccā (kachcha) [Hindi] ~ unripe, immature.
.kada
kadā ~ when.
.Kadambari
Kādambarı̄ ~ name of a Sanskrit prose romance by Bān.a (7th century
A.D.).
.Kailasa
Kailāsa (Kailas) ~ the mountain on whose summit Śiva is said to
dwell, according to a popular tradition which translated inner truths
“into terms familiar to our physical and objective experience, . . .
turned the rarer heights of subtle substance into material heights and
placed the abodes of the gods on the summits of physical mountains”.
kaivaly
kaivalyananda
ānanda ~ the bliss of absolute existence (kaivalya, the condition of that which is kevala, sole or absolute), a term used for the
union of sadānanda, cidānanda and śuddhānanda, the three highest forms of ānanda, which are based on the “Joy of the spirit in
the Ekam” (One) in its threefold aspect as saccidānanda or infinite
Existence-Consciousness-Bliss; also applied to sadānanda by itself.
kalā ~ art.
kala
kāla ~ time.
kala
kalasi [Bengali] ~ pitcher.
kali ~ (“the Kali”) same as kaliyuga.
Kālı̄ ~ (literally “the black”) the “dark Mother”, a name given in the
Kali
Hindu tradition to the “supreme Energy . . . beneficent even in the
mask of destruction”, represented “with her garland of skulls trampling naked in battle”, symbolic of “the Nature Force [prakr.ti] in
the ignorance surrounded by difficulties, wresting and breaking everything in a blind struggle to get through till she finds herself standing
with her foot on the Divine itself ~ then she comes to herself and
the struggle and destruction are over”; the Goddess (devı̄) into whose
undivided consciousness-force (cit-śakti) “our divided & unequal individual force of action & thought” is to be renounced in order “to

replace our egoistic activities by the play in our body of the universal
Kali and thus exchange blindness & ignorance for knowledge and
ineffective human strength for the divine effective Force”; the śakti
carrying out the lı̄lā according to the pleasure of the ı̄śvara, the second
member of the karma catus.t.aya; sometimes the same as Mahākālı̄.
Kālı̄bhāva (Kalibhava; Kali-bhava; Kali bhava) ~ the forceful temKalibhava
perament of Kālı̄, sometimes equivalent to Can.d.ı̄bhāva or Mahākālı̄
bhāva; oneness with Kālı̄ as the universal prakr.ti or śakti, a state dependent on liberation from the ego (ahaṅkāra-mukti-siddhi) in which
“the form of the egoistic consciousness with a name attached to it is
repelled whenever it throws its shadow on the central consciousness”,
leading to “entire possession of the world in subjective unity” by the
jı̄va-prakr.ti.
Kālı̄darśana (Kalidarshana) ~ vision of Kālı̄ “manifest in all beings
Kalidarsana
& things”, the darśana of the śakti acting in the world, “the timeless
power of the Divine which manifests itself in time as a universal force
creating, constituting, maintaining and directing all the movements
and workings of the universe”.
Kali-deva ~ the god of the kaliyuga; probably Aniruddha, who manifests the divine qualities of the śūdra.
Kālı̄kr.s.n.a (Kalikrishna; Kali krishna) ~ (also called Kr.s.n.akālı̄) the
Kalikrsna
union of Kālı̄ and Kr.s.n.a, whether seen in the perception (darśana) of
the external world or experienced in oneself in a spiritual realisation
which is the basis of karma and kāma1, where Kālı̄ as prakr.ti “take[s]
up the whole nature into the law of her higher divine truth and act[s]
in that law offering up the universal enjoyment of her action and being
to the Anandamaya Ishwara” (Kr.s.n.a), while the individual soul (jı̄va)
is “the channel of this action and offering”.
Kālı̄-Kr.s.n.a bhāva (Kali-Krishna bhava) ~ (also called Kr.s.n.akālı̄
Kali-Krsna
bhāva) the realisation of Kālı̄kr.s.n.a, a state of being in which Kālı̄,
the universal prakr.ti or śakti, is felt “occupying the whole of myself
and my nature which becomes Kali and ceases to be anything else,
the Master [ı̄śvara, Kr.s.n.a] using, directing, enjoying the Power to his
ends, not mine, with that which I call myself only as a centre of his
universal existence and responding to its workings as a soul to the
Soul, taking upon itself his image until there is nothing left but Krishna
and Kali”.

.KKalikrsna
ālı̄kr.s.n.a darśana
darsana ~ the vision of Kālı̄kr.s.n.a in all, same as Kr.s.n.akālı̄
darśana.
.Kalimandira
Kālı̄mandira (Kalimandir) ~ a temple to the goddess Kālı̄.
.kali pasu
paśu (kali pashu) ~ paśu in a kaliyuga.
.Kali-prakrti
Kālı̄-prakr.ti (Kali-prakriti) ~ Nature as Kālı̄.
.kaliyuga (kaliyuga; kali yuga) ~ the last age in a caturyuga, whose
master-spirit is the śūdra; a period of the world in which the harmony
created in the satyayuga and maintained with increasing difficulty in
the tretā and dvāpara “finally collapses and is destroyed”, while at the
same time “the necessary conditions are progressively built up for a
new Satya, another harmony, a more advanced perfection”.
Kalki ~ the final avatāra of Vis.n.u according to the Hindu tradition,
expected to come mounted symbolically on a white horse “bringing
the Kingdom of the Divine upon earth, destroying the opposing Asura
forces”.
kalpa ~ a vast period of time, consisting of ten pratikalpas of a
hundred caturyugas each; (loosely) a pratikalpa.
kalpan
kalpanamayi
āmayı̄ prakr
prakrti
. ti (kalpanamayi prakriti) ~ Nature creating subjectively by the power of imagination.
kalyān.a (kalyana; kalyanam) ~ fortunate; beneficent; beneficence;
kalyana
goodness, good.
kaly
kalyanabuddhi
ān.abuddhi ~ beneficent Intelligence.
kalyān.alipsā ~ the urge to bring about the good of all; an element of
kalyanalipsa
Mahālaks.mı̄ bhāva.
kalyān.am ~ see kalyān.a.
kalyanam
kaly
kalyanasraddha
ān.aśraddhā (kalyanasraddha; kalyana sraddha) ~ faith that all is
for the best, “the sense of a divine power making for good behind all
experiences”, an element of cittaśakti.
kalyān.ecchā (kalyanechcha) ~ beneficent Will.
kalyaneccha
kama
āma1 (kama; kamah) ~ desire; same as śuddha kāma, “a divine desire other than the vital craving, a God-desire of which this other and
lower phenomenon is an obscure shadow and into which it has to be
transfigured”; the seeking for “the joy of God manifest in matter”,
an attribute of the śūdra and of Aniruddha; short for kāmānanda;
same as samāja, the social part of karma; the divine enjoyment that
accompanies a divine action in the world, a member of the karma
catus.t.aya; (on page 1281) the lowest svarga.

.KKama
āma2 ~ the god of Desire (kāma1), identified with Aniruddha.
.kkama
āma ānanda
ananda ~ same as kāmānanda.
.kamabhoga
kāmabhoga ~ kāmānanda in the state of bhoga.
.kamacakra
kāmacakra (kamachakra) ~ the “sensational desire centre”, the abdominal cakra, also called svādhis.t.hāna, on whose strength kāmānanda and ārogya depend.
kāmah. ~ see kāma1.
kamah
kāmah., premah., dāsyalipsā ātmasamarpan.am iti śūdraśaktih. (kakamah,
mah, premah, dasyalipsa atmasamarpanam iti shudrashaktih) ~
desire, love, the urge towards service, self-giving: these express the
śūdra soul-power.
kāmanā ~ longing.
kamana
kāmānanda ~ a form of śārı̄rānanda or physical ānanda associkamananda
ated with (śuddha) kāma or purified desire, also referred to as
maithunānanda (though that term is usually reserved for a high
intensity of kāmānanda); a general term for ānanda as experienced
on the physical plane: “the joy of Matter released into a spiritual
consciousness and thrilled with a constant ecstasy”, realised as part of
“the total perfection of the spiritualised body”. Kāmānanda manifests
both in the sūks.ma deha (subtle body) and the sthūla deha (gross
body), and there is a subjective kāmānanda besides the physical
kāmānanda that is more often meant by the word. The perfection of
kāmānanda, as the “most central” form of physical ānanda, depends
on a “transformation of the sex-centre and its energy” so that this
energy which “is the support in the body of all the mental, vital and
physical forces of the nature” is “changed into a mass and a movement
of intimate Light, creative Power, pure divine Ananda”.
kāmaprema ~ (subjective) kāmānanda combined with premānanda.
kamaprema
kāmasiddhi ~ fulfilment of kāma1.
kamasiddhi
kamic cakra; kamic centre ~ same as kāmacakra.
kampana ~ trembling, sometimes experienced when there is “a great
increase, inpouring, circulation of force” which the body, “accustomed
to work off superﬂuous energy by movement, is at first ill able to
bear . . . and betrays it by violent tremblings”.
K. Ananda ~ abbreviation of “Kama Ananda” (see kāmānanda).
kāntam ~ the beloved.
kantam
karālı̄ ~ terrible.
karali

.karana
karan.a (karan) ~ instrument.
.karana
kāran.a (karana; karanam) ~ cause; causal; “the Causal Idea which,
by supporting and secretly guiding the confused activities of Mind, Life
and Body ensures and compels the right arrangement of the Universe”,
same as vijñāna or vijñānamaya; (especially in Bengali) consecrated
wine, used in Tantric rituals.
karana-indriya
āran.a-indriya ~ the causal (vijñānamaya) sense-faculty; the “supramental sense” which “is independent of the body and the physical life
and outer mind and it is above too the inner mind and its experiences”.
kāran.am ~ see kāran.a.
karanam
karma ~ action, work; activity, motion; action in the world based on
vijñāna and expressing the union of Kr.s.n.a and Kālı̄, the third member
of the karma catus.t.aya, often conceived in terms of a fourfold mission
(literary, political, social and spiritual) enjoined by a divine command
(ādeśa) while Sri Aurobindo was in jail; the karma catus.t.aya itself;
work, an attribute of Aniruddha; the sum of one’s actions, each action
being viewed as a link in a chain of cause and effect extending over
many lives.
karma catus
catustaya
. t.aya (karmachatusthaya; karma chatusthaya) ~ the fifth
catus.t.aya, the quaternary of action, consisting of Kr.s.n.a, Kālı̄, karma
and kāma1; also called the lı̄lācatus.t.aya.
karmadeha (karmadeha; karma deha) ~ karma-body; a kind of subtle vital-physical atmosphere surrounding the body and containing
saṁskāras due to one’s past karma.
karmadeva (karmadeva; karma deva) ~ a god of action; one who has
achieved divinity by works.
karmadevatā ~ same as karmadeva.
karmadevata
karmahı̄na
karmahina ud
udasinata
āsı̄natā (karmahin udasinata) ~ inactive indifference.
karmakāma (karmakama; karma-kama; karma kama) ~ the combikarmakama
nation of karma and kāma1, divine action and divine enjoyment, which
together form the “effective half” of the karma catus.t.aya.
karmalipsā ~ the urge to work, an element of Mahāsarasvatı̄ bhāva.
karmalipsa
karman
karmani
. i akarma ~ inaction in action. [Gı̄tā 4.18]
karmap
karmapatavam
āt.avam ~ skill in work, an element of Mahāsarasvatı̄ bhāva.
karmas
karmasamarthya
āmarthya ~ capacity for action, a quality common to the four
aspects of daivı̄ prakr.ti, also called sarvakarmasāmarthya: “a rapid
and divine capacity for all kinds of action that may be demanded from

the instrument”.
.karmasanny
karmasannyasa
āsa ~ renunciation of (egoistic) action; giving up of identification of the jı̄va with the activity of the ādhāra.
.karmasiddhi (karmasiddhi; karma-siddhi; karma siddhi) ~ success of
action in the world; perfection of karma in all its parts as laid down
by the ādeśa; fulfilment of the karma catus.t.aya, especially its effective
half.
karma-siddhi asiddhi ~ success and failure in karma.
karma-śraddh
karma-sraddha
ā ~ faith in the success of the work; śraddhā in the
achievement of karmasiddhi.
karmı̄ ~ man of works.
karmi
karn.a ~ ear.
karna
kars.an.a (karshana) ~ tearing, forcing, hurting; one of the five forms
karsana
of pain to be turned into raudrānanda.
kartā ~ doer.
karta
kartavya ~ to be done; the thing that has to be done.
kartavya-akartavya ~ (the sense of) what is to be done and what is
not to be done.
kartavya karma ~ same as kartavyaṁ karma.
kartavyam akartavyam ~ what is to be done and what is not to be
done.
kartavya
kartavyam
ṁ karma ~ the work that is to be done.
kartr. brahma (kartri brahma) ~ brahman as the doer.
kartr
kartrtva
abhimāna (kartritwa abhimana) ~ the egoism of the worker;
. tva abhimana
the idea of oneself as the doer.
Karttika
ārttika purnima
pūrn.imā (Karttik Purnima) ~ the full-moon night of the
Hindu month of Kārttika (November-December).
karun.ā ~ pity.
karuna
kārya ~ effect.
karya
kauśala (kaushala; kaushalam) ~ skill, “the dexterity and skill which
kausala
is able so to arrange the means, the equipment, the action as to produce
the greatest results possible and the best arranged results”, an attribute
of the vaiśya.
kauśalya (kaushalya) ~ skilfulness (of lipi), especially in the use of the
kausalya
various kinds of akashic material.
kaushala; kaushalam ~ see kauśala.
kaushalya ~ see kauśalya.


.kautuka-h
kautuka-hasyam
āsyam ~ laughter of amusement, an attribute of Mahāsarasvatı̄ and a form of devı̄hāsya.
.kautuka-krida
kautuka-krı̄d.ā ~ amusing game.
.kavaca (kavacha) ~ armour; mental armour around the body which
keeps off attacks of all kinds.
.kavi ~ poet; (in the Veda) seer, one who is “possessed of the Truthconsciousness and using its faculties of vision, inspiration, intuition,
discrimination”.
kāvya ~ poetry; the poetic faculty, the power of self-expression in the
kavya
rhythmic language of poetry which is “the highest form of speech
available to man for the expression whether of his self-vision or of his
world-vision”; the writing of poetry, part of sāhitya, including work in
the “epic, dramatic and the minor forms which again include narrative,
lyric and reﬂective”.
kāyasiddhi ~ perfection of the body (same as śārı̄rasiddhi).
kayasiddhi
kāyaśuddhi (kayashuddhi) ~ purification of the body.
kayasuddhi
kendra ~ centre; see caitanyakendra.
ketu ~ perception; intuitive thought-perception.
kevalair ~ (instrumental plural of kevala) mere; pure, simple; isolated,
alone; absolute. [Gı̄tā 5.11]
khan.d.a ~ part, section.
khanda
khan.d.a-siddhi ~ partial siddhi; partial effectuality of tapas.
khanda-siddhi
khātā [Bengali, etc.] ~ notebook.
khata
kinnara ~ a kind of centaurlike being of “unearthly sweetness of voice
and wild freedom”, belonging to a world of fantasy.
klānti ~ exhaustion, fatigue.
klanti
kleinos [Greek] ~ famous.
kośa (kosa, kosha) ~ sheath, case, covering; “a grade of our substance, a sheath as it was called in the ancient figurative language”, of which there are principally five (annakośa, prān.akośa, manah.kośa, vijñānakośa and ānandakośa) corresponding to “five degrees of our being, the material, the vital, the mental, the ideal, the spiritual or beatific”; two additional kośas (tapas-kośa and sat-kośa) are said to be “not yet developed” in the human evolution, “but only unformed nimbuses of concrete being”.
kratu ~ will; volition.
kratu
kratum
ṁ sacetasam (kratum sachetasam) ~ conscious Will.

.krauryam ~ cruelty.
.Krishna
Krishna, etc. ~ see Kr.s.n.a, etc.
.kriti ~ see kr.ti.
.kriya
kriyā ~ practice.
.kriyasakti
kriyāśakti (kriyashakti) ~ power of action.
.kr
krnusva
pājah. ~ create a massive strength. [R
. g Veda 4.4.1]
. n.us.va pajah
.krodha (krodh) ~ anger.
.Krsna
Kr.s.n.a (Krishna) ~ the eighth avatāra of Vis.n.u in the Hindu tradition,
regarded by Sri Aurobindo as an embodiment of “the complete divine
manhood” and as the avatāra who opened the possibility of overmind
in the evolution of consciousness on earth; a name of the universal
Deity (deva) and supreme Being (purus.ottama) who is the fourfold
ı̄śvara and also “the Destroyer, Preserver, Creator in one” (Rudra2,
Vis.n.u, Brahmā), manifesting “through the Vishnu aspect as his frontal
appearance”; “the Ishwara taking delight in the world” (ānandamaya
ı̄śvara or lı̄lāmaya purus.a), realisation of oneness with whom is the
first part of the karma catus.t.aya, seen in all things and beings in the
several intensities and degrees of Kr.s.n.adarśana.
Kr.s.n.abhāva (Krishnabhava) ~ oneness of the individual soul (jı̄va)
Krsnabhava
with Kr.s.n.a as the ı̄śvara or universal purus.a, a state which “comes
by the increasing manifestation of the Divine, the Ishwara in all our
being and action”, reaching its perfection “when we are constantly
and uninterruptedly aware of him . . . as the possessor of our being
and above us as the ruler of all its workings and they become to us
nothing but a manifestation of him in the existence of the Jiva”; a
state of perception (bhāva) of brahmadarśana in which Kr.s.n.a is seen
everywhere.
Kr.s.n.abodha (Krishnabodha) ~ awareness of Kr.s.n.a in the brahKrsnabodha
madarśana.
Kr.s.n.adarśana (Krishnadarshana; Krishna-darshana; Krishna darKrsnadarsana
shana; Krishnadarshan) ~ the vision of Kr.s.n.a, the para purus.a or
purus.ottama, seen in relation to the world as the transcendent and
universal ānandamaya purus.a and ı̄śvara who is “not only the origin
and spiritual container, but the spiritual inhabitant in all forces, in
all things and in all beings, and not only the inhabitant but . . .
himself all energies and forces, all things and all beings”, a form
of darśana regarded as the highest bhāva of brahmadarśana or as

a distinct darśana related to ı̄śvaradarśana. The three intensities
of Kr.s.n.adarśana in human beings (applicable with modifications to
all things and beings) are described in the entry of 30 May 1915
as (1) “Krishna seen behind the human mask” (distinguished from
the preliminary stage, “Krishna sensed behind the disguise”), (2)
“Krishna seen in the human being”, and (3) “The human being seen
in Krishna” (with three degrees of the third intensity, the vision of
sarvamaya, anantagun.amaya and ānandamaya Kr.s.n.a), leading to
the consummation: “The human being = Krishna”.
Kr.s.n.adr.s.t.i (Krishnadrishti) ~ same as Kr.s.n.adarśana.
Krsnadrsti
Kr.s.n.ah., Kālı̄, kāmah., karma iti karmacatus.t.ayam (Krishnah, Kali,
Krsnah,
kamah, karma iti karmachatushtayam) ~ Kr.s.n.a, Kālı̄, kāma1 and
karma: these constitute the karma catus.t.aya.
Kr.s.n.akālı̄ (Krishnakali; KrishnaKali; Krishna-Kali; Krishna Kali) ~
Krsnakali
(also called Kālı̄kr.s.n.a) the union of Kr.s.n.a and Kālı̄, forming the “subjective base” of karma; Kālı̄ as prakr.ti surrendering herself in a relation
of (madhura) dāsya to Kr.s.n.a, the purus.a; “a complete union of the
two sides of the Duality” of ı̄śvara-śakti which, when it rules one’s
consciousness, can draw it “altogether out of the confused clash of
Ideas and Forces here into a higher Truth and enable the descent of
that Truth to illumine and deliver and act sovereignly upon this world
of Ignorance”; the same union of Kr.s.n.a and Kālı̄ seen everywhere in the
vision (darśana) of the external world, a perception which because of
its “vivid personality” is regarded as superior to that of purus.a-prakr.ti;
short for Kr.s.n.akālı̄ bhāva or Kr.s.n.akālı̄ darśana.
Kr
Krsnakali
bhāva (Krishnakali bhava; Krishna-Kali -; Krishna Kali -)
. s.n.akālı̄ bhava
~ (also called Kālı̄-Kr.s.n.a bhāva) the realisation of Kr.s.n.akālı̄, a state
of simultaneous Kr.s.n.abhāva and Kālı̄bhāva, in which the individual
soul (jı̄va) experiences “at once its oneness with the Ishwara [Kr.s.n.a]
and its oneness with the Prakriti [Kālı̄]” and can “enjoy all relations
with Infinite and finite, with God and the universe and beings in the
universe in the highest terms of the union of the universal Purusha and
Prakriti”; a state of perception (bhāva) of brahmadarśana in which
Kr.s.n.a and Kālı̄ are seen everywhere.
Kr.s.n.akālı̄ darśana (Krishnakali darshana; Krishnakali-darshana;
Krsnakali
Krishna-Kali-darshana) ~ the vision of Kr.s.n.akālı̄ in all, a state of
perception (bhāva) in brahmadarśana where, after we become “able

to hold consistently and vividly the settled perception of the One in
all things and beings”, we see “in the One . . . the Master [ı̄śvara] and
His Power [śakti], ~ Krishna and Kali”.
Krsna
Kr
nāma (Krishna nama) ~ the name (nāma) of Kr.s.n.a, the symbol
. s.n.a nama
of his “power, quality, character of being caught up by the consciousness and made conceivable”.
Kr
Krsna-Narayana
. s.n.a-Nārāyan.a (Krishna-Narayana; Krishna Narayana) ~ Kr.s.n.a,
the supreme Being (para purus.a), seen revealing himself as Nārāyan.a,
“the God in man who is also the Lord in the universe”; a bhāva of
brahmadarśana in which Kr.s.n.a is perceived as “the Purushottama,
the supreme Divinity who becomes manifest within us as Narayana,
Lord of all our being and action seated secret in our hearts for
ever”, regarded as superior to a vision of the universal Nārāyan.a not
accompanied by a sense of the transcendental personality of Kr.s.n.a.
Kr.s.n.anr.tya (Krishnanritya) ~ the dance of Kr.s.n.a, “a whirl of mighty
Krsnanrtya
energies, but the Master of the dance holds the hands of His energies
and keeps them to the rhythmic order”.
Kr.s.n.a-purus.a (Krishna-purusha) ~ Kr.s.n.a as the conscious being who
Krsna-purusa
is the lord of Nature.
kr.s.n.a-sūrya (krishna-surya) ~ black sun.
krsna-surya
kr.ti (kriti) ~ action, work; same as karma, especially the political part
krti
of karma.
ks.ara (kshara) ~ mutable, changing; brahman manifest in the mutable
ksara
world, “the spiritual principle of the mobile working of things”; “the
cosmic spirit in Time”, the active status of the purus.ottama “in his eternal multiplicity” as “the spirit in the mutability of cosmic phenomenon
and becoming”.
ks.ara purus.a (kshara purusha) ~ the soul in Nature, the mutable
ksara
purus.a; “the spirit of mutable things”, manifesting “the multiplicity
of the divine Being . . . not apart from, but in Prakriti”.
ks.atram (kshatram) ~ “Kshatriyahood”; the inner nature of the
ksatram
ks.atriya.
ks.atraśakti (kshatrashakti) ~ the soul-power of will and strength
ksatrasakti
which reveals itself in the ks.atriya.
ks.atratejas (kshatratejas) ~ the energy that manifests itself in the
ksatratejas
ks.atriya temperament.
ks.atriya (kshatriya) ~ the soul-type representing “the Divine as
ksatriya


power”, the second element in the fourfold personality symbolised
by the cāturvarn.ya.
ks
ksatriya
viryam (kshatriya viryam) ~ the strength of character proper
. atriya vı̄ryam
to the ks.atriya element in the fourfold personality.
ks
ksaya
. aya (kshaya) ~ loss, diminution.
ks
ksaya
. aya (kshaya) ~ habitation.
ks.etra (kshetra) ~ field; same as sādhana-ks.etra.
ksetra
kshara ~ see ks.ara.
kshatram, etc. ~ see ks.atram, etc.
kshatram
kshatriya ~ see ks.atriya.
kshaya ~ see ks.aya.
kshetra ~ see ks.etra.
kshiprakarita ~ see ks.iprakāritā.
kshiprata ~ see ks.ipratā.
kshobha ~ see ks.obha.
kshutpipasa ~ see ks.utpipāsā.
ks.iprakāritā (kshiprakarita) ~ swiftness of action.
ksiprakarita
ks.ipratā (kshiprata) ~ swiftness; a term in the second general formula
ksiprata
of the śakti catus.t.aya.
ks.obha (kshobha) ~ disturbance.
ksobha
ks.utpipāsā (kshutpipasa) ~ hunger and thirst, a duality (dvandva) of
ksutpipasa
the physical prān.a.
kumāra (kumara) ~ a youth, young man; prince; (on page 399, referkumara
ring to a sortilege consisting of the title Daśakumāracaritam, “The Adventures of the Ten Princes”, a Sanskrit work by Dan.d.in) interpreted
to mean purus.a in the sense of an evolutionary type.
kumbhaka ~ cessation of the breathing in the practice of prān.āyāma.
kun.d.alinı̄ ~ “the coiled and sleeping serpent of Energy” in the lowest
kundalini
cakra which, when awakened by certain processes of yoga, “ascends
in light through the opening centres to meet the Divine in the highest
centre and so connect the manifest and the unmanifested, joining spirit
and Matter”.
kun.t.ha ~ dull.
kuntha
Kutsa ~ a Vedic r.s.i, companion of Indra; his name is interpreted in
the translation of a sortilege from R
. g Veda 5.31.9 to mean “SensePleasure”, explained as the intensity of subjective ānanda in relation
to sensory experience.


.la cuisine Française
Francaise [French] ~ French cooking.
.laghima
laghimā ~ lightness; one of the siddhis of the body: a “power of lightness, that is to say of freedom from all pressure or weighing down in
the mental, pranic or physical being” by which “it is possible to get
rid of weariness and exhaustion and to overcome gravitation”.
laghim
laghima-mahima
ā-mahimā ~ the combination of laghimā and mahimā.
laghu mahima
mahimā ~ mahimā containing laghimā.
laghutā ~ lightness, an element of dehaśakti: “a lightness, swiftness
laghuta
and adaptability of the nervous and physical being”.
laghutvam (laghutwam) ~ same as laghutā.
la guerre en Orient [French] ~ war in the East.
Laks.mı̄ (Luxmi) ~ the goddess of beauty and prosperity.
Laksmi
lālityam ~ charm; an element of Mahālaks.mı̄ bhāva.
lalityam
laukika (laukic) ~ worldly.
laya ~ dissolution, disappearance; annullation of the individual soul
in the Infinite.
lekhā ~ writing.
lekha
le nombre d’êtres en moi [French] ~ the number of beings in me.
Le Pourquoi des Mondes [French] ~ “The Wherefore of the Worlds”,
title of a series contributed to the Arya by Paul Richard.
le reśultat
resultat decisif
décisif [French] ~ the decisive result.
les debats
débats [French] ~ the proceedings.
Les Dieux [French] ~ “The Gods”, title of a book by Paul Richard.
les journalistes [French] ~ the journalists.
les meilleures dispositions [French] ~ the best disposition.
liberated intelligence ~ see higher mind.
lı̄lā ~ play, game; the world as a game of the Lord or ı̄śvara, “a play of
lila
the divine Being with the conditions of cosmic existence in this world
of an inferior Nature”; life (especially in the objective world or field
of karma, as distinguished from yoga) “experienced as a play of the
divine Delight”.
lı̄lācatus.t.aya (lilachatusthaya) ~ the quaternary of the divine play;
lilacatustaya
another name for the karma catus.t.aya.
lı̄lāmaya ~ playful; enjoying the cosmic game; pertaining to the lı̄lā;
lilamaya
(sagun.a brahman) perceived as pouring out the delight of existence


(ānanda) into the play of the world; (“the Lilamaya”) short for
lı̄lāmaya ı̄śvara or lı̄lāmaya purus.a, the Lord or Soul of bliss who
“can play with the manifestation without being imbued with the
Ignorance”.
lı̄lāmaya ānanda brahman ~ ānandaṁ brahma seen as expressing
its universal delight through the lı̄lā of the world.
lı̄l
lilamaya
āmaya darsana
darśana (lilamaya darshana) ~ the vision of the lı̄lāmaya
ı̄śvara / purus.a in all, a form of darśana in which one is “aware of
the whole world as the expression, play or Lila of an infinite divine
personality”.
lilamaya
lı̄l
āmaya ı̄śvara
isvara (lilamaya ishwara) ~ the Lord of the cosmic lı̄lā, “the
mighty Lord of Nature, who . . . enjoys with his universal delight this
play of her figures of his own being”; the ı̄śvara as “our Playmate in the
great world-game who has disguised himself throughout as friend and
enemy, helper and opponent and, in all relations and in all workings
that affect us, has led our steps towards our perfection and our release”.
lı̄l
lilamaya
āmaya ı̄śvaradarśana
isvaradarsana (lilamaya ishwaradarshan; lilamaya ishwara
darshana) ~ vision of the lı̄lāmaya ı̄śvara, by which the manifestation
is seen as a “play of the Lord who is in His being all delight”.
lilamaya
lı̄l
āmaya Kr
Krsna
. s.n.a (lilamaya Krishna) ~ Kr.s.n.a as the lı̄lāmaya ı̄śvara /
purus.a, “the eternal Child frolicing in the Universe, the Playmate,
Lover, Master, Teacher and Friend of all His creations”, he “who draws
all of us to him by his love, compels all of us by his masteries and plays
his eternal play of joy and strength and beauty in the manifold world”.
lı̄l
lilamaya
āmaya N
Narayana
ārāyan.a ~ Nārāyan.a seen in relation to the cosmic game
or lı̄lā as an aspect of the “divine Anandamaya personality” at play in
the world.
lı̄lāmaya para purus.a (lilamaya para purusha) ~ the supreme lı̄lālilamaya
maya purus.a, often referred to as lı̄lāmaya Kr.s.n.a.
lı̄l
lilamaya
āmaya purusa
purus.a (lilamaya purusha) ~ the purus.a as the enjoyer and
master of the lı̄lā: “the Soul of things eternally young, perpetually inexhaustible, creating and re-creating Himself in Himself for the sheer
bliss of that self-creation, of that self-representation, ~ Himself the
play, Himself the player, Himself the playground”.
lı̄lāmaya sagun.a ~ sagun.a brahman perceived in relation to the
lilamaya
world-play or lı̄lā with a sense of “the lilamaya personality of the
Brahman”.

.lı̄l
lilamaya
āmaya upalabdhi ~ realisation of the lı̄lāmaya sagun.a or lı̄lāmaya
ı̄śvara / purus.a in brahmadarśana.
.linga
liṅga ~ (literally) mark, sign, characteristic; subtle, carrying the essential characteristics of the thing itself; a subtle form or emanation; the
male organ; an iconic representation of Śiva.
liṅga-rūpa ~ subtle form.
linga-rupa
linga
li
ṅga sarira
śarı̄ra (linga sharira; linga sharir) ~ subtle body or emanation.
lipi ~ writing seen with the subtle vision; the faculty of seeing such
writing (same as lipi-dr.s.t.i).
lipi catus
catustaya
. t.aya (lipi chatusthaya) ~ lipi seen in the four states of
samādhi: bahirdarśı̄ jāgrat, antardarśı̄ jāgrat, svapnasamādhi and
sus.upti.
lipi-dr.s.t.i (lipi-drishti) ~ the faculty of seeing writing (lipi) with the
lipi-drsti
subtle vision.
lipikauśalya (lipikaushalya; lipi-kaushalya; lipi kaushalya) ~ skilfullipikausalya
ness or formal perfection of lipi, consisting especially of the varied use
of akashic material.
lipi-trik
lipi-trikaladrsti
āladr.s.t.i (lipi-trikaldrishti; lipi trikaldrishti) ~ trikāladr.s.t.i, especially prediction, by means of lipi.
lipsā ~ wish, seeking; the will to have something; the urge to engage
lipsa
in or achieve something; “divine desireless reaching out of Brahman in
personality to Brahman in the vishaya or object”; the tendency towards
self-fulfilment of a particular kind, expressed in one attribute of each
of the four elements of vı̄rya and of each of the four aspects of daivı̄
prakr.ti.
littéraires [French] ~ literary.
litteraires
lobha ~ greed.
logistic ~ relating to the divine reason or logos; belonging to the first
plane of ideality, whose action most resembles the human faculty of
reasoning.
logistical ~ same as logistic.
logistic dr
drsti
. s.t.i (drishti) ~ same as logistic revelation or revelatory logistis.
logistic gnosis ~ same as logistic ideality.
logistic ideality ~ the plane of luminous reason, the lowest of the three
planes of ideality; its essence is smr.ti (intuition and discrimination, the
latter often regarded as inherent in the former) and it has three levels


with three or more forms of each, based on various combinations
of intuition with inspiration and revelation, the higher faculties of
jñāna. On each successive level, “the lower first calls down into itself
and is then taken up into the higher, so that on each level all the
three elevations are reproduced, but always there predominates in the
thought essence the character that belongs to that level’s proper form
of consciousness”. The logistic ideality of 1919-20 may be correlated
with the “intuitive” level of higher mind in the diagram on page 1360
(c. 1931).
logistic revelation ~ revelation on the plane of logistic ideality; same
as revelatory logistis or (in 1920) intuitive revelatory logistis.
logistic seer ideality ~ same as seer logistis.
logistic tapas ~ tapas acting on any level of logistic ideality.
logistic vijñana
ñāna ~ same as logistic ideality.
logistis ~ same as logistic ideality; in October 1920, restricted to intuitive ideality as the lowest level of logos vijñāna.
logistis in the hermesis ~ the lowest level of hermetic ideality.
logos [Greek] ~ the universal reason at work in the cosmos; the divine
reason; short for logos vijñāna.
logos reason ~ a term used in October 1920 for the second level of logos vijñāna; it is defined as “the lower representative idea”, apparently
referring to the form of intuitive revelatory logistis previously called
representative revelatory vijñāna.
logos vijññana
āna [Greek and Sanskrit] ~ a term used in October 1920 for
three levels encompassing much of what was formerly called logistic
ideality; applied more specifically to the highest of these levels, also
termed highest representative ideality, which corresponds to full revelatory ideality and “has to deal with three movements”: actualities,
potentialities and the “imperatives of the infinite”.
lointain [French] ~ distant.
loka ~ “a way in which conscious being images itself”, a world or plane of existence, including planes other than the material world, with which we may come into contact by “an opening of our mind and life parts to a great range of subjective-objective experiences in which these planes present themselves no longer as extensions of subjective being and consciousness, but as worlds; for the experiences there are organised as they are in our own world, but on a different plan, with a different process and law of action and in a substance which belongs to a supraphysical Nature”. The principal lokas, described as the “seven worlds”, are in ascending order: bhū (the world of anna1, matter), bhuvar (the world of prān.a, life-force), svar (the world of manas,mind), maharloka (the world of vijñāna, gnosis), janaloka (the world of ānanda, bliss), tapoloka (the world of [cit-]tapas, [consciousness]force), and satyaloka (the world of sat, absolute existence); when the three highest planes are combined into one world of saccidānanda (existence-consciousness-bliss), the result is a scheme of five worlds, sometimes counted in descending order so that bhū becomes the fifth.
lokadarśanam (lokadarshanam) ~ same as lokadr.s.t.i.
lokadarsanam
lokadr.s.t.i (lokadrishti) ~ vision of the worlds, knowledge of the planes of existence (lokas). It includes ihalokadr.s.t.i, vision of this world, and paralokadr.s.t.i, vision of other worlds.
lokoparati ~ world-renunciation.
lorsque l’esprit alors assemble les données et assouplit assez sa langue
pour les traduire synthétiquement [French] ~ when the mind gathers the data and makes its language supple enough to translate them
synthetically.
lower representative ~ in October 1920, equivalent to what representative had meant earlier in that year, when it referred to a form
of intuitive revelatory logistis; this came to be described as “lower
representative” when representative vijñāna came to mean highest
representative ideality.
lower revelatory ~ (in 1920) a term used for a form or forms of logistic
ideality other than the highest kinds of revelatory logistis, but containing an element of revelation, such as revelatory intuition, revelatory
inspired logistis or the lower forms of intuitive revelatory logistis.
lower revelatory representative ~ pertaining to a form of intuitive revelatory logistis that combines lower revelatory and representative elements.
luminous ideal reason ~ same as luminous reason.
luminous reason ~ the supra-intellectual faculty (vijñāna) acting on
the plane of logistic ideality, which is the “lowest total stage” of the
triple ideal supermind; also called the divine reason.
luminous revelatory reason ~ same as revelatory logistis.
Luxmi ~ see Laks.mı̄.
1
.M3 ~ a combination of three of the four aspects of daivı̄ prakr.ti (e.g.,
Maheśvarı̄, Mahākālı̄ and Mahāsarasvatı̄).
.M4 ~ a combination of all four aspects of daivı̄ prakr.ti: Maheśvarı̄,
Mahākālı̄, Mahālaks.mı̄ and Mahāsarasvatı̄; same as quadruple
bhāva.
madhu ~ honey; sweetness, “the entire sweetness of existence, the
honey, the delight that is the food of the soul”; the intoxication of the
soma1 pervading the mental body.
madhura (madhura; madhur) ~ sweet; blissful; short for madhura
rasa, the sweet taste perceived by rasadr.s.t.i; short for madhura bhāva
or madhura dāsya, the relation of ecstatic love and surrender to
the Divine that brings the highest experience of “the sweetness and
intimate control of the divine Personality”.
madhura bh
bhava
āva (madhurabhava; madhur bhava)~the sweet (madhura) relation (bhāva) between the jı̄va and the ı̄śvara (or between Kālı̄
and Kr.s.n.a), the relation of lover and beloved which “is the most
intense and blissful of all and carries up all the rest into its heights”
(see composite bhāva); the spiritual emotion proper to that relation, in
which “the turning of human emotion Godwards finds its full meaning
and discovers all the truth of which love is the human symbol, all its
essential instincts divinised, raised, satisfied in the bliss from which our
life was born and towards which by oneness it returns in the Ananda
of the divine existence where love is absolute, eternal and unalloyed”.
madhura
madhur
ā d
dasi
āsı̄ ~ literally “sweet slave-girl”, the dāsı̄ serving her Lord
in a relation of madhura bhāva; a symbol of the state of madhura
dāsya, the condition of “the living and loving instrument” (yantra),
when it “ends in the whole nature of our being becoming the slave of
God, rejoicing in his possession and its own blissful subjection to the
divine grasp and mastery”.
madhura d
dasya
āsya (madhura dasya; madhuradasya; madhura-dasya) ~
dāsya in the relation of madhura bhāva, “passionate service to the
divine Beloved”, giving “that joy of mastery of the finite nature by the
Infinite and of service to the Highest by which there comes freedom
from the ego and the lower nature”; the condition symbolised by the
madhurā dāsı̄, in which the jı̄va or prakr.ti is the enamoured “slave”
2
of the ı̄śvara so that with “a passionate delight it does all he wills it to
do without questioning and bears all he would have it bear, because
what it bears is the burden of the beloved being”.
madhura-d
madhura-dasya
āsya bh
bhava
āva (madhura-dasya bhava; madhura dasya bhava)
~ the state, feeling or relation of rapturous surrender.
madhura rasa ~ sweet taste; the subtle taste (sūks.ma rasa) of sweetness, one of the tastes perceived by the faculty of rasadr.s.t.i.
mādhurya ~ sweetness; “the intoxicating sweetness of the Divine”,
madhurya
experienced in connection with the Mahālaks.mı̄ “colouring” of
devı̄bhāva.
madirā ~ wine, liquor, any intoxicating drink; a form of kāmānanda
madira
felt pervading the sūks.ma deha and sometimes the sthūla deha, so that
“even the physical body takes its share of the joy, feels the touch, is
filled in all its limbs, veins, nerves with the ﬂowing of the wine of the
ecstasy, amr.ta”.
madirāmaya (madiramaya; madiramay) ~ consisting of madirā.
madiramaya
madya ~ wine.
Māgha ~ the name of a classical Sanskrit author, writer of the epic
Magha
Śiśupālavadha.
mahābuddhi ~ great buddhi; the supreme creative intelligence of mahabuddhi janaloka, the world of ānanda above that of vijñāna; also, vijñāna itself.
mahadbhāva (mahadbhava; mahadbhav) ~ largeness, vastness, greatmahadbhavaness, wideness.
mahad brahma ~ (c. December 1926) the world of “Divine Truth and Vastness”, containing seven planes where brahman is manifest in terms of satyam r.taṁ br.hat; same as vijñāna loka.
mahājana ~ the great all-productive principle of janaloka (the world mahajana of ānanda).
Mahākālı̄ ~ one of the four personalities of the śakti or devı̄: the Mahakali goddess of strength and swiftness, who is the “inhabitant” occupying the Mahāsarasvatı̄ “continent” in the harmony of the aspects of daivı̄ prakr.ti, and whose manifestation in the temperament (Mahākālı̄ bhāva) brings the force (Mahākālı̄ tapas) needed for the rapid achievement of the divine work; sometimes short for Mahākālı̄ bhāva.
Mahākālı̄ bhava bhāva (Mahakalibhava; Mahakali bhava) ~ the Mahākālı̄ aspect of devı̄bhāva; the temperament of Mahākālı̄, the personality of the śakti or devı̄ who “embodies her power of splendid strength and irresistible passion, her warrior mood, her overwhelming will, her
impetuous swiftness and world-shaking force”.
Mahākālı̄ ks ksiprakarita . iprakāritā (Mahakali kshiprakarita) ~ the swiftness in action of Mahakālı̄.
Mahākālı̄-Mahāsarasvatı̄ (Mahakali-Mahasaraswati; Mahakali Mahasaraswati) ~ the combination of Mahakālı̄ (bhāva) and Mahāsarasvatı̄ (bhāva), in which Mahakālı̄ “imparts to the slow and difficult labour after perfection an impetus that multiplies the power and shortens the long way”. For Sri Aurobindo’s sādhana as documented in the Record of Yoga, this was the most important of the various combinations of two aspects of daivı̄ prakr.ti, because - while the “method chosen for preparation” was that of Mahāsarasvatı̄ - “the method chosen for fulfilment” was “Mahakali’s in the Mahasaraswati mould”, on “the basis of hidden calm & self-possession” provided by Maheśvarı̄ and strongly coloured by Mahālaks.mı̄.
Mahākālı̄-Mahāsarasvatı̄ bhāva (Mahakali-Mahasaraswati bhava) ~ the Mahākālı̄-Mahāsarasvatı̄ temperament, a combination of Mahakālı̄ bhāva and Mahāsarasvatı̄ bhāva.
Mah
Mahakali-Mahasarasvati
ākālı̄-Mahāsarasvatı̄ prakr.ti-aṁśa (Mahakali-Mahasaraswati prakriti-angsha) ~ a portion of universal Nature expressing the Mahākālı̄-Mahāsarasvatı̄ combination of the aspects of the divine śakti.
Mahākālı̄ Mahāsarasvatı̄ tapas (Mahakali Mahasaraswati tapas) ~ the force of Mahākālı̄-Mahāsarasvatı̄, a reconciliation of active and passive tapas in which the swiftness of Mahākālı̄ is one with the perfection of Mahāsarasvatı̄.
Mahākālı̄ pravr.tti (Mahakali pravritti) ~ the dynamism of Mahākālı̄.
Mahākālı̄-śakti (Mahakali-shakti) ~ the Mahākālı̄ aspect of the divine śakti as it manifests in the human temperament.
Mahākālı̄ tapas ~ the victorious force of Mahākālı̄.
mahākāran.a ~ the first cause, the “cause of all causes”; satyaloka, the world of sat, as the supreme plane of original causality.
Mahālaks.mı̄ (Mahalakshmi; Mahalaxmi; Mahaluxmi) ~ one of the Mahalaksmi four personalities of the śakti or devı̄: the goddess of beauty, love and delight, whose manifestation in the temperament (Mahālaks.mı̄ bhāva) gives its “colouring” to the combination of the aspects of daivı̄ prakr.ti; sometimes short for Mahālaks.mı̄ bhāva.
.Mahālaks.mı̄ bhāva (Mahalakshmi bhava; Mahaluxmi bhava) ~ the
Mahālaks.mı̄ aspect of devı̄bhāva; the temperament of Mahālaks.mı̄,
the personality of the śakti or devı̄ who “is vivid and sweet and wonderful with her deep secret of beauty and harmony and fine rhythm, her
intricate and subtle opulence, her compelling attraction and captivating
grace”.
Mahālaks.mı̄-Mahākālı̄ (Mahalaxmi-Mahakali) ~ the combination of Mahalaks.mı̄ (bhāva) and Mahākālı̄ (bhāva), in which Mahalaks.mı̄ “teaches to strength and force the rhythm that keeps the might of their acts harmonious and in measure” and Mahākālı̄ “brings to beauty andharmony a high and mounting movement”.
Mahālaks.mı̄-Mahāsarasvatı̄ (Mahalakshmi-Mahasaraswati; Mahalaxmi-; Mahaluxmi-) ~ the combination of Mahalaks.mı̄ (bhāva) and Mahāsarasvatı̄ (bhāva), divine harmony and divine perfection, in which Mahalaks.mı̄ “casts on perfection the charm that makes it endure for ever”.
mahāmāyā ~ the vast power of “comprehending, measuring, formmahamaya
ing Knowledge [māyā] . . . in the undivided being” of Aditi; “the
Consciousness-Puissance of the Eternal [brahman], timeless and illimitable beyond the universe, but spread out here under a mask of
bright and dark opposites for the miracle of the slow manifestation of
the Divine in Mind and Life and Matter”.
mahān (mahan) ~ great, large, vast (masculine of mahat).
mahāpanthā (mahapantha) ~ great path.
maharloka ~ the world (loka) of vastness (mahas); the plane whose basis is vijñāna or supermind, which links saccidānanda in the higher hemisphere of existence (parārdha) with the mental, vital and physical principles in the lower hemisphere (aparārdha) and makes it possible
“to realise the one Existence, Consciousness, Delight in the mould of the mind, life and body”.
mahas ~ “the great, the vast”, “the infinity of the Truth”; same as maharloka.
mahāśakti (mahashakti) ~ the cosmic śakti of the ı̄śvara, “the univermahasakti sal Mother”, who “works out whatever is transmitted by her transcendent consciousness from the Supreme and enters into the worlds that she has made”.
.Mahasarasvati
Mahāsarasvatı̄ (Mahasaraswati) ~ one of the four personalities of the śakti or devı̄: the goddess of skill and work, whose manifestation in the temperament (Mahāsarasvatı̄ bhāva) is the “continent” occupied by the force of Mahākālı̄ in the intended combination of the aspects of daivı̄ prakr.ti; sometimes short for Mahāsarasvatı̄ bhāva.
Mahāsarasvatı̄ bhāva (Mahasaraswati bhava) ~ the Mahāsarasvatı̄ aspect of devı̄bhāva; the temperament of Mahāsarasvatı̄, the personality of the śakti or devı̄ who “is equipped with her close and profound capacity of intimate knowledge and careful ﬂawless work and quiet and exact perfection in all things”.
Mah
Mahasarasvati-Mahakali
āsarasvatı̄-Mahākālı̄ (Mahasaraswati-Mahakali) ~ same as Mahakālı̄-Mahāsarasvatı̄.
Mah
Mahasarasvati-Mahesvari
āsarasvatı̄-Maheśvarı̄ (Mahasaraswati-Maheshwari) ~ same as
Maheśvarı̄-Mahāsarasvatı̄.
Mahāsarasvatı̄ prakr.ti (Mahasaraswati prakriti) ~ the MahāsarasMahasarasvati
vatı̄ nature; prakr.ti expressing the Mahāsarasvatı̄ aspect of the divine
śakti.
Mah
Mahasarasvati
āsarasvatı̄ tapas (Mahasaraswati tapas) ~ the patient and laborious force of Mahāsarasvatı̄.
Mah
Mahasarasvati
āsarasvatı̄ vibhuti
vibhūti (Mahasaraswati vibhuti) ~ manifestation in human nature of the qualities of Mahāsarasvatı̄.
mahashakti ~ see mahāśakti.
mahat ~ great; large, vast; containing mahimā; the vastness of vijñāna.
mahātapas ~ the supreme force; the dynamic principle of tapoloka,
mahatapas
the world of (cit-)tapas.
mahatı̄ ~ great; large, vast (feminine of mahat).
mahati
mahat laghima
laghimā (mahat laghima; mahat-laghima) ~ laghimā containing mahimā.
mahātmā ~ great soul.
mahatma
mahattva (mahattwa; mahattwam) ~ greatness, largeness, vastness; a term in the first general formula of the śakti catus.t.aya; “a greatness of sustaining force”, an  element of dehaśakti; sometimes equivalent to mahimā.
mahattvabodho, balaślāghā, laghutā, dhāran.asāmarthyam iti dehaśaktih. (mahattwabodho, balaslagha, laghuta, dharanasamarthyam iti
dehashakti) ~ the sense of a greatness of sustaining force, assertion of strength, lightness, the capacity to hold all workings of energy: these
constitute the power of the body. 
mahattvabodho, balaślāghā, laghutvaṁ, dhāran.asāmarthyam (mahattwabodho, balaslagha, laghutwam, dharanasamarthyam) ~ the
sense of a greatness of sustaining force, assertion of strength, lightness,
the capacity to hold all workings of energy (the elements of dehaśakti).
mahattwa; mahattwam ~ see mahattva.
Mahāvı̄ra ~ (literally “the great hero”, an epithet of Śrı̄kr.s.n.a) the
Mahavira
aspect of the fourfold ı̄śvara whose śakti is Maheśvarı̄, corresponding
to the brāhman.a who represents the cosmic principle of Wisdom in the
symbolism of the cāturvarn.ya; he is identified with Śiva or Maheśvara.
Mahāvis.n.u (Mahavishnu) ~ Vis.n.u as virāt., the Soul of the material
Mahavisnu
world.
Maheśvara (Maheshwara) ~ a name of Śiva; (also called Mahāvı̄ra)
Mahesvara
the aspect of the fourfold ı̄śvara whose śakti is Maheśvarı̄; same as
Maheśvara bhāva.
Maheśvara
Mahesvara bh
bhava
āva (Maheshwara bhava) ~ the temperament of Maheśvara; manifestation of the Maheśvara personality of the fourfold
ı̄śvara.
Maheśvarı̄ (Maheshwari; Maheswari) ~ one of the four personalities of the śakti or devı̄: the goddess of wideness and calm, whose manifestation in the temperament (Maheśvarı̄ bhāva) is the pratis.t.hā or basis for the combination of the aspects of daivı̄ prakr.ti; sometimes short for Maheśvarı̄ bhāva. According to an entry on 18 March 1917, until then there had been only one very early manifestation of “Maheshwari herself”; what was referred to as Maheśvarı̄ was usually her manifestation in another śakti as part of the preparation of the pratis.t.hā for the full daivı̄ prakr.ti.
Maheśvarı̄
Mahesvari bhava
bhāva (Maheshwari bhava; Maheshwari-bhava; Maheswari bhava) ~ the Maheśvarı̄ aspect of devı̄bhāva; the temperament
of Maheśvarı̄, the śakti or devı̄ in “her personality of calm wideness
and comprehending wisdom and tranquil benignity and inexhaustible
compassion and sovereign and surpassing majesty and all-ruling
greatness”.
Maheśvarı̄-Mah
Mahesvari-Mahalaksmi
ālaks.mı̄ (Maheswari-Mahalakshmi) ~ the combination of Maheśvarı̄ (bhāva) and Mahālaks.mı̄ (bhāva), a harmony of
divine calm and divine delight.
aheśvarı̄-Mah
Mahesvari-Mahalaksmi-Mahasarasvati
ālaks.mı̄-Mahāsarasvatı̄
107
(Maheshwari-MahaluxmiMahasaraswati) ~ the combination of Maheśvarı̄ (bhāva), Mahālaks.mı̄ (bhāva) and Mahāsarasvatı̄ (bhāva), three of the four aspects
of daivı̄ prakr.ti or devı̄bhāva, with Mahākālı̄ (bhāva), the aspect of
strength and swiftness, “contained and dominated” by the others.
Maheśvarı̄-Mah
Mahesvari-Mahasarasvati
āsarasvatı̄ (Maheshwari-Mahasaraswati) ~ the combination of Maheśvarı̄ (bhāva) and Mahāsarasvatı̄ (bhāva), characterised by a “slow and regular unhasting pressure” favourable to
luminous and effective vijñāna, but lacking in the intensity of the
Mahākālı̄ energy.
Maheśvarı̄-Mah
Mahesvari-Mahasarasvati
āsarasvatı̄ śsanti
ānti (Maheshwari-Mahasaraswati shanti)
~ the passive calm of Maheśvarı̄-Mahāsarasvatı̄.
Maheśvarı̄
Mahesvari pratistha
pratis.t.hā (Maheshwari pratistha) ~ the Maheśvarı̄ bhāva
as the calm base that supports the combined working of the other
aspects of daivı̄ prakr.ti.
mahimā ~ greatness, largeness; one of the siddhis of the body: “unmahima
hampered force in the mental power or in the physical power”, showing itself physically by “an abnormal strength which is not muscular”;
also, an attribute of Mahāvı̄ra.
mahim
mahima-laghima
ā-laghimā ~ the combination of mahimā and laghimā.
maithuna ~ (literally “sexual”) pertaining to or short for maithunānanda.
maithuna ānanda
ananda ~ same as maithunānanda.
maithun
maithunananda
ānanda ~ an intensity of kāmānanda comparable in some
way to sexual ecstasy: a kind of physical ānanda born of brahmānanda
“which is far higher, finer and more intense than the sexual, but of
which the sexual is a coarse and excited degradation”; another term
for kāmānanda itself as one of the five forms of śārı̄rānanda.
manah. ~ same as manas.
manah.kośa (manahkosha; manah-kosha) ~ the sheath (kośa) commanahkosa posed of mental substance, “the mental sheath or subtle body in which our true mental being [manomaya purus.a] lives”.
manapamanabodha
ānāpamānabodha ~ the sense of honour and disgrace.
manas ~ mind, the psychological principle or degree of consciousness
that is the basis of the mental world (manoloka or svar), the highest
plane of the triloka and the summit of the aparārdha or lower hemisphere of existence; in its essence, “a consciousness which measures,

8
limits, cuts out forms of things from the indivisible whole and contains
them as if each were a separate integer”; the sensational mind, “the
original sense [indriya] which perceives all objects and reacts upon
them”, capable not only of “a translation into sense of so much of the
outer impacts as it receives through the nervous system and the physical
organs”, but also of “a subtle sight, hearing, power of contact of its
own which is not dependent on the physical organs”; the principle that
governs the realm of svarga, the lower plane of svar; (on page 1281)
the name of a particular svarga.
mānasa ~ mental; pertaining to manas, having the nature of mind in
manasa
general or of the sensational mind; mentality; subtle sense-perception
(vis.ayadr.s.t.i) on the mental plane by means of the inner manas.
manasa
ānasa abhy
abhyasa
āsa ~ mental repetition.
manasa
ānasa buddhi (manasabuddhi; manasa buddhi; manasbuddhi; manas-buddhi) ~ the mental reason, the reasoning intellect; the buddhi
or thinking mind in its ordinary forms (distinguished from the
vijñānabuddhi or intuitive mind), as a faculty of prajñāna (“apprehending consciousness” or intelligence) separated from vijñāna;
“the mental intelligence and will” which “are only a focus of diffused and deﬂected rays and reﬂections” of “the sun of the divine
Knowledge-Will burning in the heavens of the supreme conscious
Being”.
mānasa-dr.s.t.i (manas-drishti) ~ mental vision; perception by the
manasa-drsti
manas, “an inner or subliminal mental consciousness and sense
capable of perceiving and experiencing directly, not only the life
forces and their play and results and phenomena, but the mental
and psychical worlds and all they contain and the mental activities,
vibrations, phenomena, forms, images of this world also”.
manasa
ānasa ketu (manasaketu; manasa ketu) ~ mental perception; “telepathic mind”.
manasa
ānasa loka ~ the mental world, same as manoloka.
mānasasmr.ti (manasasmriti) ~ mental smr.ti.
manasasmrti
manas brahman ~ brahman experienced on the mental level.
manasbuddhi ~ see mānasabuddhi.
manas-citta (manas-chitta; manas chitta) ~ the emotional mind, “the
life of sensations and emotions which are at the mercy of the outward
touches of life and matter and their positive or negative reactions,
9
joy and grief, pleasure and pain”, constituting a “surface desire-soul”
behind which is “the subliminal soul in us open to the universal delight
[ānanda] which the cosmic soul takes in its own existence and in the
existence of the myriad souls that represent it and in the operations of
mind, life and matter by which Nature lends herself to their play and
development”.
mānasika (manasik) ~ mental, relating to the sensational mind
manasika
(manas).
manasika
ānasika sus
susupti
. upti (manasik sushupti) ~ a condition of the mind resembling deep sleep (sus.upti); the inertia and passivity of the intellect
in the deepest states of samādhi.
manastattva (manastattwa; manas tattwa) ~ mind-principle.
mānava ~ human; man.
manava
manda ~ slow.
man.d.ala ~ circle, orb; any of the ten books of the R
mandala
. g Veda.
maṅgala (mangala; mangalam) ~ good fortune, favourable circummangala
stances.
ma
mangala-amangala
ṅgala-amaṅgala ~ fortunate and unfortunate; the dvandva of
favourable and adverse.
maṅgalam ~ see maṅgala.
mangalam
ma
mangalamangala
ṅgalāmaṅgala ~ same as maṅgala-amaṅgala.
ma
mangalamangalabodha
ṅgalāmaṅgalabodha ~ the sense of fortunate and unfortunate circumstances.
maṅgalamaya ~ fortunate, favourable.
mangalamaya
ma
mangala
ṅgala upalabdhi ~ experience of favourable circumstances.
maṅgalya ~ fortunate, favourable.
mangalya
man.ipura ~ the cakra behind the navel (nābhicakra), “the central seat
manipura
of the Vital, the Life Principle”.
manı̄s.āh. ~ illumined thoughts.
manisah
manı̄s.ı̄ (manishi) ~ thinker.
manisi
manoloka ~ the mental world, a loka where mind “is not determined
by material conditions or by the life-force, but itself determines and
uses them for its own satisfaction”; the mental layer of the material
world (see manoloka of bhū).
manoloka of bh
bhu
ū ~ the mental world within the physical; the mental
layer of the earth-consciousness or plane of material existence, the
highest level of the triloka in bhū.

0
.manomaya ~ mental; mental activity; the mental being; the mental
plane.
.manomaya laghima
laghimā ~ laghimā (the siddhi of lightness and freedom
from fatigue) in the mental being.
.manomaya purus
purusa
. a (manomaya purusha) ~ “the Soul on the mental
level”, the purus.a as a mental being “in whose nature the clarity and
luminous power of the mind acts in its own right independent of any
limitation or oppression by the vital or corporeal instruments”; the
“Spirit poised in mind” which “becomes the mental self of a mental
world and dwells there in the reign of its own pure and luminous
mental Nature”.
manomayı̄ ~ mental (feminine of manomaya).
manomayi
mantra ~ a mystic formula, “a word of power born out of the secret
depths of our being where it has been brooded upon by a deeper
consciousness than the mental”, which can not only “reveal knowledge
and faculties we did not before possess”, but in some cases “produce
vibrations in the mental and vital atmosphere which result in effects . . .
on the physical plane”.
Manu ~ the mental being; same as Manu Prajāpati; each of the fourteen manifestations of Manu Prajāpati governing the manvantaras of
a pratikalpa; each of “the four Type-Souls from whom all human
Purushas are born”.
Manu Praj
Prajapati
āpati ~ Manu as the first Prajāpati, “a part of Mahavishnu
Himself descended into the mental plane in order to conduct the
destinies of the human race”.
Manuputra ~ son of Manu; a human soul.
manusa
ānus.a śabda
sabda (manusha shabda) ~ (śabdadr.s.t.i of) the sound of the
human voice.
manusa
ānus.a sparśa
sparsa (manusha sparsha) ~ (sparśadr.s.t.i of) human touch.
manusi
ānus.ı̄ vvak
āk (manushi vak) ~ (śabdadr.s.t.i of) human speech.
manvantara (manvantara; manwantara) ~ an aeon comprising several caturyugas and corresponding to the reign of one of the fourteen
Manus.
māran.a ~ hitting, striking (as in the related Bengali and Hindi verbs,
marana
not in the normal Sanskrit sense of “killing”).
martya manas ~ mortal mind; mind (manas) subject to life (prān.a)
and matter (anna1).
1
.Maruts ~ the Vedic storm-gods, “luminous and violent gods of the
storm and the lightning”, representing in the esoteric sense of the Veda
“the powers of Thought which by the strong and apparently destructive motion of their progress break down that which is established and
help to the attainment of new formations”.
Mātariśvan (Matariswan) ~ a Vedic epithet of Vāyu2, “who, repMatarisvan
resenting the divine principle in the Life-energy,” (prān.a) “extends
himself in Matter and vivifies its forms”.
material akasa
ākāśa (akasha) ~ the ether of the gross physical plane.
mātr.bhāva ~ the feeling or realisation of the Mother in the daivı̄
matrbhava
prakr.ti.
māyā ~ (in the Veda) “originally a formative power of knowledge,
maya
the true magic of the supreme Mage, the divine Magician, but . . . also
used for the adverse formative power of a lower knowledge, the deceit,
illusion and deluding magic of the Rakshasa”; measuring and limiting consciousness, “a selective faculty of knowledge commissioned to
shape finite appearance out of the infinite Reality” (brahman); the
power of phenomenal creation by which “out of the supreme being
in which all is all without barrier of separative consciousness emerges
the phenomenal being in which all is in each and each is in all for
the play of existence with existence, consciousness with consciousness,
force with force, delight with delight”; illusion, “a bewildering partial
consciousness which loses hold of the complete reality, lives in the
phenomenon of mobile Nature [prakr.ti] and has no sight of the Spirit
[purus.a] of which she is the active Power”.
mayas ~ bliss; the world of ānanda.
māyā-śakti (maya-shakti) ~ force of māyā.
maya-sakti
māyāvādin ~ one who says that the world is an illusion; illusionist.
mayavadin
māyāvin ~ weaver of illusions.
mayavin
mechanical intellectuality ~ same as habitual mind.
mechanical intuivity ~ the lowest form of intuivity, corresponding on
the level of the intuitive mind to the habitual mind on the intellectual
plane; it is related to intuitional intellectuality and stresses the perception “of the powers and tendencies of the present and what they mean
and presage”.
mechanical mentality ~ same as habitual mind or mechanical intuivity.
2
.mechanical tapas ~ tapas acting in the mechanical intuivity.
.meghagarjana (meghagarjan) ~ thunder (heard in śabdadr.s.t.i).
.mental akasa
ākāśa (akasha) ~ any subtle ether (sūks.ma ākāśa) belonging
to the mental plane, such as the cittākāśa; the mental ether of the
material plane, the highest ākāśa of the triloka in bhū.
mental bhoga ~ mental or subjective ānanda, or any of its forms, in
the state of bhoga which is the second stage of bhukti.
mental intuition ~ intuition acting in the buddhi, in contrast to ideal
intuition.
mental overmind ~ the plane of the overmind system that is “directly
creative of all the formations that manifest below in the mental world”.
mental sama
śama (shama) ~ a mental imitation of the true śama or divine
calm of the traigun.yasiddhi; the inactivity of an enlightened tamas
“which by this saving enlightenment is more of a quiescence than an
incapacity”.
mental sus
susupti
. upti ~ same as mānasika sus.upti.
mental tapas ~ mental will-power, whose working takes the form of
“perceptions realising themselves if vijnanamaya, acting as forces, if
pranamaya”; same as intellectual tapas.
Meruloka ~ the world of Meru, the mountain of the gods at the centre
of the earth.
mesquin [French] ~ petty.
middle hermesis ~ the second level of hermetic ideality.
middle ideality ~ same as inspired logistis.
middle seer logistis ~ an intermediate degree of seer logistis; perhaps
a form of inspired revelatory logistis.
mithy
mithyadharana
ādhāran.ā ~ misunderstanding, the holding of a wrong idea.
mithyāgraha ~ misconception.
mithyagraha
mithyāropa ~ misplacement.
mithyaropa
Mitra ~ “the Friend of all beings”, a Vedic god, one of the Four who
represent the “working of the Truth in the human mind and temperament”; he is the lord of the luminous harmony by which “the manifold
workings of the Truth agree together in a perfectly wedded union”.
mitra-prema ~ love as between friends, one of the three forms of
prema.
MK ~ abbreviation of Mahākālı̄.
M.M ~ a combination of two of the four aspects of daivı̄ prakr.ti (e.g.,

3
Maheśvarı̄-Mahāsarasvatı̄).
.mnemosune
mnēmosunē (mnemosyne) [Greek] ~ memory; the goddess of Memory, mother of the Muses.
.moha ~ delusion.
.moksa
moks.a (moksha) ~ liberation; release from existence in the world;
same as mukti.
.mot d’ordre [French] ~ watchword.
.motu ~ see in motu.
.mrtam
mr.tam (mritam) ~ death.
.mrtyur
mr.tyur vā prabhavati (mrityur va prabhavati) ~ death has power.
(This phrase, forming the first sortilege of 9 October 1914, occurs in
a sentence in Shankara’s commentary on Śvetāśvatara Upanis.ad 2.12
which is part of the second sortilege of the same date. The complete
sentence means: “Over that Yogi neither disease nor old age nor death
has power.”)
mudrā ~ a position of the hands; the use of the hands to shut the ears
mudra
to outward sounds.
mukhaśrı̄ ~ facial beauty.
mukhasri
mukhya pr
prana
ān.a (mukhyaprana; mukhya prana) ~ the “original or elemental force” of prān.a in the body, the “pure life-force itself”, called
“the first or supreme Breath . . . because all the others [pañcaprān.a]
are secondary to it, born from it and only exist as its special functions”.
muktabhoga ~ liberated enjoyment.
mukti ~ liberation, “the release of our being from the narrow and
painful knots of the individualised energy in a false and limited play,
which at present are the law of our nature”; in pūrn.a yoga, “a liberation of the soul in nature perfect and self-existent whether in action or
in inaction”; the second member of the siddhi catus.t.aya, integral freedom, including liberation of the spirit (essential mukti) and liberation
of the nature (comprising ahaṅkāra-mukti-siddhi, traigun.yasiddhi
and mukti from dvandva), not only a “liberation from Nature in a
quiescent bliss of the spirit”, but also a “farther liberation of the Nature
into a divine quality and spiritual power of world-experience” which
“fills the supreme calm with the supreme kinetic bliss of knowledge,
power, joy and mastery”.
mūlādhāra ~ the lowest cakra, the centre at the bottom of the spine
muladhara
which “is the main support of the physical consciousness and the
4
material parts of the nature” and from which the kun.d.alinı̄ rises.
.mumuksutva
mumuks.utva (mumukshutwa) ~ desire for liberation; liberation from
this desire is the final step in subjective mukti.
.murti
mūrti ~ form; the second of the two principal kinds of rūpa, the “actual form” of a thing seen in its own world (jagat or loka), as opposed
to pratimūrti or “image”; the form in which a deity (deva) manifests.
mūtra ~ urine, the ﬂuid discharged in jalavisr.s.t.i.
mutra
.nabhicakra
nābhicakra (nabhichakra; nabhi chakra) ~ the “navel centre”, the
cakra called man.ipura, “the main seat of the centralised vital consciousness (dynamic centre)”.
nād.ı̄ ~ a nerve-channel in the subtle body.
nadi
nais.t.huryam (naishthuryam; naishturyam) ~ severity.
naisthuryam
naktā ~ “night”, symbolic of non-manifestation or obscured connakta
sciousness.
naktos.āsā svasārā ekam śiśum [dhāpayete] (naktoshasa swasara ekam
naktosasa
shishum [dhapayete]) ~ Night and Dawn, two sisters, suckle one child.
nāma ~ name; the word designating an object, person or deity, “in its
nama
deeper sense . . . not the word by which we describe the object, but the
total of power, quality, character of the reality which a form of things
embodies and which we try to sum up by a designating sound”.
nāmadr.s.t.a (namadrishta) ~ same as nāmadr.s.t.i.
namadrsta
nāmadr.s.t.i (namadrishti) ~ subtle vision (sūks.ma dr.s.t.i) of nāma or
namadrsti
name (i.e., written or printed words), as opposed to vision of rūpa or
form (i.e., images), a term used by Sri Aurobindo in 1909 for what he
later called lipi.
nāmarūpa ~ name and form, the attributes by which the mind and
namarupa
senses distinguish an object or person.
namas ~ submission.
namāsı̄ [Bengali] ~ mother’s younger sister.
namasi
namaskāra ~ salutation with hands joined.
namaskara
na me mataṁ tasya durbalasya ~ I am not of the opinion of that
weakling.
Nara ~ (in mythology) the name of a sage (see Nara-Nārāyan.a); (literally) Man; “the universal man acting in the individual as a human
5
personality”; in brahmadarśana, the vision of “the cosmic Purusha in
humanity”, who “is developing in the human race the power that has
grown into humanity from below it and shall yet grow to supermind
and spirit and become the Godhead in man who is aware of his true
and integral self and the divine universality of his nature”.
naraka ~ hell.
Nara-N
Nara-Narayana
ārāyan.a (Nara-Narayana; NaraNarayana; Nara Narayana) ~
(in mythology) the names of two sages, Nara and Nārāyan.a, “the seers
who do tapasyā together for the knowledge”, a “double figure” which
in the “Vaishnava form of Vedantism . . . expresses the relation of God
in man to man in God”, Nara being “the human soul which, eternal
companion of the Divine, finds itself only when it awakens to that
companionship”, while Nārāyan.a “is the divine Soul always present
in our humanity, the secret guide, friend and helper of the human
being”; an intermediate bhāva of brahmadarśana in which there is
a dualistic perception of Nara and Nārāyan.a in all, the “bodha of
Narayana” not being extended “into the whole consciousness of the
Nara”, but kept “as a thing apart & containing & informing, but not
identical with the Nara”.
Narasiṁha (Narasinha) ~ the man-lion, the fourth avatāra of Vis.n.u,
Narasimha
the incarnation symbolically “bridging man and animal” in the evolutionary interpretation of the ten avatāras; psychologically, leonine
vital strength in a mentalised form, associated in the Record of Yoga
with a “fierce & ardent” energy called Nārasiṁha tejas.
Nārasiṁha tejas (Nârasinha tejas) ~ the energy of the man-lion
Narasimha
(Narasiṁha).
Nārāyan.a (Narayana; Narayan) ~ (in mythology) one of two sages
Narayana
(see Nara-Nārāyan.a), whose association symbolises the “constant
companionship of man and God, man living in the world for God,
God dwelling in man and turning to his own divine ends in him
the enigmatic world-process”; the “universal all-inhabiting Ishwara”,
identified with Vis.n.u, the Preserver, one of the “cosmic Personalities
of the Divine” through whom Kr.s.n.a manifests.
Narayanabodha
ārāyan.abodha (Narayanabodha; Narayana bodha) ~ awareness of
the Nārāyan.a-aspect of Kr.s.n.a.
Narayanadarsana
ārāyan.adarśana (Narayanadarshana; Narayana darshana) ~ the vision of Nārāyan.a, “the God in man” who “lives constantly associated
6
in a dual unity with Nara, the human being”, a form of darśana related
to but distinguished from Kr.s.n.adarśana.
Narayana-drsti
ārāyan.a-dr.s.t.i (Narayana-drishti) ~ same as Nārāyan.adarśana.
nārikelajah. ~ (in the interpretation of a sortilege on page 399) born
narikelajah
(-ja) of the mood of enjoyment (kela taken in the sense of keli, play)
of prakr.ti (nāri = nārı̄, the woman).
Narottama ~ (literally) the supreme Man (Nara); same as Nārāyan.a,
“the one Divine in all men”.
naryāpas ~ strong in action. [R
naryapas
. g Veda 8.93.1]
nasikya
āsikya āsv
asvada
āda (nasikya aswada) ~ taste perceived through the nostrils.
na śocati,
socati, na nandate (na sochati, na nandate) ~ neither grieves nor
rejoices.
nastikya-buddhi
āstikya-buddhi ~ the sceptical mentality.
nāstikyam ~ disbelief in God; atheism; scepticism.
nastikyam
nātha ~ lord, possessor.
natha
nati ~ resignation, submission; the “equal acceptance by the soul” of
“all things as the play of the all-Blissful Lord, the Will of the supreme
self and Ishwara”, the third stage of passive / negative samatā, whose
highest form is ānandamaya nati.
navadvāre pure (navadware pure) ~ in the nine-gated city (of the
navadvare
body). [Gı̄tā 5.13]
negative asamat
asamata
ā ~ defect or failing of negative samatā.
negative nir
nirananda
ānanda ~ absence of ānanda.
negative samat
samata
ā ~ equality in one’s reception of the contacts of the
world, consisting of titiks.ā, udāsı̄natā and nati, also called passive
samatā: “a passive or negative equality, an equality of reception which
fronts impassively the impacts and phenomena of existence and negates
the dualities of the appearances and reactions which they impose on
us”.
negative santi
śānti (shanti) ~ a passive calm based on udāsı̄natā.
nervous tapas ~ vital power, whose action is characterised by “the
play of forces, action & reaction, resistance etc”; same as prān.amaya
tapas.
nibhr.s.t.a-tavis.i (nibhrishta-tavishi) ~ distressed by its force. [Cf. R
nibhrsta-tavisi
.g
Veda 2.25.4]
nidah. ~ “the Restrainers”, a kind of hostile being in the Veda.

7
.nidra
nidrā ~ sleep.
.nidramaya
nidrāmaya ~ of the nature of sleep; (samādhi) under the hold of sleep.
.nidr
nidramaya
āmaya svapna siddhi (nidramaya swapna siddhi) ~ perfection of
svapnasamādhi during sleep.
.nidravista
nidrāvis.t.a samādhi (nidravishta samadhi) ~ samādhi invaded by
sleep.
.nigraha ~ suppression; forcible coercion of one’s nature.
.nihsabdata
nih.śabdatā (nihshabdata) ~ absence of sound.
.nihsmarana
nih.smaran.a ~ without smaran.a; (physical ānanda) not being dependent on attention.
.ni karma manyuṁ durevasya śardhatah. (ni karma manyum durevasya
shardhatah) ~ “may we cast out the passion of him of evil impulse
when he putteth forth his force.” [R
. g Veda 2.23.12]
nı̄la (nil) ~ dark blue.
nila
nimis.annapi (nimishannapi) ~ even blinking; as well as when shutting
nimisannapi
the eyes. [Gı̄tā 5.9]
nimitta ~ efficient cause, “the immediate cause and instrument”.
nirādhāra ~ (subtle sense-perception) without the support (ādhāra) of
niradhara
a physical sensation; (rūpa or lipi) seen in the ākāśa without relation
to a background.
nirānanda ~ “undelight”, the absence or contrary of ānanda.
nirananda
nir
niranandamaya
ānandamaya ~ joyless; the opposite of ānandamaya.
nir
nirananda
ānanda śsanti
ānti (nirananda shanti) ~ peace without ānanda, a form
of negative śānti.
nirapeks.ā (nirapeksha) ~ freedom from desire, expectation and denirapeksa
pendency; disinterestedness, non-attachment.
nirgun.a (nirguna; nirgunam) ~ without qualities; absence of qualities;
nirguna
short for nirgun.a brahman, “an Infinite essentially free from all limitation by qualities, properties, features”; the ānanda of pure featureless
consciousness (cit), another term for cidānanda.
nirgun
nirguna
. a brahman ~ brahman without qualities (gun.as), also called
śāntaṁ brahma, the featureless Reality whose “illimitable freedom . . .
provides the indispensable condition for . . . a free and infinite selfexpression in quality and feature”.
nirguna
nirgun
guni
. a gun
. ı̄ ~ “the Supreme without qualities who is possessed of
all qualities”, the deva or ı̄śvara as at once nirgun.a and sagun.a, “the
impersonal-personal” who “is beyond all limitation by quality” and
8
yet “is not limited by a qualitiless void but is too all infinite qualities”.
[Cf. Śvetāśvatara Upanis.ad 6.2, 11, 16]
nirgun.am ~ see nirgun.a.
nirgunam
nirgun
nirguna
. a sad brahman (nirgun sad brahman) ~ brahman as pure existence (sat) without qualities.
nirukta ~ etymology; philology, part of sāhitya: the study of the origins and development of language, especially with reference to Sanskrit, with the aim of creating “a science which can trace the origins,
growth & structure of the Sanscrit language, discover its primary,
secondary & tertiary forms & the laws by which they develop from
each other, trace intelligently the descent of every meaning of a word
in Sanscrit from its original root sense, account for all similarities &
identities of sense, discover the reason of unexpected divergences, trace
the deviations which separated Greek & Latin from the Indian dialect,
discover & define the connection of all three with the Dravidian forms
of speech”.
nir-utthāpanā ~ the negation of utthāpanā.
nir-utthapana
nirveda ~ despondency, indifference.
nirvijññana
āna ahaituka ~ ahaituka ānanda without vijñāna.
nirvikalpa samadhi
samādhi ~ “trance in which there is no formation or movement of the consciousness”, a kind of samādhi “in which all the lower
organs are stopped and there is only the superconscious experience of
the Brahman”.
nirviśes.a (nirvisesha) ~ unqualified; undifferentiated; associated with
nirvisesa
no specific object or stimulus; used in July 1912 for various forms of
physical and subjective ānanda in a sense similar to ahaituka.
niścaya (nishchaya; nischaya) ~ certainty, decisiveness.
niscaya
niśces.t.atā (nischeshtata) ~ immobility, absence of effort, passivity.
niscestata
nischaya ~ see niścaya.
nischeshtata ~ see niśces.t.atā.
nishchaya ~ see niścaya.
nis.kāma (nishkama) ~ desireless; (on page 1281) the name of a
niskama
svarga.
niskama
nis
. kāma karma (nishkama karma) ~ desireless action.
nis
niskama
nih.spr.ha (nishkama nihspriha) ~ without desire or longing.
. kāma nihsprha
nistapas smaran
smarana
. a ~ smaran.a (memory) without pressure of tapas
(will); passive attention.

9
.nistejas ~ lack of energy.
.nitya ~ constant.
.nitya anusmarana
anusmaran.a (nitya anusmaran) ~ constant remembrance, “the
constant undeviating memory of the Divine”.
.nityakarma ~ (in traditional Hinduism) daily ritual, “the Vedic rule,
the routine of ceremonial sacrifice, daily conduct and social duty”;
the routine of daily activities, a routine that “is ritam & necessary
for karma, only it must be ritam of the brihat, part of the infinite, not
narrow & rigid, a ﬂexible instrument, not a stiff & unpliant bondage”.
nityasmaran.a (nityasmarana; nitya smarana) ~ constant memory; a state in which the “remembrance of the Divine Being becomes no longer an intermittent act of the mind, but the natural condition of our activities and in a way the very substance of the consciousness”.
nivr.tti (nivritti) ~ literally “moving back and in”; withdrawal, abstention, inactivity; “cessation from the original urge to action” and the return of the soul “to its eternal, unchanging immobility”, one side of “the double movement of the Soul and Nature” whose other side is pravr.tti; a “divine quietism” supporting “a divine activism and kinetism”.
non-telepathic trik
trikaladrsti
āladr.s.t.i (trikaldrishti) ~ the higher form of trikāladr.s.t.i, which is not dependent on the perception of tendencies, forces
and intentions by telepathy and can “perceive what is the unalterable
eventuality actually destined”.
nos amis [French] ~ our friends.
novae suae patriae percipere [Latin] ~ to perceive one’s new fatherland.
nr̄.h. (nrih) ~ (apparently the plural of nr., whose more regular forms
nrh
are narah. [nominative] or nr̄.n [accusative]) literally “men”, a term used
in the Veda for “the gods as the male powers or Purushas presiding
over the energies of Nature”.
nulli visa cito decurrit tramite virgo [Latin] ~ seen by none, the maiden
(the goddess Iris) swiftly runs down her path. [Aeneid 5.610]
nyūnatā ~ deficiency.
nyunata
.objective ānanda
ananda ~ same as physical ānanda.
0
.objective vis
visayananda
. ayānanda (vishayananda) ~ vis.ayānanda generated “objectively in the physical response to all experiences”.
.obtenir la prestige par la victoire [French] ~ to get prestige by victory.
.ojas ~ a primal physical energy supporting the other energies in the
body.
.OM ~ in the Vedic tradition, the sacred “initiating syllable”, regarded
as “the one universal formulation of the energy of sound and speech”
and “the foundation of all the potent creative sounds of the revealed
word”; the “Word of Manifestation”, the mantra or “expressive
sound-symbol of the Brahman Consciousness in its four domains” (see
AUM).
OM Agnih. ~ an invocation to Agni2.
OM ānandamayi
anandamayi caitanyamayi satyamayi parame (OM anandamayi
chaitanyamayi [satyamayi parame]) ~ OM, O supreme Goddess who
art all bliss, consciousness and truth of being.
OM
Ṁ tat sat ~ a mantra said to be “the triple definition” of the brahman: OM, also spelled AUM, is the “Word of Manifestation”, symbolising “the outward-looking, the inward or subtle and the superconscient causal Purusha”, indicated respectively by the letters A, U and
M, while “the syllable as a whole brings out the fourth state, Turiya,
which rises to the Absolute”; tat, That, “indicates the Absolute”; sat
“indicates the supreme and universal existence in its principle”. [cf.
Gı̄tā 17.23]
original T2 ~ trikāladr.s.t.i-tapassiddhi with non-telepathic trikāladr.s.t.i as the first element.
original vvanmaya
āṅmaya ~ same as effulgent vāṅmaya.
oubliez [French] ~ forget.
overmind ~ (from 29 October 1927 onwards) the highest plane or
system of planes of consciousness below supermind or divine gnosis; especially the principal plane in the overmind system, apparently
corresponding to what earlier in 1927 was referred to as supreme
supermind. Possessing “an illimitable capacity of separation and combination of the powers and aspects of the integral and indivisible
all-comprehending Unity”, the overmind “takes up all that is in the
three steps below it and raises their characteristic workings to their
highest and largest power, adding to them a universal wideness of
consciousness and force”.
1
.overmind gnosis ~ (c. 1931, in the diagram on page 1360) the highest
plane of overmind, defined as “supermind subdued to the overmind
play” (see supermind); it may also be regarded as a series of planes.
overmind logos ~ (c. 1931, in the diagram on page 1360) the logos or
universal reason in its highest form on the plane of overmind below
formative māyā (see overmind system), described as “determinative of
relations” in the worlds derived from it.
overmind system ~ a term used on 29 October 1927 (when the word
“overmind” first occurs) for what earlier in that year had consisted
of a series of planes, divisible into four groups, rising from supramentality to gnostic supermind. In 1933, Sri Aurobindo wrote that the
overmind “can for convenience be divided into four planes”, which he
called mental overmind, intuitive overmind or overmind intuition, true
overmind, and supramental overmind or overmind gnosis, “but there
are many layers in each and each of these can be regarded as a plane in
itself”. In the diagram of overmind gradations on page 1360 (c. 1931),
mental overmind seems to be missing, but overmind logos is listed
between intuitive overmind and formative māyā, the latter evidently
designating the principal plane of true overmind. Overmind logos may
represent mental overmind; its position in the diagram could be explained if its highest level is assumed to be a form of mental overmind
taken up into true overmind and constituting a plane of overmind
proper, like the supramentalised mind in overmind of 1927-28.
.pacana (pachana) ~ cooking, baking; ripening; perfecting.
.pajah
pājah. ~ same as pājas.
.pajas
pājas ~ mass of strength.
.pañca (pancha) ~ five.
.pañcabhauta (panchabhauta) ~ involving the five elements (pañcabhūta).
.pañcabh
ñcabhuta
ūta (panchabhuta) ~ the five bhūtas or “elements, as it is
rendered, but rather elemental or essential conditions of material being
to which are given the concrete names of earth [pr.thivı̄1], water [jala],
fire [tejas or agni1], air [vāyu1] and ether [ākāśa]”.
pañcapr
ñcaprana
ān.a (panchaprana) ~ the five “vital currents of energy” in the
2
body, called prān.a, apāna, samāna, vyāna and udāna; the “fivefold
movement” of the physical life-force “pervading all the nervous system
and the whole material body and determining all its functionings”.
pañcavidha śsarirananda
ārı̄rānanda (panchavidha sharirananda)~fivefold physical ānanda, consisting of kāmānanda, vis.ayānanda, tı̄vrānanda,
raudrānanda and vaidyutānanda.
pan.i ~ a class of Vedic demons whose chief is Vala; “traffickers in the sense-life, stealers and concealers of the higher Light and its illuminations”.
pāpapun.ya ~ sin and virtue.
papapunya
papapunyamanapamanapriyapriyavivarjanam
āpapun.yamānāpamānapriyāpriyavivarjanam~dispelling the sense
of sin and virtue, honour and dishonour, love and hatred.
para ~ higher; supreme.
parā ~ higher; supreme (feminine of para).
para
parabhāva ~ higher aspect; supreme status of being.
parabhava
parabrahmadarśana
parabrahmadarsana (parabrahmadarshana) ~ vision (darśana) of the
supreme Reality (parabrahman); the “renewal of the Parabrahmadarshana of two years ago” recorded on 16 April 1914 was a revival
of what Sri Aurobindo had experienced on 15 August 1912 when,
according to a letter, his “subjective sadhana” had “received its final
seal and something like its consummation by a prolonged realisation
& dwelling in Parabrahman for many hours”.
parabrahman ~ the supreme Reality (brahman), “absolute and ineffable . . . beyond all cosmic being”, from which “originate both the
mobile and the immobile, the mutable and the immutable, the action
and the silence”; it “is not Being [sat] or Non-Being [asat], but something of which Being & Non-Being are primary symbols”. As it is
“indescribable by any name or definite conception”, it is referred to by
the neuter pronoun tat, That, in order “to speak of this Unknowable
in the most comprehensive and general way . . . ; but this neuter does
not exclude the aspect of universal and transcendent Personality”.
parabrahman-mah
parabrahman-mahamaya
āmāyā ~ the supreme Reality and the power of its
“infinite consciousness to comprehend, contain in itself and measure
out . . . Name and Shape out of the vast illimitable Truth of infinite existence”, the duality of brahman and māyā in its highest “biune” form.
par
parajayananda
ājayānanda ~ joy of (temporary) defeat (as a step towards victory), a form of sama ānanda.
3
.paralokadrsti
paralokadr.s.t.i (paralokadrishti) ~ vision of other worlds, where experiences are organised “on a different plan, with a different process
and law of action and in a substance which belongs to a supraphysical
Nature”, a form of lokadr.s.t.i.
paramahaṁsa (paramahansa) ~ the liberated man; one of those who have attained “a particular grade of realisation” and “live in the cosmic consciousness in touch or union with the All”, about whom it “is said that their vital behaves either like a child (Ramakrishna) or like a madman or like a demon or like something inert (cf. Jadabharata)”.
paramātman ~ the supreme Self (ātman), the “supreme unmanifest supracosmic Being” as the world’s “invisible spiritual foundation and the hidden spiritual cause of the becoming of all existences”.
parameśvara (parameshwara; parameswara) ~ the supreme Lord, the transcendent ı̄śvara, who rules the worlds “from beyond all cosmos as well as within it” and “from his highest original existence . . . originates and governs the universe . . . with an all-knowing omnipotence”.
parameśvaraparamesvara-adya
ādyā parāśakti (parameswara-âdyâ parâshakti) ~ the supreme Lord one with his original supreme Power; the “biune” duality of ı̄śvara-śakti on the highest plane of existence.
parameśvara-parameśvarı̄
paramesvara-paramesvari (parameswara-parameswari) ~ the supreme Lord (parameśvara) and supreme Goddess (parameśvarı̄) as
the Two-in-One.
parameśvarı̄ (parameshwari; parameswari) ~ the supreme Goddess
paramesvari
(ı̄śvarı̄).
para
par
ā prakr
prakrti
. ti (para prakriti) ~ the higher (spiritual and supramental)
Nature, the “supreme nature of the Divine which is the real source of
cosmic existence and its fundamental creative force and effective energy
and of which the other lower and ignorant Nature [aparā prakr.ti] is
only a derivation and a dark shadow”; prakr.ti in the parārdha or
higher hemisphere of existence.
para purus
purusa
. a (para purusha; parapurusha; para purushah) ~ the highest Soul (purus.a), the supreme Being, a “Transcendent who is beyond
all world and all Nature and yet possesses the world and its nature,
who has descended with something of himself into it and is shaping it
into that which as yet it is not”; same as purus.ottama.
parārdha ~ “the upper half of world-existence”, consisting of the
parardha
worlds of saccidānanda linked by vijñāna to the aparārdha or lower
4
hemisphere of mind, life and matter, “an upper hemisphere of manifestation based on the Spirit’s eternal self-knowledge” (vidyā).
para
par
ā śakti
sakti (para shakti; parâshakti) ~ higher Power; the supreme śakti
of parameśvara, “the transcendent Mother” of whom the mahāśakti
on each plane is “the cosmic Soul and Personality” (same as ādyā
parāśakti).
para tapas ~ higher tapas.
parātman ~ the supreme Self, same as paramātman.
paratman
parātpara ~ higher than the highest; supreme; “the supreme of the
paratpara
Supreme”.
para
par
ā vidy
vidya
ā ~ the higher knowledge; the knowledge of brahman, “the
supreme supra-intellectual knowledge which concentrates itself on the
discovery of the One and Infinite in its transcendence or tries to penetrate by intuition, contemplation, direct inner contact into the ultimate
truths behind the appearances of Nature”.
paresse [French] ~ laziness, indolence.
paropakāra ~ doing good to others.
paropakara
pārthiva ~ earthly; physical; consisting of or relating to the bhūta
parthiva
called pr.thivı̄1.
parthiva
ārthiva āk
akasa
āśa (parthiva akasha) ~ the physical ether.
parthiva
ārthiva visr
visrsti
. s.t.i (parthiva visrishti) ~ discharge (visr.s.t.i) of waste matter in solid form.
parvata ~ mountain.
passive asamat
asamata
ā ~ defect or failing of passive samatā.
passive samat
samata
ā ~ equality in one’s reception of the contacts of the
world, consisting of titiks.ā, udāsı̄natā and nati, also called negative
samatā: a “passive or purely receptive equality” gained by an “inhibition of the normal reactions of the mind to the touches of outward
things” and a “separation of the self or spirit from the outward action
of Nature”.
pāśavı̄ (pashavi) ~ Kālı̄ as ruler of the physical consciousness (paśu).
pasavi
paśu (pashu) ~ animal; the human animal; the lowest of the ten types
pasu
of consciousness (daśa-gāvas) in the evolutionary scale: mind concentrated on the bodily life; “the animal power in the body”, which
“might be divinely used for the greater purposes of the divinised
Purusha”.
paśu-asura (pashu-asura; pashu asura) ~ the paśu stage of the asura
pasu-asura

5
with which the first manvantara of the sixth pratikalpa begins, when
mind having evolved to the buddhi returns temporarily to a concentration on the bodily life.
pasu deva (pashu deva) ~ the paśu of the deva type; the divinised
paśu
animal-man.
pātāla ~ the underworld; a plane of “low physical nervosity” assopatala
ciated with visions in a shadowy (chāyāmaya) dimness; “the subconscient below the Earth ~ the Earth being the conscious physical
plane”, a domain where what has been rejected from the surface nature
often takes refuge.
pātra ~ vessel, plate, lid; recipient; the object or person referred to or
patra
acted upon by the faculties of knowledge or power.
pe
pempegach
ṁpegāch (pepegach) [Bengali] ~ papaya tree.
perceptional thought; perceptive jññana
āna ~ same as perceptive thought.
perceptive thought ~ thought that comes as silent perception “without the aid of any suggestive or developing word”, a form of jñāna
distinguished from vāṅmaya thought.
personal d
dasya
āsya ~ same as primary / simple dāsya, also called egoistic
dāsya, the form of dāsya in which one “learns, still using the personal
will, personal effort, personal energies, to employ them as representatives of the higher Power and in conscious obedience to the higher
Inﬂuence”.
phalahetu ~ acting for the sake of the fruit.
phalākāṅks.ā (phalakanksha) ~ desire for the fruit of one’s acts.
phalakanksa
physical ānanda
ananda ~ ānanda revealing itself in the body “as an ecstasy
pouring into it from the heights of the spirit and the peace and bliss of
a pure and spiritualised physical existence”; same as śārı̄rānanda in
its totality or in any of its five forms.
physical bhoga ~ physical ānanda, or any of its forms, in the state
of bhoga (the second stage of bhukti), where the seizing of the rasa
in things is made concrete by the participation of the prān.a bringing
in “the full sense of life and the occupying enjoyment by the whole
being”.
physical bhukti ~ bhukti in the physical body or sthūla deha, consisting of physical ānanda in its five forms (kāmānanda, vis.ayānanda,
tı̄vrānanda, raudrānanda and vaidyutānanda) with the corresponding forms of bhoga and rasagrahan.a.

6
.physical kkamananda
āmānanda ~ kāmānanda
as physical ānanda manifesting in the sthūla deha or gross body, distinguished from subjective
kāmānanda.
physical pr
prana
ān.a ~ “the life-energy as it acts in the body”, same as
sthūla prān.a; the prān.a “directly involved in the body”, where “it
produces those reactions of hunger, thirst, fatigue, health, disease,
physical vigour, etc. which are the vital experiences of the physical
frame”.
physical siddhi ~ the siddhi of the śarı̄ra catus.t.aya or of any of its
members; any of the siddhis of the body which “although belonging
to the dharma of the vijnana . . . act in the body and are strictly part
of the physical siddhi”, forming the basis of utthāpanā.
piśāca (pisaca, pishacha; pisacha) ~ demon; a kind of anti-divine being of the lower vital plane; the third of the ten types of consciousness (daśagāvas) in the evolutionary scale: mind concentrated on the senses and concerned with the knowledge of bodily life.
piśāca-asura (pishacha-asura; pisacha-asura; pisacha asura) ~ the piśāca stage of the asura, which evolves in the second and third manvantaras of the sixth pratikalpa.
piśāca-pramatha (pisacha-pramatha; pisacha pramatha; pisachopramatha) ~ the combination of piśāca and pramatha, which evolves in the asura type in the third manvantara of the sixth pratikalpa.
piśācı̄ (pisachi) ~ female piśāca; Kālı̄ as ruler of the sensational mind. 
piśitārthı̄ (pishitarthi) ~ looking for meat.
pisitarthi
pitr.loka (pitriloka) ~ the world of the divinised ancestors.
pitrloka
plus [French] ~ more.
point d’appui [French] ~ point of support.
politēs [Greek] ~ freeman.
polites
positive ānanda
ananda ~ same as positive samatā.
positive aśraddh
asraddha
ā ~ same as saṁśaya, doubt.
positive nir
nirananda
ānanda ~ the opposite of ānanda; pain, distress, discomfort.
positive samat
samata
ā ~ equality in one’s response to the contacts of the
world, consisting of (sama) rasa, (sama) bhoga and (sama) ānanda,
also called active samatā: “a positive equality which accepts the phenomena of existence, but only as the manifestation of the one divine
being and with an equal response to them which comes from the divine

7
nature in us and transforms them into its hidden values”.
.prabhrtha
prabhr.tha (prabhritha) ~ bringing forward; offering.
.prabhu ~ the presiding Lord.
.prabhutva (prabhutwa) ~ lordship.
.pradhana
pradhāna ~ (in the Sankhya philosophy) the original, unevolved state
of Matter.
.pradiv (pradiv; pradiva) ~ the “intermediate mentality”, a level of
consciousness described as “pure mind in relation with nervous”; a
mental ākāśa defined as the ether of the “prano-manasic buddhi”
behind the cittākāśa.
Pradyumna ~ the aspect of the fourfold ı̄śvara whose śakti is Mahālaks.mı̄, corresponding to the vaiśya who represents the cosmic principle of Harmony in the symbolism of the cāturvarn.ya; he is “the sweet
and throbbing heart in things” and he is identified with Vis.n.u.
pragmatic ~ (in 1919) having the nature of pragmatic reason, pragmatic intuitivity or pragmatic ideality.
pragmatic gnosis ~ same as pragmatic ideality.
pragmatic ideality ~ an inspirational form of logistic ideality which,
applied to the field of trikāladr.s.t.i and tapas, takes the present actuality
as a passing circumstance and “claims to go altogether beyond it, to
create with a certain large freedom according to the Will”.
pragmatic ideal tapas ~ tapas acting in the pragmatic ideality.
pragmatic intuitivity ~ the second form of intuitivity, corresponding
on the level of the intuitive mind to the pragmatic reason on the
intellectual plane; it is related to inspirational mentality and gives the
perception of the “powers and forces which attempt to create a future
not bound by the probabilities of the present”.
pragmatic intuivity ~ same as pragmatic intuitivity.
pragmatic mentality ~ same as pragmatic reason or pragmatic intuitivity.
pragmatic reason ~ the form of the thinking mind (buddhi) that “acts
creatively as a mediator between the idea and the life-power, between
truth of life and truth of the idea not yet manifested in life”.
pragmatic tapas ~ tapas acting in the pragmatic intuitivity or pragmatic ideality.
Prahlāda ~ a daitya, son of Hiran.yakaśipu; he became a devotee of
Prahlada
Vis.n.u, who as Narasiṁha intervened to save him from his hostile
8
environment.
.Prajapati
Prajāpati ~ “the Lord of creatures”, the divine purus.a of whom all
beings are the manifestations; the deva presiding over janaloka; one of
“the three primal Purushas of the earth life”, who appears after Agni
Tvas.t.ā and Mātariśvan in the form of the four Manus (also called
“the four Prajapatis”); any of certain mental beings connected with
the terrestrial creation, one of whom is Manu Prajāpati.
prajāvat ~ fruitful, “not barren, but full of the fruits of activity, rich
prajavat
in the offspring of the soul”.
praj
pr
ājña ~ “the Lord of Wisdom”, brahman in the last of the three
states symbolised by the letters of AUM, manifest behind virāt. and
hiran.yagarbha “in the self-gathered superconscient power of the Infinite”; the Self (ātman) supporting the deep sleep state (sus.upti) or
causal (kāran.a) consciousness, “a luminous status of Sleep-self, a
massed consciousness which is the origin of cosmic existence”.
pr
praj
ājña-hiran
ña-hiranya-virat
. ya-virāt. ~ brahman in the three states symbolised by the
letters of AUM, manifest in the superconscient as prājña, in the subtle
worlds as hiran.yagarbha, and in the external universe as virāt..
prajññana
āna ~ intelligence; “the consciousness which holds an image of
things before it as an object with which it has to enter into relations
and to possess by apprehension and a combined analytic and synthetic
cognition”; a subordinate operation of vijñāna which “by its power
of projecting, confronting, apprehending knowledge” is the “parent of
that awareness by distinction which is the process of the Mind”.
prajññanamaya
ānamaya vijññana
āna ~ a lower kind of vijñāna, which “puts the
knowledge by identity more into the background and stresses more
the objectivity of the thing known”, becoming a form of prajñāna,
whose “characteristic movement, descending into the mind, becomes
the source of the peculiar nature of our mental knowledge”.
prākāmya ~ a heightened power of mind and senses by which the
prakamya
consciousness can exceed the limits normally imposed by the body and
project itself into other persons and objects to know what is in them,
one of the two siddhis of knowledge whose combination constitutes
telepathy.
pr
prakamya
ākāmya trik
trikaladrsti
āladr.s.t.i (prakamya trikaldrishti) ~ telepathic trikāladr.s.t.i by means of prākāmya.
pr
prakamya-vyapti
ākāmya-vyāpti (prakamya-vyapti; prakamyavyapti; prakamya
9
vyapti) ~ the combination of prākāmya and vyāpti, the two siddhis
of knowledge, which constitutes telepathy.
prakars.an.a (prakarshana) ~ stretching out; one of the five forms of
prakarsana
pain to be turned into raudrānanda.
prakāśa (prakasha; prakash) ~ radiance, illumination, “transparent
prakasa
luminousness”; clarity of the thinking faculty, an element of buddhiśakti; the divine light of knowledge into which sattva is transformed
in the liberation (mukti) of the nature from the trigun.a of the lower
prakr.ti; the highest of the seven kinds of akashic material.
prakāśa-chāyā (prakasha-chhaya) ~ rūpa composed of prakāśa and
prakasa-chaya
chāyā combined.
prak
prakasa-chaya-tejas
āśa-chāyā-tejas (prakasha-chhaya-tejas) ~ rūpa composed of
prakāśa, chāyā and tejas combined.
prakāśamaya (prakashamaya; prakashamay) ~ full of prakāśa; radiprakasamaya
ant; luminous; (rūpa or lipi) composed of prakāśa.
prak
prakasamaya
āśamaya śamas
samas (prakashamaya çamas) ~ luminous peace; śamas
full of prakāśa, without tapas.
prak
prakasamaya
āśamaya tapas (prakashamaya tapas) ~ luminous force.
prakritic d
dasya
āsya ~ same as double / secondary dāsya, an intermediate
form of dāsya in which “we perceive that Prakriti is the only doer
of all our actions voluntary or involuntary from the most deliberately
concerted endeavour even to the simplest triﬂe”, though we remain
“aware of ourselves as . . . the individual ruling & sanctioning authority” and “have the power of refusing our sanction to any particular
impulse of Prakriti if we choose”.
prakr.ti (prakriti) ~ nature; “the active force of Nature which by its
prakrti
motion creates and maintains and by its sinking into rest dissolves
the phenomenon of the cosmos”; the universal energy acting for the
enjoyment of the purus.a on all the planes of being; the “outer or
executive side” of the śakti or Conscious Force of the ı̄śvara, working
in the Ignorance (avidyā) as the lower or aparā prakr.ti and in the
Knowledge (vidyā) as the higher or parā prakr.ti.
prakr.ti-aṁśa (prakriti-angsha) ~ portion of universal nature.
prakrti-amsa
prakr.ti-jı̄va (prakriti-jiva) ~ the individual soul (jı̄va) realising itself
prakrti-jiva
as a manifestation of prakr.ti or universal Nature; see jı̄va-prakr.ti.
prakr.tiṁ yānti bhūtāni nigrahah. kiṁ karis.yati (prakritim yanti
prakrtim
bhutani nigrahah kim karishyati) ~ “Creatures follow after nature;

0
what is the use of coercion?” [Gı̄tā 3.33]
.prakr
prakrti
purusa
. ti purus
. a (prakriti purusha) ~ same as purus.a-prakr.ti.
.pramada
pramāda ~ negligence; confusion; distraction.
.pramatha ~ a kind of being on the lower vital plane, related to the
piśāca; the fourth of the ten types of consciousness (daśa-gāvas) in the
evolutionary scale: mind concentrated on the heart and the emotional
and aesthetic part of the citta.
pramatha-asura (pramatha-asura) ~ the pramatha stage of the asura,
which evolves in the fourth manvantara of the sixth pratikalpa.
pramatha-r
pramatha-raksasa
āks.asa (pramatha-rakshasa) ~ the combination of pramatha and rāks.asa, which evolves in the asura type in the fifth
manvantara of the sixth pratikalpa.
pramatheśvarı̄ (pramatheswari) ~ Kālı̄ as ruler of the emotional mind
pramathesvari
(pramatha).
pramatta ~ negligent, lax.
prān.a ~ (literally) breath, “the breath drawn into and thrown out
prana
from the lungs and so, in its most material and common sense,
the life or the life-breath”; the physical life-energy (sthūla prān.a);
the “essential life force” (mukhya prān.a) which is said “to occupy
and act in the body with a fivefold movement”; any one of the
five workings of the vital force (pañcaprān.a), especially the first
of the five, associated with respiration, which “moves in the upper
part of the body and is preeminently the breath of life, because it
brings the universal Life-force into the physical system and gives it
there to be distributed”; the vital being or sūks.ma prān.a; the vital
principle, the second of the three principles of the aparārdha, “a
middle term between Mind and Matter, constituent of the latter
and instinct with the former”, being in its nature “an operation
of Conscious-Force [cit-tapas] which is neither the mere formation of substance nor the operation of mind with substance and
form as its object of apprehension”, but “rather an energising of
conscious being which is a cause and support of the formation of
substance and an intermediate source and support of conscious mental
apprehension”.
prān.a-ākāśa (prana-akasha; prana akasha) ~ same as prān.ākāśa.
prana-akasa
pranad
pr
ān.ad ejad ~ that which breathes and moves. [Cf. Mun.d.aka Upanis.ad 2.2.1]
1
.pranajagat
prān.ajagat (pranajagat; prana jagat) ~ the vital world, the world (jagat) of pure life-force (prān.a), where “forms do not determine the
conditions of the life, but it is life which determines the form, and
therefore forms are there much more free, ﬂuid, largely and to our
conceptions strangely variable than in the material world”.
prān.ākāśa (pranakasha; pranakash) ~ the vital ether, the ākāśa of the
pranakasa
prān.ajagat; the vital ether of the material plane, the second ākāśa of
the triloka in bhū.
prān.akośa (pranakosha; prana-kosha, pranakosa) ~ the sheath (kośa) composed of life-energy (prān.a), “the life sheath or vital body” through which “the life-world [prān.ajagat] enters into relations with us”; it is “closely connected with the physical or food-sheath [annakośa] and forms with it the gross body [sthūla deha] of our complex existence”.
prān.amaya (pranamaya; pranamay) ~ consisting of prān.a; nervous,
pranamaya
vital; the vital plane.
pr
pranamaya
ān.amaya jagat (pranamay jagat) ~ the vital world; same as prān.ajagat.
pr
pranamaya
ān.amaya purus
purusa
. a (pranamaya purusha) ~ “the vital conscious being”, the purus.a “as a soul of life, self-identified with a great movement
of becoming in Time, which puts forth body as a form or basic senseimage and mind as a conscious activity of life-experience”; it “is
capable of looking beyond the duration and limits of the physical
body, of feeling an eternity of life behind and in front, an identity
with a universal Life-being, but does not look beyond a constant vital
becoming in Time”.
pr
pranamaya
ān.amaya tapas ~ vital power, “unquiet, full of desire or effort”,
same as nervous tapas.
pranan
pr
ān.ān atarah. ~ you have passed beyond the vital forces.
prān.anyāsa ~ directing vital energy to any part of the body; a practice
prananyasa
connected with prān.āyāma.
prān.aśakti (pranashakti; prana-shakti) ~ life-force, “a pervading vital
pranasakti
force other than the physical energy”, which one can come to feel
“concretely with a mental sense, see its courses and movements, and
direct and act upon it immediately by the will”; prān.a as a universal
force “which in various forms sustains or drives material energy in all
physical things”; the power, capacity and right state of activity of the
sūks.ma prān.a or vital being, one of the four kinds of śakti forming
2
the second member of the śakti catus.t.aya.
.pr
prana
ān.a śarı̄ra
sarira (prana sharira) ~ the “vital body” which belongs to the
vital soul (prān.amaya purus.a), a body “composed of a substance much
subtler than physical matter . . . a substance surcharged with conscious
energy”; it “penetrates and envelops the physical and is sensitive to
impacts of another kind, to the play of the vital forces around us and
coming in on us from the universe . . . or else from the vital planes and
worlds which are behind the material universe”.
prān.aśuddhi ~ purification of the pañcaprān.a.
pranasuddhi
prān.asya ~ of the vital being.
pranasya
prān.āyāma ~ control of the vital currents of energy in the body by
pranayama
regulation of the breathing.
prān.ı̄ ~ breathing; living.
prani
pranic laghim
laghima
ā ~ laghimā (the siddhi of lightness and freedom from
fatigue) in the prān.a or nervous being.
pranic mahim
mahima
ā ~ mahimā (the siddhi of unhampered force) in the
prān.a or nervous being.
pranic tapas ~ same as prān.amaya tapas.
prasāda ~ clearness; contentment; “an illumined ease and clarity”,
prasada
same as ātmaprasāda.
prasannatā ~ clearness, “clear purity and gladness”, an element of
prasannata
prān.aśakti.
pratibodha ~ perception; inner awakening; experiential knowledge;
realisation.
pratidāna ~ return; exchange.
pratidana
pratijñña
ā ~ promise; programme.
pratikalpa (pratikalpa; prati-kalpa; prati kalpa) ~ a period of a hundred caturyugas, one tenth of a kalpa, also divided into fourteen
manvantaras of several caturyugas each; each pratikalpa corresponds
to one of the ten types or forms of consciousness (daśa-gāvas) in the
evolutionary scale, the present pratikalpa being regarded as the sixth
in the current kalpa, the pratikalpa of the asura in which mind is
concentrated on the buddhi.
pratimūrti ~ image; (as opposed to mūrti or “actual form”) the first of
pratimurti
the two principal kinds of rūpa, seen “in the personal consciousness as
image of a remote reality”, including “transcriptions . . . or impresses
of physical things, persons, scenes, happenings, whatever is, was or

3
will be or may be in the physical universe” and representations “not
of the physical world, but of vital, psychic or mental worlds beyond
us”.
pratis.t.hā (pratishtha; pratistha) ~ foundation, support, pedestal;
pratistha
base, basis.
pratis.t.hita ~ founded, established.
pratisthita
pratyaks.a (pratyaksha) ~ (seeing) what is before the eyes, same as
pratyaksa
pratyaks.adarśana; self-evidence; revelation.
pratyaks
pratyaksadarsana
. adarśana (pratyakshadarsana) ~ seeing what is before the
eyes; direct vision.
pravr.tti (pravritti) ~ literally “moving out and forward”; activity,
pravrtti
“movement and impulsion and kinesis”; the will to act, a term in the
first general formula of the śakti catus.t.aya; “the Divine Impulse which
acts through us”, the pure desireless impulsion (śuddha pravr.tti) into
which rajas is transformed in the liberation (mukti) of the nature
from the trigun.a of the lower prakr.ti; “the ancient sempiternal urge
to action . . . which for ever proceeds without beginning or end from
the original Soul of all existence”, one side of “the double movement
of the Soul and Nature” whose other side is nivr.tti.
prayas ~ enjoyment, delight; “the soul’s satisfaction in its objects”.
prayoga (prayoga; prayog) ~ application of any of the siddhis of
power.
prema ~ love; “the love which consecrates service, a love which asks
for no return, but spends itself for the satisfaction of that which we
love”, an attribute of the śūdra; an attribute of Mahālaks.mı̄ and of
Pradyumna; short for premānanda; (on page 1281) the name of a
svarga.
prema ānanda
ananda ~ same as premānanda.
prema bhāvasamr.ddhih. saundaryalipsā snehahāsyam ~ love, richness of feeling, the urge towards beauty, laughter of affection (the
attributes of Mahālaks.mı̄).
premabhoga ~ premānanda in the state of bhoga.
premahāsyam ~ laughter of love, an element of Mahālaks.mı̄ bhāva
premahasyam
and a form of devı̄hāsya.
premakāma (premakama; prema-kama) ~ prema and kāma1, two atpremakama
tributes of the śūdra; short for premakāmānanda.
prema, kāma, dāsyalipsātmasamarpan.am ~ love, desire, the urge

4
towards service (dāsyalipsā), self-giving (ātmasamarpan.a): the attributes of the śūdra.
premak
premakamananda
āmānanda (prema-kamananda; prema kamananda) ~ premānanda combined with (subjective) kāmānanda.
premamaya ~ full of love; of the nature of premānanda.
premamaya virodha ~ loving opposition.
premānanda ~ the ānanda of love, the form of subjective ānanda that
premananda
manifests in the vital-emotional being (prān.a and citta); the “fundamental ecstasy of being” translated “in the heart into a wide or deep
or passionate delight of universal union and love and sympathy and
the joy of beings and the joy of things”.
prema n
natha
ātha ~ Lord of Love.
premas
premasamarthyam
āmarthyam (premasamarthyam; prema samarthyam) ~ “capacity for unbounded love for all beings”, an element of cittaśakti.
preran.ā ~ inspiration, especially when it “comes as the actual word
prerana
. . . revealing its meaning”; inspiration as part of the linguistic faculty (bhās.āśakti), giving the meanings of unknown words; writing in
various languages received by inspiration.
present gnosis ~ same as actualistic ideality.
present trik
trikaladrsti
āladr.s.t.i ~ the intuitive knowledge of things in the present
“that are beyond the range of our physical senses or the reach of any
means of knowledge open to the surface intelligence”.
primary d
dasya
āsya ~ the lowest form of dāsya, also called simple dāsya or
personal / egoistic dāsya, whose sign is obedience, “a free subjection
of the Will on the basis of a potential independence”; the relation with
the ı̄śvara in which the jı̄va is “a servant of God”.
primary ideality ~ in May-June 1918, the same as inferior ideality
during the same period; cf. the logistic ideality of 1919-20.
primary logistic gnosis ~ same as intuitional ideality.
primary utth
utthapana
āpanā ~ the first stage of utthāpanā, consisting of the full
force of laghimā, mahimā and an.imā in the mind stuff and psychic
prān.a “so that the mind rejects all exhaustion, weariness, depression
of force etc.”, extended also to the physical prān.a; exercise in the form
of walking (often called “physical activity”) to develop this utthāpanā
in the body.
prithivi ~ see pr.thivı̄.
prithivimaya ~ see pr.thivı̄maya.

5
.priti
prı̄ti (priti; pritih) ~ pleasure; gladness; the “pleasure of the mind”
in the rasa of all experience; an intense delight which “assumes the
place of the scattered and external pleasure of the mind in existence or
rather it draws all other delight into it and transforms by a marvellous
alchemy the mind’s and the heart’s feelings and all sense movements”;
sometimes substituted for bhoga as the second stage of active / positive
samatā or bhukti; an element of Mahāsarasvatı̄ bhāva.
prı̄tih. dāks.yaṁ dānapratidānalipsā ānandı̄bhāva (pritih dakshyam
pritih
danapratidanalipsa anandibhava) ~ pleasure, skill, the tendency to
give and receive, joyfulness.
priya (priya; priyam) ~ pleasant, liked; that which is liked; the sense
of liking.
priya-apriya (priya-apriya; priya apriya) ~ the dvandva of pleasant
and unpleasant, liked and disliked.
priyam ~ see priya.
priy
priyapriyabodha
āpriyabodha ~ the sense of things or persons who are liked and
disliked.
pr
prthivi
. thivı̄ (prithivi) ~ earth; the objective world, same as bhū; Matter,
“the earth-principle creating habitations of physical form for the soul”;
the lowest of the pañcabhūta, material energy in the state “of cohesion,
termed earth or the solid state”; the physical consciousness.
Pr
Prthivi
. thivı̄ (Prithivi) ~ the earth-goddess, a manifestation of Aditi in the
lower hemisphere of existence (aparārdha).
pr.thivı̄maya (prithivimaya) ~ composed of earth; consisting of the
prthivimaya
bhūta called pr.thivı̄1.
prthu
pr
pajah
ājah. ~ wide mass of strength.
. thu p
prthvi
pr
. thvı̄ prasiti ~ wide movement. [Cf. R.g Veda 4.4.1]
pr
prthvim
. thvı̄ṁ prasitim ~ same as pr.thvı̄ prasiti.
pr
prthvi
trsvi
. g Veda 4.4.1]
. thvı̄ tr
. s.vı̄ prasiti ~ wide and swift movement. [Cf. R
psychic pr
prana
ān.a ~ “the life-energy as it acts in support of the mental
activities”, also called sūks.ma prān.a; the prān.a in its psychological
aspect, which, however, normally “leans on the physical life, limits
itself by the nervous force of the physical being, limits thereby the
operations of the mind and becomes the link of its dependence on the
body and its subjection to fatigue, incapacity, disease, disorder”.
pulāv (pullao) [Hindi] ~ a dish of seasoned rice and usually meat or
pulav
fish.

6
.Pulinda ~ member of a mountain-dwelling tribe; barbarian.
.pullao ~ see pulāv.
.purah. ~ fortresses, cities; (in Vedic symbolism) worlds.
.pure inevitable ~ (vāk) having the inevitable quality of style in its
most absolute form, “a speech overwhelmingly sheer, pure and true, a
quintessential essence of convincingly perfect utterance”.
pure trik
trikaladrsti
āladr.s.t.i (trikaldrishti) ~ same as non-telepathic trikāladr.s.t.i.
purı̄s.a (purisha) ~ excrement, stool, the solid matter discharged in
purisa
pārthiva visr.s.t.i; short for purı̄s.a visr.s.t.i.
purisa
purı̄s
visrsti
. s.t.i (purisha visrishti) ~ discharge of purı̄s.a, same as pārthi. a visr
va visr.s.t.i.
pūrn.a ~ full; complete; integral.
purna
purnabrahmadrsti
ūrn.abrahmadr.s.t.i (purnabrahmadrishti) ~ vision of the totality of
brahman.
pūrn.atā ~ fullness of vital force, an element of prān.aśakti.
purnata
pūrn.atā, prasannatā, samatā, bhogasāmarthyam ~ fullness, clearpurnata,
ness, equality, capacity for enjoyment (the elements of prān.aśakti).
pūrn.atā, prasannatā, samatā, bhogasāmarthyam, iti prān.aśaktih.
purnata,
(purnata, prasannata, samata, bhogasamarthyam, iti pranashaktih) ~
fullness, clearness, equality, capacity for enjoyment: these constitute
the power of the life-force.
purna
ūrn.a yoga ~ integral yoga, a spiritual path whose aim is “union with
the being, consciousness and delight of the Divine [saccidānanda]
through every part of our human nature . . . so that the whole may be
transformed into a divine nature of being”; its central method is for
the individual “to spiritualise his being by the power of the soul in
mind opening itself directly to a higher spiritual force and being and
to perfect by that higher force [śakti] so possessed and brought into
action the whole of his nature”.
purna
ūrn.a yogin ~ one who practises pūrn.a yoga.
purohita ~ “put in front”.
purohiti ~ placing in front.
purus.a (purusha) ~ man; person; soul; spirit; the Self (ātman) “as
purusa
originator, witness, support and lord and enjoyer of the forms and
works of Nature” (prakr.ti); the conscious being, universal or individual, observing and upholding the activity of Nature on any plane of
existence; the infinite divine Person (purus.ottama), “the Existent who

7
transcends all definition by personality and yet is always that which
is the essence of personality”; any of the ten types of consciousness
(daśa-gāvas) in the evolutionary scale.
purusa
purus
. a brahma (purusha brahma) ~ brahman seen in its personal
aspect as the purus.a, “the divine Person who knows himself in all
these things and persons and becomes all things and persons in his
consciousness and shapes their thoughts and forms”.
purus.a-prakr.ti (purusha-prakriti; purusha prakriti) ~ “the great dupurusa-prakrti
ality, Soul-Nature” which “in aspect separate, is inseparable”, the
dualism of purus.a, “a witness recipient observing experiencing Consciousness which does not appear to act but for which all these activities
inside and outside us seem to be undertaken and continue” and prakr.ti,
“an executive Force or an energy of Process which is seen to constitute,
drive and guide all conceivable activities and to create a myriad forms
visible to us and invisible and use them as stable supports for its incessant ﬂux of action and creation”. On the lower planes of existence,
purus.a-prakr.ti differs from ı̄śvara-śakti in that “Purusha and Prakriti
are separate powers, but Ishwara and Shakti contain each other”,
but at “a certain spiritual and supramental level”, this dual power
becomes “perfectly Two-in-one, the Master Soul with the Conscious
Force within it, and its potentiality disowns all barriers and breaks
through every limit”; in the perception of the world, the darśana of
purus.a-prakr.ti in all things and beings rises to the vision of Kr.s.n.akālı̄.
purus.ottama (purushottama; purushottam) ~ the supreme Soul, the
purusottama
supreme Being, “the supernal Person of whom all self and nature, all
being and becoming in this or any universe are the self-conception
and the self-energising”; the highest purus.a, who manifests himself in
the aks.ara (immutable) and the ks.ara (mutable), as purus.a poised in
himself and purus.a active in prakr.ti.
purus
purusottama-paraprakrti
. ottama-parāprakr.ti (purushottama-paraprakriti)~the supreme
Being one with his supreme Nature; the “biune” duality of purus.a and
prakr.ti on the highest plane of existence.
puru visva
viśvā janimā mānus.ān.ām (puru viçvâ janima manushânam) ~
all the many births of men. [R
. g Veda 7.62.1]
Pūs.an (Pushan) ~ “the Increaser”, a name or form of the Vedic sunPusan
god, Sūrya2, who progressively “enlarges and opens man’s dark and
limited being into a luminous and infinite consciousness”.
8
.quadruple bh
bhava
āva ~ the
combination of all four aspects of daivı̄
prakr.ti, in which Mahākālı̄ is the “inhabitant” of the Mahāsarasvatı̄
“continent” on the basis of the calm of Maheśvarı̄ and with the
colouring of Mahālaks.mı̄.
quaternary d
dasya
āsya ~ (in January 1913) the highest of four degrees of
dāsya, also called supreme dāsya or “the dasya of the supreme degree
which obeys helplessly the direct impulse of the Master”, corresponding to the third stage of tertiary dāsya in the classification used from
September 1913 onwards.
quaternary d
dasyabuddhi
āsyabuddhi ~ the sense of quaternary dāsya; same as
turı̄ya dāsyabuddhi.
.rabhas ~ impetuosity of force or rapture.
.radhas
rādhas ~ riches; joy, felicity.
.raga
rāga ~ liking, attraction.
.ragadvesa
rāgadves.a (ragadwesha; raga-dwesha) ~ attraction and repulsion.
.rajamsi
rajāṁsi (rajansi) ~ “active forcefulnesses”; activities of tapas (in the
interpretation of a sortilege from R
. g Veda 1.180.1).
.rajas ~ (etymologically) “the shining”; (in the Veda) the antariks.a, “the middle world, the vital or dynamic plane” between heaven (the mental plane) and earth (the physical); “luminous power” established in this intermediate realm; (post-Vedic) the second of the three modes (trigun.a) of the energy of the lower prakr.ti, the gun.a that is “the seed of force and action” and “creates the workings of energy”; it is a deformation of tapas or pravr.tti, the corresponding quality in the higher prakr.ti, and is converted back into pure tapas or pravr.tti in the process of traigun.yasiddhi. This kinetic force “has its strongest hold on the vital nature”, where it “turns always to action and desire”, but “finding itself in a world of matter which starts from the principle of inconscience and a mechanical driven inertia, has to work against an immense contrary force; therefore its whole action takes on the nature of an effort, a struggle, a besieged and an impeded conﬂict for possession which is distressed in its every step by a limiting incapacity, disappointment and suffering”.
.rajasic ud
udasinata
āsı̄natā ~ udāsı̄natā achieved by means proper to the gun.a
of rajas: “the indifference of the moral hero, of the stoic”, which
is “enforced by effort, sustained by resolution, habitualised by long
self-discipline”.
rrajasika
ājasika udasinata
udāsı̄natā (rajasik udasinata) ~ same as rajasic udāsı̄natā.
rājayoga ~ a psychological science of yoga which depends on an
rajayoga
elaborate training of the whole mental system.
rāja-yogin ~ one who practises rājayoga.
raja-yogin
rajogun.a ~ the gun.a of rajas.
rajoguna
raks.as (rakshas) ~ (in the Veda) a type of hostile entity, “the detainer”.
raksas
rāks.asa (rakshasa) ~ same as raks.as; giant, ogre; a kind of anti-divine
raksasa
being of the middle vital plane; the fifth of the ten types of consciousness (daśa-gāvas) in the evolutionary scale: mind concentrated on the
thinking manas (sensational mind). It is the rāks.asa “who first begins really to think, but his thought is . . . egoistic & turned towards
sensation”, seeking “a gross egoistic satisfaction in all the life of the
mind, prana & body”; the “divine use of the Rakshasa force” would
come when it is “changed from a nervous egoism to a sort of powerful
dynamic utility on that plane”.
rāks.asa-asura (rakshasa-asura; rakshasa asura) ~ same as rāks.asāraksasa-asura
sura.
rāks.asāsura (rakshasasura) ~ a combination of rāks.asa and asura; the rāks.asa of the asura type, who evolves in the sixth manvantara of the sixth pratikalpa.
rāks.ası̄ (rakshasi) ~ female rāks.asa; Kālı̄ as ruler of the thinking senseraksasi mind.
raksaso
raks
yāta ~ assail the raks.as powers. [R
. g Veda 5.42.10]
. aso ni yata
raks.asvı̄ (rakshaswi) ~ (in the Veda) a hostile entity, one of “the powers who detain”; same as raks.as.
Rāma ~ the seventh avatāra of Vis.n.u, “the divinely-natured man”, destroyer of Rāvan.a; his work was “to fix for the future the possibility of an order proper to the sattwic civilised human being . . . in a world still occupied by anarchic forces”.
rapports avec la Soc. Theosoph [Société Théosophique] [French] ~ relations with the Theosophical Society.
rapports avec la T.S. [French] ~ see preceding.

0
.rasa (rasa; rasah) ~ sap, juice; body-ﬂuid; “the upﬂow of essential being in the form, that which is the secret of its self-delight”, whose perception is the basis of the sensation of taste; a non-material (sūks.ma) taste; the sūks.ma vis.aya of subtle taste; (short for rasadr.s.t.i) the subtle sense of taste; “the pure taste of enjoyment” in all things, a form of ānanda “which the understanding can seize on and the aesthesis feel as the taste of delight in them”; (also called sama rasa or rasagrahan.a) the perception by the mind of the essential quality (gun.a) in each object of experience, the “essence of delight” in it, the first stage of active / positive samatā or bhukti.
rasabhoga ~ full enjoyment (bhoga) of the rasa or essence of delight in all things, a term used for the third state of bhukti when the second state is called rasaprı̄ti, equivalent to ānanda as “the divine bhoga superior to all mental pleasure with which God enjoys the rasa”.
rasadr.s.t.i (rasadrishti) ~ the perception of tastes imperceptible to the ordinary physical sense; the subtle sense (sūks.ma indriya) of taste, one of the faculties of vis.ayadr.s.t.i.
rasagandha ~ the subtle smell of things tasted.
rasagrahan.a (rasagrahana; rasa-grahana; rasagrahanam) ~ the seizing of the rasa or “principle of delight” in things, “an enlightened enjoyment principally by the perceptive, aesthetic and emotive mind, secondarily only by the sensational, nervous and physical being”, the first of the three states of bhukti, in which the mind “gets the pure taste of enjoyment” of all experience “and rejects whatever is perturbed, troubled and perverse”; same as (sama) rasa, the first stage of active / positive samatā.
rasagrahan.am ~ see rasagrahan.a.
rasagrahanam
rasah. ~ see rasa.
rasah., prı̄tir ānandah. [iti sarvānandah.] ~ rasa, prı̄ti and ānanda
rasah,
constitute sarvānanda or complete delight.
rasajññanam
ānam ~ knowledge or appreciation of rasa.
rasaprı̄ti ~ the pleasure (prı̄ti) of the mind in the rasa or essence of
rasapriti
delight in all things, a term used for the second stage of bhukti.
rasaśuddhi (rasashuddhi) ~ purification of the body-ﬂuids.
rasasuddhi
ratha ~ chariot; joy; a Vedic symbol of “the happy movement of the
Ananda”.
rātha ~ (coined from the same root as ratha) the highest intensity
ratha
1
of each of the three states of bhukti called rasagrahan.a, bhoga and
ānanda.
rati ~ pleasure; the lowest intensity of each of the three states of bhukti
called rasagrahan.a, bhoga and ānanda.
ratna ~ (in the Veda) delight; the second intensity of each of the three
states of bhukti called rasagrahan.a, bhoga and ānanda.
rattachement [French] ~ connection.
raudra ~ fierce, violent; short for raudrānanda.
raudrā ~ see raudrā Kālı̄.
raudra
raudra ananda
ānanda ~ same as raudrānanda.
raudra
raudr
ā K
Kali
ālı̄ ~ the fierce aspect of Kālı̄, “the Mother of all and destroyer of all”, who “saves by her destructions”; prakr.ti or śakti
expressing the nature of Rudra2.
raudrānanda ~ fierce or violent delight; a form of śārı̄rānanda associated with the conversion of suffering into ānanda. It arises “when this human being, imprisoned in matter, subjected to mind, emerges from his subjection, conquers his mind and delivers himself utterly in his body, realising his true anandamaya self in every part of the adhara”, so that “physical pain itself, the hardest thing for material man to bear, changes its nature in experience” and becomes a kind of physical ānanda.
raudratā ~ fierceness, violence.
raudryam ~ fierceness, violence, intensity; force, an attribute of Balarāma.
Rāvan.a ~ the ten-headed rāks.asa king slain by Rāma; “the type of the sensational & emotional Rakshasa-Asura” (see rāks.asāsura), powerful as the result of a tapasyā which was “a self-disciplining for a more intelligently victorious self-indulgence”.
R.bhus (Ribhus) ~ the name of three Vedic gods or demigods, the “artisans of Immortality”; they “are represented as human beings who have attained to the condition of godhead by power of knowledge and perfection in their works” and act as “energies of formation and upward progress who assist the gods in the divinising of man”.
receptive telepathy ~ same as receptive vyāpti.
receptive vy
vyapti
āpti ~ the form of vyāpti by which “the thoughts, feelings
etc. of others or any kind of knowledge of things outside yourself are
felt coming to the mind from those things or persons”.

2
.recursus [Latin] ~ retreat, falling back.
.reference ~ same as sortilege.
.refulgent vvanmaya
āṅmaya ~ the movement of vāṅmaya thought in which the
thought-perception aids itself “by a suggestive inward speech that
attends it to bring out its whole significance”.
representative ~ (in 1920) being of the nature of a luminous thoughtrepresentation of truth which is “a partial manifestation of a greater
knowledge existing in the self but not at the time present to the immediately active consciousness”, related to smr.ti and its faculty of intuition
in its power of “recalling as it were to the spirit’s knowledge the truth
that is called out more directly by the higher powers” of interpretative
and purely revelatory vision; specifically, pertaining to the highest form
of intuitive revelatory logistis, called representative revelatory vijñāna,
or to the lowest element in the highest representative ideality; (in 1927)
short for representative imperative.
representative highest vijñana
ñāna ~ same as representative revelatory
vijñāna.
representative ideality ~ see highest representative ideality.
representative imperative ~ (c. 1920) a form of logos vijñāna formed
by a combination of its representative and imperative elements; (in
early 1927) the lowest form of “the imperative”, evidently representative vijñāna taken up into imperative vijñāna and that again elevated
to one of the lower planes of what by the end of 1927 was called
overmind.
representative-interpretative ~ having the nature of interpretative revelatory vijñāna (the highest inspired revelatory logistis) combined
with representative revelatory vijñāna (the highest intuitive revelatory
logistis).
representative logis ~ same as representative revelatory vijñāna (“logis” may be a slip of the pen for “logistis”).
representative revelatory vijññana
āna ~ (in 1920) the highest form of intuitive revelatory logistis.
representative vijññana
āna ~ same as representative revelatory vijñāna or
(in October 1920) highest representative ideality.
revelation ~ the act of revealing; same as dr.s.t.i, truth-seeing, the faculty
of jñāna that “makes evident to a present vision the thing in itself of
which the idea is the representation”; also, an instance of the working
3
of this faculty; sometimes equivalent to revelatory logistis, the highest
plane of logistic ideality.
revelational ideality ~ same as revelatory logistic ideality.
revelational-inspirational ~ having the nature of revelatory inspiration.
revelative intuition viveka ~ smr.ti (intuition and viveka) combined
with dr.s.t.i (revelation).
revelatory ~ having the nature of revelation (dr.s.t.i), as it acts on the
level of revelatory logistis or another level of ideality or intuitive mind,
often in combination with intuition or inspiration; (in 1920) sometimes
equivalent to full revelatory, sometimes to lower revelatory.
revelatory gnosis ~ same as revelatory logistis.
revelatory ideal ~ having the nature of revelatory ideality.
revelatory ideality ~ same as revelatory logistis.
revelatory inspiration ~ inspiration filled with revelation; same as revelatory inspired logistis.
revelatory inspirational ideality; revelatory inspirational vijñāna ~
same as revelatory inspired logistis.
revelatory inspired ~ having the nature of revelatory inspiration.
revelatory inspired logistis ~ the highest form of inspired logistis, in
which inspiration is filled with revelation.
revelatory interpretative ~ perhaps the same as interpretative revelatory, or pertaining to the highest form of interpretative revelatory
vijñāna.
revelatory intuition ~ intuition with an element of revelation; the highest form of intuitional ideality.
revelatory intuitional ~ having the nature of revelatory intuition.
revelatory intuitional ideality ~ same as revelatory intuition.
revelatory intuitive ~ same as revelatory intuitional.
revelatory intuitive vijñana
ñāna ~ same as revelatory intuition.
revelatory logistic ~ having the nature of revelatory logistis.
revelatory logistic ideality ~ same as revelatory logistis.
revelatory logistis ~ the highest level of logistic ideality, where revelation (dr.s.t.i) determines the predominant character of the working of
the luminous reason.
revelatory mentality ~ the highest level of idealised mentality, a “mind
of luminous revelation” which, in dealing with the movement in time,

4
“sees what is determined behind the play of potentialities and actualities”.
revelatory representative ~ same as lower revelatory representative.
revelatory tapas ~ tapas acting in the revelatory logistis.
revelatory trik
trikaladrsti
āladr.s.t.i (trikaldrishti) ~ trikāladr.s.t.i by means of revelation; the highest level of trikāladr.s.t.i on the first plane of ideality.
revelatory vijññana
āna ~ vijñāna of a predominantly revelatory character;
same as revelatory logistis or full revelatory ideality.
revelatory vijññanamaya
ānamaya ~ having the nature of revelatory vijñāna.
rf. ~ abbreviation of reference (see sortilege).
rhathumia [Greek] ~ easy-going temper; a characteristic of Mahāsarasvatı̄: “the leaving things to take care of themselves instead of
insisting by the ideal tapas upon perfection”.
rhathumos [Greek] ~ easy-going.
Ribhus ~ see R.bhus.
riju ~ see r.ju.
rik ~ see r.k.
rinam ~ see r.n.am.
rishi ~ see r.s.i.
rita, etc. ~ see r.ta, etc.
rita
r.ju (riju) ~ straight.
rju
r.jutāmahimā ~ greatness of the rectitude of the will, an element of
rjutamahima
Maheśvarı̄ bhāva.
r.k (rik) ~ a verse of the R
rk
. g Veda.
r.n.am (rinam) ~ debt; the aspect of r.tam that relates to “our debts of
rnam
the Ignorance”; motion, “the right movement”.
r.n.ayā ~ in motion, following the right movement.
rnaya
rocana (rochana) ~ (in the Veda) the three “shining realms” of svar, forming the luminous summit of the mental plane, where “a divine Light radiates out towards our mentality” from “the vast regions of the Truth”.
roga ~ illness, disease; bodily disorder, considered to be due to various causes including impurities or imbalances in the pañcabhūta and
pañcaprān.a, functional defects, materialisation of “false illness, formulated in symptom and not in root in the sukshma body and thence
pressed upon the sthula”, or simply “the habit of disease”; same as
rogaśakti.

5
.rogamaya ~ diseased, unhealthy.
.rogasakti
rogaśakti (rogashakti) ~ the force of disease, seen as an immaterial
agent of disorder attacking the body from outside.
.rogasarira
rogaśarı̄ra (rogasharira) ~ body subject to disease.
.rsi
r.s.i (rishi) ~ seer; one who possesses the power of “internal vision, . . . a sort of light in the soul by which things unseen become as evident and real to it ~ to the soul and not merely to the intellect - as do things seen to the physical eye”.
r.ta (rita) ~ true, right; (of the nature of) r.tam.
rta
r.tadharma (ritadharma) ~ the law of the truth.
rtadharma
r.tam (rtam, ritam) ~ truth, right; right ordering; truth of fact and arrangement; “ordered truth of active being”, one of the three terms expressing the nature of vijñāna (see satyam r.taṁ br.hat).
rrtam
. taṁ jyotih. (ritam jyotih; jyoti) ~ truth-light; the light of divine truth.
rrtam
satyaṁ brhat
br.hat (ritam satyam brihat) ~ ordered truth, essential
. taṁ satyam
truth and vastness; same as satyam r.taṁ br.hat.
rrtva
vilı̄yante ~ strike and are dissolved.
. tvā viliyante
rudra1 ~ fierce, violent, vehement; strong, forceful; same as raudra.
Rudra2 ~ “the terrible”, a Vedic deity who is “the Violent and Merciful, the Mighty One, . . . the armed, wrathful and beneficent Power of God who lifts forcibly the creation upward, smites all that opposes, scourges all that errs and resists, heals all that is wounded and suffers”; (in the plural) gods with the qualities of this deity, “the fierce, impetuous ones”, such as the Maruts; in later Hinduism, a name of Śiva as the Destroyer, one of the “three Powers and Personalities of the One Cosmic Godhead”, of which the other two are Brahmā, the Creator, and Vis.n.u, the Preserver; in the Record of Yoga, sometimes identified with the Balarāma personality of the fourfold ı̄śvara.
rudra ananda
ānanda ~ vehement delight.
rudrabhāva ~ vehement temperament; vehemence, forcefulness.
rudrabhava
rudrānanda ~ same as raudrānanda.
rudrananda
Rudrān.ı̄ ~ the śakti or devı̄ expressing the energy of Rudra2.
Rudrani
rudra prema ~ violent love; the form of universal prema which “manifests itself in the adverse movements & associates itself with anger,
opposition etc turning them to rudrata pure”.
rudra śakti
sakti (rudrashakti; rudra shakti) ~ vehement force; the soulpower or element of vı̄rya that expresses the personality of the fourfold

6
ı̄śvara as Rudra2 or Balarāma.
rudratā ~ vehement intensity.
rudrata
rudra tapas ~ vehement power.
rudra tapatya ~ vehement tapatya.
rudra tejas ~ vehement energy.
Rudra-Vis.n.u (Rudra-Vishnu; Rudra Vishnu) ~ Rudra2 and Vis.n.u
Rudra-Visnu
forming one deity; Vis.n.u, as the universal deva, putting forward his
Rudra aspect; the combination of the Rudra or Balarāma and Vis.n.u
or Pradyumna personalities of the fourfold ı̄śvara.
rūpa ~ form; image; a non-material (sūks.ma) form, any of “those
rupa
sensible forms of which only the subtle grasp of the inner consciousness can become aware”, which may be of either of two principal
kinds, “mere image” (pratimūrti) or “actual form” (mūrti); the sūks.ma
vis.aya of subtle form; (short for rūpadr.s.t.i) the faculty of seeing subtle
images. Such images “are very variously seen and under all kinds of
conditions; in samadhi [especially svapnasamādhi] or in the waking
state [jāgrat], and in the latter with the bodily eyes closed [antardarśı̄]
or open [bahirdarśı̄], projected on or into a physical object or medium
[sādhāra] or seen as if materialised in the physical atmosphere or
only in a psychical ether revealing itself through this grosser physical
atmosphere [ākāśarūpa]”.
rūpadr.s.t.i (rupadrishti; rupa drishti) ~ the perception of forms invisirupadrsti
ble to the ordinary physical eye; subtle vision, the faculty of vis.ayadr.s.t.i
that “is the most developed ordinarily and the first to manifest itself
with any largeness when the veil of the absorption in the surface consciousness which prevents the inner vision is broken”, called rūpadr.s.t.i
(as opposed to darśana) especially when it is a seeing of the first of the
two main kinds of rūpa, which is seen not “as actual form of things”
but “as image of a remote reality”.
rūpadr.śya (rupadrishya; rupa-drishya; rupa drishya) ~ (in 1917) virupadrsya
sion of images in samādhi; same as rūpadr.s.t.i.
rūpam ~ form.
rupam
rūpa-samādhi (rupa-samadhi; rupasamadhi; rupa samadhi) ~ rūpa
rupa-samadhi
and samādhi, sometimes regarded as a single part of vijñāna.
rūpasiddhi (rupasiddhi; rupa-siddhi; rupa siddhi) ~ the faculty of seerupasiddhi
ing subtle forms or images.
rūpa-vis.aya (rupa-vishaya; rupa vishaya) ~ rūpadr.s.t.i and vis.ayadr.s.t.i;
rupa-visaya

7
an object seen in rūpadr.s.t.i.
.Russie [French] ~ Russia.
.ruti
rut.i [Bengali] ~ ﬂat unleavened bread; chapati.
.sa ~ he; “the Existent self-aware and self-blissful”.
.sa
sā ~ she.
.sabda
śabda (shabda; sabda) ~ sound; word; a non-material
(sūks.ma)
sound; the sūks.ma vis.aya of subtle sound; (short for śabdadr.s.t.i)
the subtle sense of hearing.
śabdadr.s.t.i (shabdadrishti) ~ the perception of sounds inaudible to the
sabdadrsti
ordinary physical ear; (also called śravan.a) subtle hearing, one of the
faculties of vis.ayadr.s.t.i.
saccidānanda (sachchidananda; sacchidananda) ~ “the triune princisaccidananda
ple of transcendent and infinite Existence [sat], Consciousness [cit] and
Bliss [ānanda] which is the nature of divine being” and “the origin,
the continent, the initial and the ultimate reality of all that is in the
cosmos”; in its supreme manifestation in which the three poises or
worlds (lokas) called satyaloka, tapoloka and janaloka are sometimes
distinguished, “the consciousness of unity dominates; the soul lives
in its awareness of eternity, universality, unity, and whatever diversity
there is, is not separative, but only a multitudinous aspect of oneness”.
Saccidānanda is “the highest positive expression of the Reality to our
consciousness” and “at once impersonal and personal”, though the
neuter form saccidānandam is sometimes used for the impersonal
aspect, describing the nature of brahman, while the personal aspect of
saccidānanda is identified with the ı̄śvara.
saccid
saccidanandam
ānandam (sacchidanandam) ~ saccidānanda in its impersonal
aspect as brahman, “That which Is, which, being, comprehends Its
own existence, which, comprehending, has in its silence of being or in
its play of comprehension a self-existent delight”.
sadanam ~ seat, abode.
sadānanda ~ “Ananda of pure existence apart from all objects and exsadananda
periences”, one of the seven forms of ānanda, consisting of the delight
of existence absorbed in unconditioned being (sat), where it is “at rest
in peace of existence”; together with cidānanda and śuddhānanda it
8
comprises kaivalyānanda, the bliss of the absolute, a term also applied
to sadānanda by itself.
sadarśa
sadarsa samadhi
samādhi (sadarsha samadhi) ~ samādhi with inner vision on
the plane of vijñāna.
sad atman
ātman ~ the Self (ātman) as Being (sat), “a pure Existence . . .
from which all things and activities proceed and which supports everything”.
sad brahman ~ brahman as sat, pure Being, which “is the affirmation
by the Unknowable of Itself as the free base of all cosmic existence”,
same as sat brahman.
sādhaka (sadhaka; sadhak) ~ one who practises sādhana.
sadhaka
sādhana (sadhana; sadhan) ~ spiritual discipline; practice of yoga; the process or method leading to siddhi.
ssadhana-ksetra
ādhana-ks.etra (sadhan-kshetra) ~ the field of sādhana; the immediate environment, including “movements of birds, beasts, insects,
people around”, as a field of exercise and experiment, especially for
the development of tapas, telepathy and trikāladr.s.t.i.
ssadhana
ādhana śakti
sakti (sadhana shakti) ~ the Power that directs the yoga.
ssadhana
ādhana tapas ~ tapas applied to sādhana.
sādhāra ~ (subtle sense-perception) with the support (ādhāra) of a
sadhara
physical sensation; (rūpa or lipi) seen on a background or “projected
on or into a physical object or medium”; short for sādhāra ākāśa,
sādhāra lipi or sādhāra rūpa.
ssadhara
ādhāra āk
akasa
āśa (sadhara akasha) ~ (rūpa or lipi) seen in the ether
(ākāśa) against a background, or created from the ākāśa and “thrown
on the background to help the distinctness”.
sādhāradr.s.t.i (sadharadrishti) ~ subtle (sūks.ma) sense-perception
sadharadrsti
stimulated by or superimposed on gross physical (sthūla) sensations;
vision of sādhāra rūpa.
ssadhara
ādhāra lipi ~ lipi seen on a background.
ssadhara
ādhāra rasa ~ subtle taste-perception with the support of a physical
taste.
ssadhara
ādhāra rupa
rūpa ~ rūpa seen on a background.
ssadhara
ādhāra vis
visaya
. aya (sadhara vishaya) ~ subtle sense-perception (vis.ayadr.s.t.i) with the support or stimulus of a physical sensation.
sādharmya ~ becoming of one law of being and action with the
sadharmya
Divine.

9
.sadhya
sādhya ~ same as sādhyadeva.
.sadhyadeva
sādhyadeva ~ a term for the eighth of the ten types of consciousness
(daśa-gāvas) in the evolutionary scale, also called siddhadeva: mind
raised to the plane of ānanda.
s.ad.ripu (shadripu) ~ the six inner enemies, usually listed as lust, anger,
sadripu
greed, arrogance, delusion, envy.
sa ekah. ~ He, the One.
sagun.a (saguna; sagunam) ~ with qualities; characterised by a percepsaguna
tion of the gun.as or “qualities in universal Being” of which all things
are the manifestation; brahman in the action of the three gun.as of the
lower prakr.ti, self-displayed as “the creator and originator of works
in the mutable becoming”; short for sagun.a brahman.
sagun.abodha ~ consciousness of sagun.a brahman.
sagunabodha
saguna
sagun
. a brahma ~ same as sagun.a brahman.
sagun
saguna
brahmadr.s.t.i (saguna brahmadrishti) ~ vision of sagun.a brah. a brahmadrsti
man.
sagun
saguna
. a brahman ~ brahman with qualities, the active brahman,
whose “being assumes by conscious Will all kinds of properties
[gun.as], shapings of the stuff of conscious being, habits as it were
of cosmic character and power of dynamic self-consciousness”; it
provides the basis of “general personality” in the vision of brahman
(brahmadarśana) from which emerge the bhāvas or “states of perception” of the purus.a that reveal the “divine secret behind personality”.
sagun.am ~ see sagun.a.
sagunam
sagun
saguna-nirguna
. a-nirgun.a ~ both sagun.a (possessing qualities) and nirgun.a
(free from qualities); same as sagun.a-nirgun.a brahman.
sagun
saguna-nirguna
. a-nirgun.a brahman ~ brahman perceived in the unity of its
“two essential modes” as equally sagun.a (“qualitied”) and nirgun.a
(“unqualitied”); sagun.a brahman, “a fundamental divine Reality who
is the source and container and master of all relations and determinations”, realised on the foundation of nirgun.a brahman, “a fundamental divine Reality free from all relations or determinates”.
sahaituka ~ having a cause (hetu); associated with a stimulus; (with
reference to any kind of physical ānanda or certain types of subjective ānanda) awakened by a sensation or object; short for sahaituka
ānanda.
sahaituka ānanda
ananda ~ ānanda (especially physical ānanda or any of

0
its forms) awakened by a stimulus (hetu); since “ideal delight in the
body . . . is self-existent even when sahaituka”, the hetu “only awakens, it does not produce it”.
sahajadr.s.t.i (sahajadrishti) ~ innate perception; intuition.
sahajadrsti
sāhaṅkāra ~ egoistic.
sahankara
sāhasa (sahasa; sahasam) ~ boldness, “active courage and daring
sahasa
which shrinks from no enterprise however difficult or perilous”, an
attribute of the ks.atriya.
sāhasam ~ see sāhasa.
sahasam
sahasradala (sahasradala; sahasradal) ~ the “thousand-petalled lotus”; the cakra above the head which is “the centre of communication
direct between the individual being and the infinite Consciousness
above”.
sahāsya ~ with laughter (hāsya), full of a “gladness and cheerfulness
sahasya
which no adverse experience mental or physical can trouble”.
sāhitya ~ literature; literary work (karma) said to fall “under three
sahitya
heads ~ poetry, prose and scholarship”, with further subdivisions of
each of these such as philosophy (darśana) under prose, and philology
(nirukta) under scholarship; sāhitya itself is sometimes listed separately
from some of these divisions and subdivisions, seeming then to refer
mainly to general prose writing.
sāhityasiddhi (sahityasiddhi; sahitya-siddhi; sahitya siddhi) ~ perfecsahityasiddhi
tion of literary work in all its forms, one of the “particular siddhis”,
involving the application of the power of vāk to karma.
sāhityasmr.ti (sahityasmriti) ~ literary memory, the ability to recall passages of poetry or other literature “not by effort to remember . . . but by inspiration” or any action of a “higher memory” by which “things are . . . remembered permanently without committing them to heart”.
sājātyam ~ homogeneousness.
sajatyam
sajos.a (sajosha) ~ united.
sajosa
sakāma ~ accompanied by kāma1 or kāmānanda.
sakama
sakhā ~ friend; “the wise and close and benignant friend of all besakha
ings”.
sakhya ~ friendship; the relation (bhāva) with the ı̄śvara as “the divine Friend” (sakhā), a relation that “admits of an equality and intimacy even in inequality and the beginning of mutual self-giving; at its closest when all idea of other giving and taking disappears, when this relation becomes motiveless except for the one sole all-sufficing motive of love, it turns into the free and happy relation of the playmate in the Lila of existence”.
sakhya-vaira ~ the relation (bhāva) with the ı̄śvara in which sakhya, “the friendhood of God”, is combined with an appearance or play of enmity (vaira), forming part of the composite bhāva.
sāks.āddarśana (sakshaddarshana) ~ seeing what is before the eyes;
saksaddarsana
direct vision; same as pratyaks.a.
sāks.ı̄ (sakshi) ~ witness.
saksi
ssaksi
āks.ı̄ aham (sakshi aham) ~ “I am the witness”; the ego of the witness
consciousness.
ssaksi
āks.i brahma (sakshi brahma) ~ brahman as the witness.
śakti (shakti) ~ force, power; capacity; the supreme Power, the “Consakti
scious Force which forms and moves the worlds”, the goddess (devı̄)
who is “the self-existent, self-cognitive Power of the Lord” (ı̄śvara,
deva, purus.a), expressing herself in the workings of prakr.ti; any of
the various aspects of this Power, particularly Maheśvarı̄, Mahākālı̄,
Mahālaks.mı̄ or Mahāsarasvatı̄, each corresponding to an aspect of
the fourfold ı̄śvara and manifesting in an element of devı̄bhāva or
daivı̄ prakr.ti; the soul-power which reveals itself in each element
of the fourfold personality (brahmaśakti, ks.atraśakti, vaiśyaśakti
and śūdraśakti); “the right condition of the powers of the intelligence,
heart, vital mind and body”, the second member of the śakti catus.t.aya;
the śakti catus.t.aya as a whole; spiritual force acting through the siddhis
of power.
śakti catus.t.aya (sakti, catustaya, shakti chatusthaya; shakti-chatusthaya) ~ the second catus.t.aya, the quaternary of power, consisting of vı̄rya, śakti, daivı̄ prakr.ti (or devı̄bhāva or Can.d.ı̄bhāva), and śraddhā.
sakti jı̄va
śakti jiva (shakti jiva) ~ the soul (jı̄va) in the state in which it “has become an individualised form and action of the divine Shakti” or else “disappears into and becomes one with the Shakti” so that “there is then only the play of the Shakti with the Ishwara”.
sakti marga
śakti mārga (shakti marga) ~ the path of yoga whose foundation is śakti.
śaktiprayoga (shaktiprayoga; shakti-prayoga; shakti prayoga) ~ application of spiritual force by means of the siddhis of power.
.saktiriti
śaktiriti (shaktiriti) ~ śakti (the power of the instruments) consists of. . . .
.śakti upāsanā (shakti upasana) ~ worship of the divine śakti.
.śaktyāṁ bhagavati ca, iti śraddhā (shaktyam bhagawati cha, iti sraddha) ~ śraddhā means faith in God and in his śakti (the formula of the last member of the śakti catus.t.aya).
śakuna (shakuna) ~ omen; an external sign interpreted as giving an indication about the future.
sālamba ~ with support; (pictures or forms) seen in the ākāśa against a background.
sālokya ~ dwelling in the same status of being as the Divine.
salokya
śama (shama; çama) ~ quietude, peace, calm; rest, quiescence, passamasivity; the “divine peace and tranquil eternal repose” which replaces tamas in the liberation (mukti) of the nature from the trigun.a of the lower prakr.ti, “a divine calm, which is not an inertia and incapacity of action, but a perfect power, śakti, holding in itself all its capacity and capable of controlling and subjecting to the law of calm even the most stupendous and enormous activity”.
sama ~ equal; even; universal.
śama ānanda (shama ananda) ~ ānanda filled with peace; calm delight.
sama ānanda ~ equal ānanda; the universal delight in all experiences which constitutes active / positive samatā; the third stage of active / positive samatā, in which “all is changed into the full and pure ecstasy of the spiritual Ananda”.
sama bhoga (sama bhoga; sama-bhoga) ~ equal bhoga; “the equal
enjoyment in the Prana of all things, happenings, experiences, objects
etc.”, the second stage of active / positive samatā.
samādhi ~ concentration; trance; the last member of the vijñāna catus.t.aya: the placing of the consciousness in particular conditions that give it access to larger fields of experience, so that “one can become aware of things in this world outside our ordinary range or go into other worlds or other planes of existence”. The term samādhi includes three principal states corresponding to those of waking (jāgrat), dream (svapna) and deep sleep (sus.upti), but it is applied especially to states of consciousness “in which the mind is withdrawn from outward things” and is often equivalent to svapnasamādhi.
samādhistha ~ absorbed in samādhi.
samāhita ~ concentrated.
.samāhitabhāva ~ concentrated state.
samāja ~ society; the social part of Sri Aurobindo’s work (see ādeśa),
also called kāma1.
.samajika
sāmājika (samajic) ~ social.
.samalipsa
samalipsā ~ equal lipsā.
.samamaya
śamamaya (shamamaya, çamamaya) ~ full of śama; peaceful.
.samana
samāna ~ one of the five workings of the life-force (pañcaprān.a) in the body, that which regulates the interchange of prān.a and apāna where they meet near the navel; it “equalises them and is the most important agent in maintaining the equilibrium of the vital forces and their functions”.
samānanda ~ equal delight; same as sama ānanda.
samananda
samanvita
śam
ānvita karma (shamanvita karma) ~ tranquil activity; action imbued with peace (śama).
sāmānya ~ general, common to all.
samanya
samaran.a ~ struggle, battle.
samarana
sama rasa ~ equal rasa; the equal perception by the mind of “the true essential taste of the inalienable delight of existence in all its variations” which comes by the elimination of “imperfect and perverse forms” of rasa when one can “be entirely disinterested in mind and heart and impose that detachment on the nervous being”, the first stage of active / positive samatā. 
sāmarthya ~ capacity.
samarthya
śamas (shamas; çamas) ~ same as śama.
samas
samatā ~ equality, equanimity, “the capacity of receiving with a calm and equal mind all the attacks and appearances of outward things”, the first member of the samatā / śānti catus.t.aya, consisting of passive / negative samatā and active / positive samatā, “samata in reception of the things of the outward world and samata in reaction to them”; sometimes restricted to the first of these or extended to refer to the samatā catus.t.aya as a whole; also an element of prān.aśakti.
samatā catus. t.aya (samata chatusthaya; samata-chatusthaya; samatachatusthaya) ~ the first catus.t.aya, the quaternary of equality, consisting of samatā, śānti, sukha, and (ātma)prasāda or hāsya; also called the śānti catus.t.aya.
.samatā-hāsyam ~ equality and laughter, a combination of the first and fourth members of the samatā catus.t.aya.
.sama tapas ~ equal tapas; tapas with samatā.
.sama-tapas-prakasa
śama-tapas-prakāśa (shama-tapas-prakasha) ~ the union of śama, tapas and prakāśa, which replace tamas, rajas and sattva in traigun.yasiddhi, the liberation of the nature from the trigun.a; unlike the gun.as of the lower nature, śama, tapas and prakāśa “do not exclude each other, are not at war, are not even merely in equilibrium, but each an aspect of the two others and in their fullness all are inseparable and one”.
samatā śāntih. sukhaṁ hāsyam iti śānticatus.t.ayam (samata shantih
samata
sukham hasyam iti shantichatusthayam) ~ samatā, śānti, sukha and hāsya: these constitute the śānti catus.t.aya.
samat
samata
ā śsanti
ānti sukha h
hasya
āsya (samata shanti sukh hasya) ~ a union of the
four elements of the first catus.t.aya, with hāsya (rather than prasāda)
as the last element.
samat
samata-santi-sukham
ā-śānti-sukham (samata-shanti-sukham) ~ a union of the first
three elements of the first catus.t.aya.
samat
samata
ā śsanti
ānti sukha pras
prasada
āda (samata shanti sukha prasada) ~ a union
of the four elements of the first catus.t.aya, with prasāda (rather than
hāsya) as the last element.
samata
samat
ā siddhi ~ the perfection of samatā or of the samatā catus.t.aya.
samena samavasthita ~ present equally everywhere.
samj
sa
ṁjñña
ā (sanjna) ~ same as saṁjñāna.
samj
sa
ṁjññana
āna (sanjnana) ~ sense-knowledge; “the essential sense” (see indriya) which “in itself can operate without bodily organs” and is “the
original capacity of consciousness to feel in itself all that consciousness
has formed and to feel it in all the essential properties and operations
of that which has form, whether represented materially by vibration of
sound or images of light or any other physical symbol”. Saṁjñāna, like
prajñāna, is one of the “subordinate operations involved in the action
of the comprehensive consciousness” (vijñāna); “if prajñāna can be
described as the outgoing of apprehensive consciousness to possess its
object in conscious energy, to know it, saṁjñāna can be described as
the inbringing movement of apprehensive consciousness which draws
the object placed before it back to itself so as to possess it in conscious
substance, to feel it”.
5
.samo div
diva
ā dadr
dadrse
rocamano
āno (samo diva dadrishe rochamano) ~ to. śe rocam
gether with heaven (the illumined mind) he appears shining. [R
. g Veda
7.62.1]
śamomaya (shamomaya) ~ full of śamas; peaceful.
samomaya
sāmrājya ~ outward empire, “the control by the subjective conscioussamrajya
ness of its outer activities and environment”.
samrāt. ~ universal sovereign; one who is master of his environment.
samrat
śaṁsa (shansa) ~ expression.
samsa
saṁśaya (sanshaya) ~ doubt; positive aśraddhā.
samsaya
sa
samsiddhi
ṁsiddhi catus
catustaya
. t.aya (sansiddhi chatushtaya) ~ the quaternary of integral perfection; another name for the siddhi catus.t.aya.
saṁskāra (sanskara; sanskar) ~ impression, mental formation, habitsamskara
ual reaction formed by one’s past.
samudra ~ ocean.
sāmudrika (samudrik) ~ palmistry.
samudrika
samūha ~ gathering together of the rays of the sun of knowledge. [Cf.
samuha
Īśā Upanis.ad 16]
samula
sam
ūla vin
vinasa
āśa (samula vinasha) ~ total and radical destruction.
saṁvr.ta (sanvrita) ~ covered, concealed.
samvrta
samyak is. ~ complete force of impulsion.
saṁyama (sanyama; samyama) ~ self-control; concentration; identisamyama
fication; dwelling of the consciousness on an object until the mind of
the observer becomes one with the observed and the contents of the
object, including its past, present and future, are known from within.
sanātana ~ eternal.
sanatana
sandhi ~ euphonic combination.
saṅghāta ~ aggregation.
sanghata
sani ~ secure possession.
sanjna ~ see saṁjñā.
sanjnana ~ see saṁjñāna.
saṅkalpa ~ resolution, volition, will.
sankalpa
saṅkara ~ mixture, confusion.
sankara
saṅkars.an.a (sankarshana) ~ squeezing together; one of the five forms
sankarsana
of pain to be turned into raudrānanda.
sanmaya ~ having the nature of sat, the principle of pure existence
that is the first aspect of saccidānanda; expressing the principle of sat
contained in the principle of any other plane, such as the physical or

6
the ānanda plane (see next).
.sanmaya ānanda
ananda ~ the sanmaya level of the plane of ānanda.
.sannyasa
sannyāsa ~ renunciation.
.sannyasi
sannyāsı̄ ~ ascetic.
.sanny
sannyasocita
āsocita bhava
bhāva (sannyasochita bhava) ~ the state of mind conducive to renunciation.
.sanshaya ~ see saṁśaya.
.sansiddhi chatushtaya ~ see saṁsiddhi catus.t.aya.
.sanskara; sanskar ~ see saṁskāra.
.santa
śānta (shanta) ~ calm, peaceful.
.santam
śāntam (shantam) ~ same as śāntaṁ brahma.
.śsantam
āntaṁ brahma (shantam brahma) ~ the silent brahman, same as
nirgun.a brahman, the static aspect of brahman which stands aloof
from the cosmic movement, “the pure featureless One Existence, the
Impersonal, the Silence void of activities”.
śsanta
ānta samata
samatā (shanta samata) ~ calm equality.
śsanta
ānta sukham (shanta sukham) ~ calm happiness.
śsanta
ānta udasinata
udāsı̄natā (shanta udasinata) ~ tranquil indifference or impartiality, “a calm superiority of the high-seated soul above the contacts
of things”.
śānti (shanti; çanti) ~ peace, calm; the second member of the samatā /
santi
śānti catus.t.aya, consisting of “a vast passive calm” based on udāsı̄natā
or “a vast joyous calm” based on nati; an element of Maheśvarı̄ bhāva.
śsanti
ānti catustaya
catus.t.aya (shanti chatusthaya; shanti-chatusthaya) ~ the first
catus.t.aya, the quaternary of peace, consisting of samatā, śānti, sukha,
and hāsya or (ātma)prasāda; also called the samatā catus.t.aya.
śāntih. viśālatā aikyalipsā ātmaprasādah. ~ calm, wideness, the urge
santih
towards unity, clear and tranquil happiness (the attributes of Maheśvarı̄).
śāntimaya (shantimaya) ~ peaceful.
santimaya
santos.a (santosha) ~ contentment.
santosa
sānu ~ level, plane.
sanu
sanvrita ~ see saṁvr.ta.
sanyama ~ see saṁyama.
saprān.a ~ living.
saprana
saprema ~ accompanied by prema or premānanda.
sapta catus. t.aya (sapta chatusthaya) ~ the seven catus.t.ayas or quaternaries, an enumeration of the elements of the yoga of self-perfection, Sri Aurobindo’s practice of which is documented in the Record of Yoga. 
sapta hotr
hotrah
āh. (sapta hotráh) ~ the seven sacrificial energies or “Ladies
of the offering”, the powers of “the human sacrifice which has a sevenfold energy of its action because there is a sevenfold principle in our
being which has to be fulfilled in its integral perfection”.
saptarci (saptarchi) ~ the seven rays or ﬂames (of agni1, the principle
of visible formation, or Agni2, the deity who supports this principle),
identified with the seven types of akashic material.
Saramā ~ a Vedic goddess whose action is “a forerunner of the dawn
Sarama
of Truth in the human mind”, depicted in “the figure of the divine
hound which was . . . a possibly later development of the Vedic imagery”; she represents the discovering intuition, a faculty “which goes
straight to the Truth by the straight path of the Truth and not through
the crooked paths of doubt and error”.
Sarasvatı̄ (Sarasvati, Saraswati) ~ “she of the stream, the ﬂowing movement”, a Vedic goddess who “represents the truth-audition, śruti, which gives the inspired word”; in later Hinduism, “the goddess of speech, of learning and of poetry”; same as Mahāsarasvatı̄.
Sarasvatı̄
Sarasvati bhava
bhāva (Saraswati bhava) ~ same as Mahāsarasvatı̄ bhāva.
sārathi ~ charioteer.
sarathi
śarı̄ra (sharira) ~ the body; the śarı̄ra catus.t.aya.
sarira
śārı̄ra (shárı́ra; shârira; sharira; çarira) ~ relating to the body; physisarira
cal; short for śārı̄ra ānanda or śārı̄rasiddhi.
śsarira
ārı̄ra ananda
ānanda (sharira ananda) ~ same as śārı̄rānanda.
sarira catustaya
śarı̄ra
catus.t.aya (sharirachatusthaya; sharira chatusthaya)~the fourth
catus.t.aya, the quaternary of the body, whose members are ārogya,
utthāpanā, saundarya and ānanda (or vividhānanda).
śsarira
ārı̄ra mukti (sharira mukti) ~ physical mukti, especially liberation of
the body from the dualities of the physical prān.a.
śārı̄rānanda (sharirananda) ~ (also called physical ānanda) “the total
sarirananda
physical delight” experienced when spiritual ānanda “can ﬂow into
the body and inundate cell and tissue”; ānanda manifesting in the
body in the five forms called kāmānanda, vis.ayānanda, tı̄vrānanda,
raudrānanda and vaidyutānanda; (especially in the plural, “shariranandas”) any of these forms of physical ānanda; the forms of physical
ānanda other than kāmānanda.
8
.sarirasiddhi
śārı̄rasiddhi (sharirasiddhi; sharira-siddhi; sharira siddhi; shárira -;
çarira -) ~ physical perfection, consisting of the siddhi of the śarı̄ra
catus.t.aya: “a perfection of the body as the outer instrument of a
complete divine living on earth . . . effected by bringing in the law of
the gnostic Purusha, vijñānamaya purus.a, and of that into which it
opens, the Anandamaya, into the physical consciousness”, leading to
“a divinising of the law of the body”.
śarı̄rayātrā (sharirayatra) ~ the journey or pilgrimage of the body; the
sarirayatra
maintenance of one’s physical life. [Gı̄tā 3.8]
śsaririka
ārı̄rika ananda
ānanda (sharirika ananda) ~ same as śārı̄rānanda.
sarupa
sar
ūpa dhyana
dhyāna (sarup dhyan) ~ meditation with vision of rūpa.
sarva ~ all; the All; same as sarvaṁ brahma.
sarva-ananta ~ same as sarvam anantam.
sarva-ananta-jññana
āna ~ same as sarvam anantaṁ jñānam.
sarva ananta jñāna ānanda Kr.s.n.a (sarva ananta jnana ananda Krishna) ~ Kr.s.n.a as the fourfold brahman in its personal aspect.
sarva ananta jñana
ñāna brahman ~ same as sarvam anantaṁ jñānam.
sarvabhūtes.u (sarvabhuteshu) ~ in all beings.
sarvabhutesu
sarva brahma; sarva brahman ~ same as sarvaṁ brahma.
sarvadarśana (sarvadarshana) ~ vision of all; especially, the vision of ānanda on every plane.
sarvakarmas
sarvakarmasamarthya
āmarthya (sarvakarmasamarthya; sarvakarmasamarthyam) ~ capacity for all action, a quality common to the four aspects of daivı̄ prakr.ti, also called karmasāmarthya: “a rapid and divine capacity for all kinds of action that may be demanded from the instrument”.
sarvakarmas
sarvakarmasamarthyam
āmarthyam ~ see sarvakarmasāmarthya.
sarvalokadr.s.t.i (sarvalokadrishti) ~ vision of all the worlds.
sarvalokadrsti
sarvam ~ same as sarvaṁ brahma.
sarvam anandam
ānandaṁ brahma ~ sarvaṁ brahma combined with ānandaṁ brahma.
sarvam anantam ~ sarvaṁ brahma combined with anantaṁ brahma.
sarvam anantam ānandaṁ brahma ~ sarvam anantam combined
with ānandaṁ brahma.
sarvam anantam anandam
ānandaṁ brahma-purusa
brahma-purus.a (sarvam anantam anandam brahma-purusha) ~ a union of the impersonal and personal aspects of sarvam anantam ānandaṁ brahma.
.sarvam ananta
anantam
ṁ jññanam
ānam ~ sarvam anantam combined with jñānaṁ
brahma.
.sarvam anantaṁ jñānam ānandam ~ same as sarvam anantaṁ
jñānam ānandaṁ brahma.
.sarvam ananta
anantam
ṁ jññanam
ānam anandam
ānandaṁ brahma ~ the formula expressing
the realisation of the fourfold brahman, when one sees “all the universe as the manifestation of the One” (sarvaṁ brahma), “all quality
and action as the play of his universal and infinite energy” (anantaṁ
brahma), “all knowledge and conscious experience as the outﬂowing
of that consciousness” (jñānaṁ brahma), and “all in the terms of that
one Ananda” (ānandaṁ brahma).
sarvam anantaṁ jñānam ānandaṁ brahma, iti brahmacatus.t.ayam
(sarvam anantam jnanam anandam brahma, iti brahmachatushtayam)
~ sarvaṁ brahma, anantaṁ brahma, jñānaṁ brahma and ānandaṁ
brahma: these constitute the brahma catus.t.aya.
sarvam anantaṁ jñānaṁ brahma ~ same as sarvam anantaṁ jñānam.
sarvamaya ~ Kr.s.n.a seen “as the All, not only in the unique essence of
things, but in the manifold form of things”, the first degree of the third
intensity of Kr.s.n.adarśana, a kind of vision of the divine Personality
corresponding to sarvaṁ brahma in the impersonal brahmadarśana.
sarva
sarvam
ṁ brahma ~ the realisation of “the Brahman that is the All”,
in which all the universe is experienced “as the manifestation of the
One”, the first member of the brahma catus.t.aya; the divine Reality
(brahman) seen “as the material & informing presence of the world
& each thing it contains”.
sarva
sarvam
ṁ brahman ~ same as sarvaṁ brahma.
sarva
sarvam
ṁ jññanam
ānaṁ brahma ~ sarvaṁ brahma combined with jñānaṁ
brahma.
sarva
sarvam
ṁ samam anandam
ānandaṁ brahma ~ the universal and equal delight of
brahman.
sarvānanda ~ complete delight; a term for active / positive samatā,
sarvananda
including all its three stages; universal ānanda.
sarv
sarvarambhan
ārambhān parityajya ~ abandoning all personal initiations of action. [Cf. Gı̄tā 12.16, 14.25, 18.66]
sarvasaundarya (sarvasaundarya; sarva-saundarya; sarvasaundaryam) ~ all-beauty; the “universal Beauty which we feel in Nature
0
and man and in all that is around us”, reﬂecting “some transcendent
Beauty of which all apparent beauty here is only a symbol”; short for
sarvasaundaryabodha or sarvasaundarya darśana.
sarvasaundaryabodha ~ the sense of universal beauty, “a delightperception and taste of the absolute reality all-beautiful in everything”.
sarvasaundarya darśana
darsana (sarvasaundarya darshana) ~ the vision of
universal beauty, “an aesthesis and sensation of beauty and delight
universal and multitudinous in detail”.
sarvasaundaryam ~ see sarvasaundarya.
sarvasundara (sarvasundara; sarva-sundara) ~ (Kr.s.n.a as) the Allbeautiful.
sarvatragati ~ (literally) going everywhere; same as viśvagati.
sarvavastus
sarvavastusu
ı̄śvara (sarvavastushu ishwara) ~ the Lord in all things.
. u isvara
sarves
sarvesam
ām
etesam
etes
ā
balaṁ pravrttir
pravr.ttir mahattvam (sarvesham etesham
. ṁ tejo balam
tejo balam pravrittir mahattvam) ~ in all of these (elements of vı̄rya
there must be) energy, strength, dynamism and greatness (the four
terms of the first general formula of the śakti catus.t.aya).
sarves.vetes.u ks.ipratā, sthairyam, adı̄natā ceśvarabhāvah. (sarveshvesarvesvetesu
teshu kshiprata, sthairyam, adinata cheshwarabhava) ~ in all of these
(elements of śakti there must be) swiftness, steadiness, non-depression
and mastery (the four terms of the second general formula of the śakti
catus.t.aya).
sasmaran.a (sasmarana; sa-smarana) ~ with smaran.a; (physical ānansasmarana
da) dependent on attention.
sasnina ~ preserving.
saśraddh
sasraddha
ā śakti
sakti (sasraddha shakti) ~ force applied with faith in the
result.
śāstra (shastra) ~ systematic knowledge.
sastra
sat ~ being, existence; substance; “pure existence, eternal, infinite, indefinable, not affected by the succession of Time, not involved in the extension of Space, beyond form, quantity, quality”, the first term of saccidānanda and the principle that is the basis of satyaloka; “the spiritual substance of being” which is cast “into all manner of forms and movements”; existence as “the stuff of its own becoming”, which on every plane is “shaped into the substance with which Force has to deal” and “has formed itself here, fundamentally, as Matter; it has been objectivised, made sensible and concrete to its own self-experiencing conscious-force in the form of self-dividing material substance” (anna1); short for sat brahman.
satapas ~ with tapas; maintained by an effort of will.
satapas smaran. a ~ smaran.a (memory) accompanied by tapas (will); active attention.
satarka ~ same as savitarka.
sat brahman (sat brahman; sat-brahman) ~ brahman as universal Being, same as sarvaṁ brahma; “Existence pure, indefinable, infinite, absolute, . . . the fundamental Reality which Vedantic experience discovers behind all the movement and formation which constitute the apparent reality”.
sat-cit-ānanda (sat-chit-ananda, satchitananda) ~ (usually spelled saccidānanda) Existence-Consciousness-Bliss, “the infinite being [sat], the infinite consciousness [cit], the infinite delight [ānanda] which are the supreme planes of existence and from which all else derives or descends into this obscurer ambiguous manifestation”; referred to as “thrice seven” planes because “each of the divine principles contains in itself the whole potentiality of all the other six notes of our being” (see loka).
sāti ~ safety; secure possession (of a siddhi).
sati
ssatir
ātir dhanānām ~ “safe enjoyment of our havings”, assured possession of our (spiritual) riches. [Cf. R.g Veda 1.4.9]
satis universitatis [Latin] ~ enough of the universe.
sat-kośa (sat-kosha) ~ the sheath (kośa) of our being corresponding to the plane of absolute existence (sat).
sat-purus.a (sat-purusha; sat purusha) ~ the spirit in its poise of pure
sat-purusa
existence; the highest form of consciousness in the evolutionary scale.
sat samudra (chit samudra) ~ ocean of existence.
sat-tapas ~ existence (sat) moulding itself through its own force
(tapas).
sattva (sattwa) ~ being; the highest of the three modes (trigun.a) of the energy of the lower prakr.ti, the gun.a that is “the seed of intelligence” and “conserves the workings of energy”; it is derived from prakāśa, the corresponding quality in the higher prakr.ti, and is converted back into pure prakāśa in the process of traigun.yasiddhi. Psychologically, sattva is the “purest quality of Nature”, that which “makes for assimilation and equivalence, right knowledge and right dealing, fine harmony, firm balance, right law of action, right possession”; but its knowledge and will are “the light of a limited mentality” and “the government of a limited intelligent force”, and “its limited clarity falls away from us when we enter into the luminous body of the divine Nature”.
sattvasthiti (sattwasthiti) ~ abiding in sattva.
sattwatamasic ud
udasinata
āsı̄natā ~ indifference (udāsı̄natā) due to a combination of sattva and tamas, which can arise when tamasic udāsı̄natā
aids itself “by the intellectual perception that the desires of life cannot
be satisfied, that the soul is too weak to master life, that the whole
thing is nothing but sorrow and transient effort”, or when sattwic
udāsı̄natā “calls in the aid of the tamasic principle of inaction” to get
rid of the disturbances caused by rajas, and the seeker of liberation
“strives by imposing an enlightened tamas on his natural being . . . to
give the sattwic guna freedom to lose itself in the light of the spirit”.
sattwic ud
udasinata
āsı̄natā ~ udāsı̄natā due to a predominance of sattva: “a
high intellectual indifference seated above the disturbances to which
our nature is prone”, a “philosophic equality” that can come “with
the perception of the world either as an illusion [māyā] or a play [lı̄lā]
and of all things as being equal in the Brahman”.
satya ~ true; truth (same as satyam); short for satyaloka or satyayuga.
satya br
brhat
. hat (satya brihat) ~ essential truth and wideness.
satyadarśanam
satyadarsanam (satyadarshanam) ~ truth-vision.
satyadeva ~ literally “true god”; a term used for the highest of the
ten types of consciousness (daśa-gāvas) in the evolutionary scale, also
called siddhadeva or siddha purus.a: mind raised to the plane of sat.
satyadharma ~ the law of the Truth; knowledge in action.
satyadharm
satyadharmaya
āya dr
drstaye
. s.t.aye (satyadharmaya drishtaye) ~ for the law of
the Truth, for sight. [Īśā Upanis.ad 15]
satyadr.s.t.i (satyadrishti) ~ true vision; vision of the truth; an element
satyadrsti
of Maheśvarı̄ bhāva.
satyakalpanā ~ truth-imagination.
satyakalpana
satyaloka ~ the world (loka) of the “highest truth of being”, the plane
of sat, where the “soul may dwell in the principle of infinite unity
of self-existence and be aware of all consciousness, energy, delight,
knowledge, will, activity as conscious form of this essential truth, Sat
or Satya”.
satyam ~ truth; essential truth of being, one of the three terms ex-

3
pressing the nature of vijñāna (see satyam r.taṁ br.hat).
.satya manomaya ~ true mental.
.satya
satyam
ṁ brhat
br.hat (satyam brihat) ~ true and vast; essential truth and wideness.
.satya
satyam
ṁ brhat
br.hat rrtam
. tam (satyam brihat ritam) ~ essential truth, wideness
and ordered truth; see satyam r.taṁ br.hat.
.satyam rtam
r.tam (satyam ritam) ~ (of the nature of) essential truth and
ordered truth.
.satyam rtam
r.taṁ brhat
br.hat (satyam ritam brihat) ~ “consciousness of essential
truth of being (satyam), of ordered truth of active being (r.tam) and
the vast self-awareness (br.hat) in which alone this consciousness is
possible”; these three terms express the nature of vijñāna. [Cf. Atharva
Veda 12.1.1, satyaṁ br.had r.tam]
satyaprakāśa (satyaprakasha) ~ true illumination; light of truth.
satyaprakasa
satyapratijñña
ā ~ true promise.
satyarūpa ~ actual form.
satyarupa
satyāsatya ~ truth and falsehood, a duality (dvandva) of the mind
satyasatya
“created by our limited nature of consciousness and the partiality of
our intellect and its little stock of reasonings and intuitions”.
satyatapatya ~ true tapatya.
satyavadanam ~ truth-utterance.
satyayuga (satyayuga; satya yuga) ~ the “Age of Truth” or Golden Age; “a period of the world in which a harmony, stable and sufficient, is created and man realises for a time, under certain conditions and limitations, the perfection of his being”, the first age in a caturyuga, whose master-spirit is the brāhman.a.
śauca (saucha) ~ purity.
sauca
saumatya ~ the state of a mind at ease; mildness (see saumyatā, for
which saumatya was possibly substituted by a slip of the pen).
saumya ~ mild, subdued.
saumya-raudra ~ mild-fierce.
saumyatā ~ mildness.
saumyata
saumya tejas ~ subdued energy.
saundarya (saundarya; saundaryam) ~ beauty; physical beauty as part
of the perfection of the body, the third member of the śarı̄ra catus.t.aya,
involving an attempt “of the psychic body to alter by mental force the
physical sheath into its own image”; beauty in the world; short for

4
saundaryabodha.
.saundaryabodha (saundaryabodha; saundarya bodha) ~ the awareness of beauty in all things.
.saundarya-buddhi ~ the sense of beauty in all things.
.saundaryadr
saundaryadrstih
. s.t.ih. ~ vision of beauty, an element of Mahālaks.mı̄bhāva.
.saundaryalipsā (saundaryalipsa) ~ the urge towards beauty, an element of Mahālaks.mı̄bhāva.
.saundaryam ~ see saundarya.
.saundaryasiddhi ~ perfection of physical beauty through “conscious action by the Will on the formed body”, part of śārı̄rasiddhi.
.saurya ~ solar.
.saurya
śaurya (shaurya; sauryam) ~ heroism, courage, might; an element of Mahākālı̄ bhāva or Can.d.ı̄bhāva.
.sauryam
śauryam ~ see śaurya.
.sauryam
śauryam ugratā yuddhalipsāt.t.ahāsyaṁ ~ heroism, impetuosity, the urge towards battle, loud laughter (the attributes of Mahākālı̄).
.sauryam,
śauryam, ugratā, yuddhalipsāt.t.ahāsyaṁ, dayā ceśvarabhāvah. sarvakarmasāmarthyam (shauryam, ugrata, yuddhalipsattahasyam, daya
cheshwarabhavah sarvakarmasamarthyam) ~ heroism, impetuosity, the urge towards battle, loud laughter, compassion, sovereignty, capacity for all action: the four specific attributes of Mahākālı̄ and the three attributes common to all four aspects of daivı̄ prakr.ti.
śavaso napātah. ~ “grandsons of luminous Force”, an epithet of the R.bhus as offspring of Indra, who “is born out of luminous Force as is Agni out of pure Force”.
sāvalambana ~ with support (of a background against which lipi
savalambana
appears in the ākāśa); same as sādhāra.
sāveśa (savesha) ~ inspired; enthusiastic.
savesa
savicāra (savichara) ~ (samādhi) with judgment; having the nature of
savicara
savicāra samādhi.
savicāra samadhi (savichara samadhi) ~ a type of samādhi “in which the mind does not reason logically but judges and perceives”.
savijñana ~ (samādhi) with experiences on the plane of vijñāna; sameas vijñānamaya.
savijñāna samadhisamādhi ~ samādhi with thought, sight and other kinds of experience on the plane of vijñāna.
5
.savikalpa ~ admitting of variety or distinctions; (samādhi) with variety of experience on the mental plane; same as savikalpa samādhi.
.savikalpa samadhi
samādhi ~ a type of samādhi in which the mind is open to
all kinds of inner experiences.
.savisesa
saviśes.a (savishesha) ~ qualified; differentiated; (ānanda) associated
with specific objects, equivalent to sahaituka.
.savitarka ~ (samādhi) with reasoning; having the nature of savitarka
samādhi.
.savitarka samadhi
samādhi ~ a type of samādhi in which the mind is withdrawn into itself, but goes on thinking and reasoning.
.saviveka samadhi
samādhi ~ samādhi with intuitive discrimination, a higher
form of savitarka samādhi.
.sayujya
sāyujya ~ contact of the individual being in all its parts with the
Divine.
.script ~ communication from a divine or other source, usually received
through a process resembling automatic writing.
.script vvani
ān.ı̄ ~ vān.ı̄ accompanied by or formulated in script.
.secondary ddasya
āsya ~ an intermediate form of dāsya, also called double / prakritic dāsya, “in which the Prakriti uses the instrument and
itself obeys the Ishwara, but guided as if from behind a veil”.
secondary ideality ~ (in 1918) same as superior ideality; (in 1919)
same as secondary logistic gnosis or inspired logistis).
secondary logistic gnosis ~ same as inspired logistis.
secondary utth
utthapana
āpanā ~ the second stage of utthāpanā, in which reactions contradicting the siddhis of the body are eliminated “so that the
limbs and the whole body can take and maintain any position or begin
and continue any movement for any length of time naturally and in
its own right”; exercise to develop this kind of utthāpanā by holding
various positions of the limbs for extended periods.
second vijñana
ñāna ~ same as śrauta vijñāna.
seer ~ same as dras.t.ā or dras.t.r.; revelatory; having the nature of seer
ideality or seer logistis.
seer gnosis ~ same as seer ideality.
seer hermesis ~ seer ideality in the hermesis; the highest level of hermetic ideality.
seer ideality ~ the highest of the three planes of ideality, evidently the
plane whose essence is dr.s.t.i or revelation, as the essence of the logistic
6
ideality is smr.ti and the essence of the hermetic ideality is śruti; the
seer logistis, in which the action of the seer ideality is “modified to
suit the lower key of the logistis”, is sometimes referred to by the same
name. If the plane of highest mind or intuitive consciousness in the
diagram on page 1360 (c. 1931) is correlated with the seer ideality of
1919, this plane would seem to correspond to what Sri Aurobindo in
his later writings called “Intuition”, about which he explained: “what
is thought-knowledge in the Higher Mind becomes illumination in the
Illumined Mind and direct intimate vision in the Intuition”.
seer logistic ~ having the nature of seer logistis.
seer logistical ideality; seer logistic ideality ~ same as seer logistis.
seer logistis ~ (in 1919) a high level of logistic ideality full of the inﬂuence of the seer ideality; same as revelatory logistis or full revelatory
ideality.
seer tapas ~ tapas acting in the seer logistis.
seer telepathic trik
trikaladrsti
āladr.s.t.i (trikaldrishti) ~ telepathic trikāladr.s.t.i in
the revelatory logistis, a form of seer trikāladr.s.t.i.
seer telepathy ~ telepathy in the seer logistis.
seer trik
trikaladrsti
āladr.s.t.i (trikaldrishti) ~ trikāladr.s.t.i in the seer logistis.
self-śraddh
self-sraddha
ā (self-çraddha) ~ faith in the power within oneself; same
as svaśaktyāṁ śraddhā.
se to rajii
rājı̄i holo [Bengali] ~ he has agreed.
shabda, etc. ~ see śabda, etc.
shabda
shadripu ~ see s.ad.ripu.
shakti, etc. ~ see śakti, etc.
shakti
shakuna ~ see śakuna.
shama, etc. ~ see śama, etc.
shama
shansa ~ see śaṁsa.
shanta, etc. ~ see śānta, etc.
shanta
shanti, etc. ~ see śānti, etc.
shanti
sharira, etc. ~ see śarı̄ra, etc.
sharira
shastra ~ see śāstra.
shaurya ~ see śaurya.
shita, etc. ~ see śı̄ta, etc.
shita
Shiva, etc. ~ see Śiva, etc.
Shiva
shruti ~ see śruti.
shubham ~ see śubham.

huddha
shuddha, etc. ~ see śuddha, etc.
.shuddhi ~ see śuddhi.
.shudra
shudra, etc. ~ see śūdra, etc.
.siddha ~ perfected; perfect; the “perfected soul”, same as siddha yogin; a type of consciousness above the deva; (on page 1280) another term for sadānanda.
siddhadeva ~ literally “perfect god”; one of the ten types of consciousness (daśa-gāvas) in the evolutionary scale (considered variously to be the eighth, ninth or tenth in this scale).
siddhānta ~ conclusion; the demonstrated conclusion of a logical arsiddhanta
gument.
siddha purusa
purus.a (siddha purusha) ~ a term for the highest of the ten types (daśa-gāvas) in the evolutionary scale, also called siddhadeva or satyadeva.
siddhāsura ~ the ninth of the ten types (daśa-gāvas) in the evolutionary scale, also called siddhadeva: mind raised to the plane of tapas.
siddha yogin ~ yogin who has achieved siddhi.
siddhi ~ success; fulfilment; perfection, regarded not as a static condition, but as an automatically self-fulfilling movement of growth into a higher divine nature; accomplishment of the aims of self-discipline by yoga, the last member of the siddhi catus.t.aya; perfection of any element of the yoga; (“first siddhi”, etc.) fulfilment of a particular catus.t.aya, referred to by its number in the sapta catus.t.aya; an occult power or supernormal faculty, especially any of the eight included in the as.t.asiddhi, grouped into two siddhis of knowledge, three siddhis of power and three siddhis of the body.
siddhi-asiddhi (siddhi-asiddhi; siddhi asiddhi) ~ success and failure.
siddhi catus. t.aya (siddhichatusthaya; siddhi chatusthaya) ~ the seventh and last catus.t.aya, the quaternary of perfection, consisting of śuddhi, mukti, bhukti and siddhi; also called the saṁsiddhi catus.t.aya or yoga catus.t.aya.
siddhiprayoga (siddhiprayoga; siddhi-prayoga) ~ application of any or all of the siddhis of power.
siddhis of knowledge ~ prākāmya and vyāpti, two of the eight siddhis of the as.t.asiddhi, which together constitute telepathy.
siddhis of power ~ aiśvarya, ı̄śitā and vaśitā, three of the eight siddhis of the as.t.asiddhi, which together form the instrumentation of tapas.
.siddhis of the body ~ mahimā, laghimā and an.imā, three of the eight siddhis of the as.t.asiddhi; garimā is sometimes included in mahimā. These siddhis develop when the “gross body begins to acquire something of the nature of the subtle body and to possess something of its relations with the life-energy; that becomes a greater force more powerfully felt and yet capable of a lighter and freer and more resolvable physical action”.
siddhyasiddhi ~ success and failure.
siṁhavāhinı̄ (singhabahini) [Bengali] ~ the Goddess (devı̄) riding on a lion, “the symbol of the Divine Consciousness acting through a divinised physical-vital and vital-emotional force”.
siṁhı̄ (singhi) ~ lioness.
simhi
simple d
dasya
āsya (dasyam) ~ the lowest form of dāsya, also called primary dāsya or personal / egoistic dāsya, “the dasya of the servant”, characterised by “that obedience to the divine impulsion which is selfchosen & depends on the individual’s intelligence of God’s will and his consent, his readiness to obey”.
śimul [Bengali] ~ silk-cotton tree.
simul
śı̄ta (shita) ~ cold.
sita
śı̄tasparśa (shitasparsha) ~ touch of cold objects.
sitasparsa
śı̄tos.n.a (shitoshna) ~ cold and heat, a duality (dvandva) of the physisitosna
cal prān.a.
Śiva (Siva, Shiva) ~ “the auspicious”, a name of the god who is at once “the Master of the force that acts in the worlds and the Yogin who enjoys the supreme liberty and peace”; especially the contemplative aspect of this deity, in contrast to his “terrible” aspect which is called Rudra and sometimes regarded as a distinct god; the divine personality representing absolute Existence (sat) with infinite Force (tapas) inherent in it, whose immobility is translated in the lower hemisphere of existence (aparārdha) by inertia, figured in the image of Śiva’s body lying under the feet of the dancing Kālı̄; (also called Maheśvara and identified with Mahāvı̄ra) the aspect of the fourfold ı̄śvara whose śakti is Maheśvarı̄; a name of the Lord and supreme Being (ı̄śvara, purus.ottama).
siva
śiv
ā K
Kali
ālı̄ (shiva Kali) ~ the auspicious form of Kālı̄, “the loving and
beneficent Mother”; the śakti expressing the nature of Śiva.
śivam (shivam) ~ auspicious.
sivam
9
.Sivasakti
Śivaśakti (Shivashakti) ~ the soul-power or element of vı̄rya that
expresses the personality of the fourfold ı̄śvara as Śiva or Mahāvı̄ra.
.slagha
ślāghā ~ praise, celebration; self-assertion; confidence.
.slathyam
ślāthyam ~ laxity; weakness.
.smarana
smaran.a ~ memory, attention; remembrance of brahman or the ı̄śvara; conscious attention to the development of the siddhi as a whole or to any part of it; especially, mental attention stimulating the experience of physical ānanda.
smaran.a-tapas (smarana-tapas; smaranatapas) ~ the will to remember; attention and will.
smarta
sm
ārta śruti
sruti ~ śruti (inspiration) acting on a basis of smr.ti (intuition
and discrimination).
smr.ta (smrita) ~ remembered, attended to.
smrta
smr.ti (smriti) ~ memory; the faculty of jñāna “by which true knowledge hidden in the mind reveals itself to the judgment and is recognised at once as the truth”. It consists of intuition and viveka and is the essence of logistic ideality.
sneha-hāsyam ~ laughter of affection, an element of Mahālaks.mı̄
sneha-hasyam
bhāva and a form of devı̄hāsya.
snigdhat
snigdhata,
ā, tejah
tejahslagha,
kalyān.aśraddhā, premasamarthyam
premasāmarthyam ~ rich. ślāghā, kalyanasraddha,
ness of feeling, assertion of psychic force, faith in the universal good,
capacity for unbounded love (the elements of cittaśakti).
snigdhatā, tejah.s.lāghā, kalyān.aśraddhā, premasāmarthyam, iti
snigdhata,
cittaśaktih. (snigdhata, tejahslagha, kalyanasraddha, premasamarthyam, iti chittashaktih) ~ richness of feeling, assertion of psychic
force, faith in the universal good, capacity for unbounded love: these
constitute the power of the emotional being.
sollicitude [French] ~ anxiety; concern.
soma1 ~ the “mystic wine” of the Vedic sacrifice, “the wine of delight
[ānanda], the wine of immortality [amr.ta]”; an “ecstatic subtle liquor
of delight” which is felt physically like “wine [madirā] ﬂowing through
the system”; ānanda on the mental plane, a “beatitude . . . inseparable from the illumined state of the being”; sometimes identified with
candra1, the moon, as a symbol of the “intuitive mind-orb”.
Soma2 ~ a Vedic deity, “lord of the delight of immortality”, the god
of ānanda as symbolised by the “wine of delight” (soma1); also the
god of the moon (Candra2), who manifests himself as mind.
0
.somasya hradah. ~ a lake of soma1.
.songe [French] ~ dream.
.sors [Latin] ~ same as sortilege.
.sortilege ~ (on page 44) divination by the random selection of playingcards; (elsewhere) a method of receiving guidance and predictions from texts found seemingly by chance (as by opening a book at random) and interpreted by the faculties of jñāna; also, a text found in this way and subjected to this kind of interpretation. Sri Aurobindo listed sortileges among the “external means” that can provide “data for a past and future knowledge” (see trikāladr.s.t.i); although some sortileges required “a very figurative & even fanciful interpretation”, he took the results he obtained by this method to be signs of “an intelligent, omniscient & all-combining Mind at work which uses everything in the world as its instrument & is superior to the system of relations & connections already fixed in this world”. 
sparśa (sparsha) ~ touch; any contact of outward things, physical or mental, pleasant or unpleasant; a touch on the body as a stimulus awakening sahaituka ānanda; a non-material (sūks.ma) touch; the sūks.ma vis.aya of subtle touch; (short for sparśadr.s.t.i) the subtle sense of touch.
sparśadr.s.t.i (sparshadrishti; sparsha-drishti)~the perception of touch imperceptible to the ordinary physical sense; the subtle sense (sūks.ma indriya) of touch, one of the faculties of vis.ayadr.s.t.i. 
sparśānanda (sparshananda) ~ the ānanda of touch, a kind of vis.ayānanda.
speech-thought ~ same as vāṅmaya thought.
spiegel [German] ~ mirror.
splankhna (splanchna) [Greek] ~ inward parts of the body, viscera, bowels; the heart or vital organs as the seat of feelings and character.
śraddhā (sraddha; çraddha) ~ faith; faith in the Divine (bhagavān), in his executive Power (śakti) and in the power within oneself (svaśakti), the last member of the śakti catus.t.aya.
sraddha bhagavati ~ faith in God; “faith in the presence and power
of the Divine in us and the world”.
sraddha
śraddh
ā bhagavati svaśakty
svasaktyam
āṁ ca (sraddha bhagavati swashaktyam
cha) ~ faith in the Divine and in the power within oneself.
sraddhamaya
śraddh
āmaya tapas ~ will-power full of faith in its own fulfilment.
́raddh
sraddha
ā svaśakty
svasaktyam
ām
171
(sraddha swashaktyam) ~ faith in one’s own
power (svaśakti) as the power of the universal śakti manifested in
oneself.
śrānti ~ weariness.
sranti
śrauta ~ of the nature of śruti or inspirational knowledge; inspired;
srauta
short for śrauta vijñāna.
srauta vijñśrauta
ñana
āna ~ (in 1914) same as inspirational vijñāna; (in 1920)
the second plane of ideality, previously called the hermetic ideality,
whose essence is śruti or “inspired interpretation”. It enters into the
lower plane, the logistic ideality or luminous reason, “attended by a diviner splendour of light and blaze of fiery effulgence”. The “illumined”
level of higher mind in the diagram on page 1360 (c. 1931) may be
correlated with the hermetic ideality or śrauta vijñāna of 1919-20.
srauta vyapti
śrauta
vyāpti ~ same as receptive vyāpti.
śravāṁsi ~ inspirations.
sravamsi
śravan.a (sravana; çravana) ~ hearing; the ear; the subtle sense
sravana
(sūks.ma indriya) of hearing, “the essential hearing of which our
apprehension of physical sound or the spoken word is only the most
outward result”, the means of śabdadr.s.t.i; the sense of hearing as a
means of vis.ayānanda.
śrāvayatpatim ~ the Master of things who opens our ears to the
sravayatpatim
knowledge. [R
. g Veda 5.25.5]
śrı̄ ~ glory, splendour, beauty, prosperity; creation of prosperity and
sri
beauty in the world, part of Sri Aurobindo’s karma or life-work.
Sri K. ~ abbreviation of “Sri Krishna” (see Śrı̄kr.s.n.a).
Śrı̄kr.s.n.a (Srikrishna; SriKrishna; Sri Krishna) ~ a name of the supreme
Srikrsna
Being (para purus.a or purus.ottama), same as Kr.s.n.a; the first aspect
of the fourfold ı̄śvara, more often called Mahāvı̄ra.
Śrı̄kr.s.n.adarśana (Srikrishnadarshana; Srikrishnadarshan) ~ the viSrikrsnadarsana
sion (darśana) of Śrı̄kr.s.n.a in all things and beings, same as Kr.s.n.adarśana.
Śrı̄kr.s.n.a-Nārāyan.a (Srikrishna-Narayana) ~ same as Kr.s.n.a-NārāSrikrsna-Narayana
yan.a.
Srikrsna
Śrı̄kr
Nārāyan.a caitanya (Srikrishna Narayana chaitanya) ~ con. s.n.a Narayana
sciousness of Kr.s.n.a-Nārāyan.a.
Sri Kr
Śrı̄
Krsna-Rudra
. s.n.a-Rudra (Sri Krishna-Rudra) ~ the combination of the Śrı̄kr.s.n.a (or Mahāvı̄ra) and Rudra2 (or Balarāma) personalities of the

2
fourfold ı̄śvara.
.srotas ~ stream, current.
.srutamagha
śrutāmagha ~ full in inspiration. [R
. g Veda 8.93.1]
.sruti
śruti (shruti; sruti; çruti) ~ hearing; inspiration, a faculty of jñāna which “is of the nature of truth hearing: it is an immediate reception of the very voice of the truth, it readily brings the word that perfectly embodies it and it carries something more than the light of its idea; there is seized some stream of its inner reality and vivid arriving movement of its substance”. It is an element in all the inspirational and interpretative forms of the logistic ideality and is the essence of the śrauta vijñāna.
śruti-smr.ti (sruti-smriti) ~ a combination of śruti (inspiration) and smr.ti (intuition and discrimination).
st. ~ abbreviation of sortilege.
statu [Latin] ~ see in statu.
sthairya (sthairya; sthairyam) ~ steadiness; constancy; “the capacity
of fixity in jnana”, an attribute of the brāhman.a; a term in the second
general formula of the śakti catus.t.aya.
sthairyam ~ see sthairya.
sthāna ~ place; location on the body; stationary condition (of things
sthana
seen in samādhi).
sthāpatya ~ (literally) architecture; (by extension) sculpture; sculpsthapatya
tural; three-dimensional images (rūpa) or writing (lipi) seen in relief,
as if sculptured, on a background from which the mental eye draws its
material (cf. citra); short for sthāpatyadr.s.t.i.
sthāpatyadr.s.t.i (sthapatyadrishti) ~ vision of sthāpatya rūpa and
sthapatyadrsti
sthāpatya lipi.
sthapatya
sth
āpatya lipi (sthapatyalipi; sthapatya lipi) ~ sculptural writing: lipi
seen in relief on a background from which the mental eye draws its
material.
sthapatya
sth
āpatya rupa
rūpa ~ sculptural image: rūpa seen in relief on a background from which the mental eye draws its material.
sthāvara ~ inanimate.
sthavara
sthenos [Greek] ~ forceful.
sthira ~ steady, constant; stable, fixed, immobile.
sthira lipi ~ stable lipi.
sthūla ~ gross, physical; concrete, objective; pertaining to the physical
sthula

3
being or the material world; (sensations, etc.) objectivised from a subtle
plane so as to be perceptible to the physical senses (see sthūlatva); the
objective world or material plane of existence; same as sthūla ākāśa
or sthūla deha.
sthula
sth
ūla āk
akasa
āśa (sthula akasha) ~ the ākāśa of the material plane; the
physical ether.
sthula
sth
ūla deha ~ the “gross body”, consisting of the anna1 forming the
physical frame together with the sthūla prān.a or physical life-energy
that animates it.
sthūladr.s.t.i (sthuladrishti) ~ gross (physical) vision.
sthuladrsti
sthula
sth
ūla pr
prana
ān.a ~ physical life-energy; prān.a moving “in the nervous
system of the gross body” (sthūla deha), also called physical prān.a.
sth
sthulapranavad
ūlaprān.avad annam ~ a component of the karmadeha, composed
of material substance filled with physical life-energy.
sthula
sth
ūla śarı̄ra
sarira (sthula sharira) ~ gross physical body.
sthūla-sūks.ma (sthula-sukshma; sthula sukshma) ~ gross-subtle;
sthula-suksma
sūks.ma with a degree of sthūlatva, supraphysical but partially
materialised.
sthūlatva (sthulatwa) ~ the state of being sthūla; physicality, concretesthulatva
ness, objectivity; “objectivisation to the outer sense”, the impinging of
a supraphysical (sūks.ma) fact on the physical world so as to “produce
an effect on our physical senses and become manifest to them”, or
its “derivative objectivisation” to the physical senses brought about
by “an association of the action of the subtle body and its senseorganisation with the action of the material body and its physical
organs”.
stomāh. ~ affirmations.
stomah
strı̄ ~ woman, seen as a manifestation of Kālı̄, the divine śakti.
stri
style ~ a quality of vāk, the inward speech expressing a higher knowledge, which “may frame itself in the language now employed to express
the ideas and perceptions and impulses of the intellect and the sense
mind, but it uses it in a different way and with an intense bringing
out of the intuitive or revelatory significances of which speech is capable”; this “seeing speech” has “different grades of its power of vision
and expression of vision”, the main levels of which are the adequate,
effective, illuminative, inspired and inevitable styles.
śubham (shubham) ~ good.
subham

4
.subjective ānanda
ananda ~ ānanda manifesting on the various levels of the
inner being, as distinct from physical ānanda; especially, the five forms
of ānanda called śuddhānanda, cidghanānanda, ahaituka ānanda,
premānanda and subjective kāmānanda, or any one of these.
subjective half (of the fifth catus.t.aya) ~ Kr.s.n.a and Kālı̄, the first two
members of the karma catus.t.aya.
subjective k
kama
āma ~ kāma1 (divine desire or enjoyment) in its subjective
aspect; same as subjective kāmānanda.
subjective k
kamananda
āmānanda ~ kāmānanda manifesting in the sūks.ma deha
(subtle body) as the form of subjective ānanda closest to the physical.
subjective vis
visaya
. aya (vishaya) ~ same as subjective vis.ayānanda.
subjective vis
visayananda
. ayānanda (vishayananda) ~ vis.ayānanda generated
“subjectively in the mind’s reception of all actions, sights, sounds,
touches etc”.
subjective vis
visaya-nirananda
. aya-nirānanda (vishaya-nirananda) ~ the negation of
subjective vis.ayānanda.
subtle akasa
ākāśa (akasha) ~ same as sūks.ma ākāśa.
subtle bh
bhu
ū ~ the subtle physical world, a loka in which the Spirit
bases its manifestation “on a subtler and more plastic, more conscious
principle of Matter”.
śuddha (shuddha; suddha) ~ purified, pure; unmixed, unmodified; free from impurity (aśuddhi); short for śuddhānanda.
śuddha ānanda (shuddha ananda; suddha ananda) ~ pure ānanda, the “unalloyed delight” of eternal existence; same as śuddhānanda.
suddha ananta ananda
śuddha
ānanda (shuddha ananta ananda) ~ pure infinite delight.
suddha cidghana ānanda
śuddha
ananda (shuddha chidghana ananda; shuddhachidghana-ananda) ~ cidghanānanda full of śuddha ānanda.
suddha kama
śuddha
kāma (shuddha kama) ~ purified desire (kāma1), “the calm
inner will of delight not afﬂicted or limited by any trouble of craving”.
śuddhānanda (shuddhananda; suddhananda) ~ pure ānanda, “the pure delight of the Infinite”; the form of subjective ānanda corresponding to the plane of transcendent bliss (ānandaloka) or to the sub-planes created by the “repetition of the Ananda plane in each lower world of consciousness”. It brings the “sense of Supreme Beauty in all things” (sarvasaundarya), differing from cidghanānanda in that it “transcends or contains” the beauty of gun.a (quality) proper to vijñāna, depending “not on knowledge-perception of the separate guna & yatharthya [truth] of things, but on being-perception in chit of the universal ananda of things”; its highest intensities are experienced when the soul “casts itself into the absolute existence of the spirit and is enlarged into its own entirely self-existent bliss infinitudes”.
śuddha pravr. tti (shuddha pravritti) ~ pure impulsion; the activity of a purified nature, “action without desire and independent of emotion”.
śuddhatā ~ purity.
suddhata
suddha-vijñśuddha-vij
ñanananda
ānānanda (shuddha-vijnanananda; suddha vijnanananda) ~ same as śuddha cidghana ānanda.
śuddhi (shuddhi; suddhi) ~ purity; purification, “the removal of all aberrations, disorders, obstructions brought about by the mixed and irregular action of the energy of being in our physical, moral and mental system” (ādhāra); in pūrn.a yoga, “not a negative, prohibitory, passive or quietistic, but a positive, affirmative, active purity” depending on the removal of “two forms of impurity which are at the root of the whole confusion”, namely, “a radically wrong and ignorant form given to the proper action of each part of our instrumental being” and “an immixture of functions by which the impure working of the lower instrument gets into the characteristic action of the higher function”; the first member of the siddhi catus.t.aya, “a total purification of all the complex instrumentality in all the parts of each instrument”, so that the whole being is made “a clear mirror in which the divine reality can be reﬂected, a clear vessel and an unobstructing channel into which the divine presence and through which the divine inﬂuence can be poured, a subtilised stuff which the divine nature can take possession of, new-shape and use to divine issues”.
śuddhir, muktir, bhuktih., siddhir, iti yogacatus.t.ayam (shuddhir, muksuddhir,
tir, bhuktih, siddhir, iti yogachatushtayam) ~ śuddhi, mukti, bhukti
and siddhi: these constitute the yoga catus.t.aya.
śūdra (shudra) ~ the soul-type representing “the Divine as service, obedience and work”, the last element in the fourfold personality symbolised by the cāturvarn.ya.
śūdrān.ı̄ ~ the wife of a śūdra; an epithet of Mahāsarasvatı̄ as the śakti of Aniruddha (the personality of the fourfold ı̄śvara corresponding to the śūdra).
śūdraśakti (shudrashakti) ~ the soul-power of service which reveals itself in the śūdra.
śūdrasvabhāva (shudraswabhava) ~ the inner nature of the śūdra.
.śsudra
ūdra tejas (shudra tejas) ~ the energy that manifests itself in the śūdra
temperament.
.sukha (sukha; sukham) ~ happiness; the third member of the samatā / śānti catus.t.aya: “not merely freedom from grief and pain, but a positive state of happiness in the whole system”.
sukhahāsyam ~ laughter of happiness, an element of Mahāsarasvatı̄ bhāva and a form of devı̄hāsya.
sukham ~ see sukha.
sūks.ma (sukshma; çukshma) ~ subtle; non-material, not belonging to the physical world perceived by the outer mind and senses; (relating to) the subliminal parts of our being or the supraphysical planes of existence (lokas) between the sthūla and the kāran.a. ssuksma 
ūks.ma āk
akasa
āśa (sukshma akasha) ~ subtle ether; any kind of inner
space whose contents are imperceptible to the physical senses, such
as the prān.ākāśa, cittākāśa or cidākāśa.
ssuksma
ūks.ma bhava
bhāva (sukshma bhava) ~ subtle state of mind and feeling.
sūks.mabodha (sukshmabodha) ~ subtle awareness, the perception of supraphysical things by means of the faculties of vis.ayadr.s.t.i.
sūks.ma (sukshma) body ~ same as sūks.ma deha.
suksma
sūks.ma darśana (sukshma darshana) ~ the subtle sense of sight
suksma
(darśana), the sūks.ma indriya by which rūpa is perceived.
ssuksma
ūks.ma deha (sukshmadeha; sukshma deha) ~ the subtle body which
is the “subtle-physical support of the inner being” (antah.karan.a) and
contains the cakras or centres of the inner consciousness; it “penetrates
and is interfused with the gross body” (sthūla deha), being tied to it by
the prān.a with its two connected forms, the sūks.ma prān.a and sthūla
prān.a.
ssuksma
ūks.ma dr
drsti
. s.t.i (sukshmadrishti; sukshma drishti) ~ subtle sight (see
darśana); subtle sense-perception by means of any sūks.ma indriya;
telepathic perception by means of prākāmya or vyāpti.
sūks.ma gandha (sukshmagandha; sukshma gandha) ~ the sūks.ma
suksma
vis.aya of gandha; subtle smell perceived by the faculty of gandhadr.s.t.i.
sūks.ma ghrān.a (sukshma ghrana) ~ the subtle sense of smell, the
suksma
sūks.ma indriya by which gandha is perceived.
ssuksma
ūks.ma hetu (sukshma hetu) ~ subtle stimulus.

7
.ssuksma
ūks.ma indriya (sukshma indriya) ~ a subtle sense-organ (indriya),
“existing in the subtle body (sūks.ma deha), and the means of subtle
vision and experience (sūks.ma dr.s.t.i)”; any of “the inner and deeper
senses which see what are hidden from the physical organs”, including
“a subtle sense of vision, hearing, touch, smell and taste” which “can
present to the consciousness visual, auditory, tactual and other images
and vibrations of things beyond the restricted range of the physical
senses or belonging to other planes or spheres of existence”.
sūks.majala (sukshmajala) ~ subtle water; water of a subtle world.
suksmajala
ssuksma
ūks.ma klanti
klānti (sukshma klanti) ~ fatigue in the subtle body.
ssuksma
ūks.ma pr
prana
ān.a (sukshmaprana; sukshma prana) ~ subtle life-energy,
prān.a “moving in the nervous system of the subtle body” (sūks.ma
deha); the “mental vitality or purely nervous mind”, also called psychic
prān.a, whose “proper action . . . is pure possession and enjoyment”
(bhoga), but which is ordinarily deformed by desire, “the vital craving
to seize upon that which we feel we have not”.
ssuksmapranavad
ūks.maprān.avad annam (sukshmapranavad annam) ~ a component
of the karmadeha, composed of material substance filled with subtle
life-energy.
ssuksma
ūks.ma rasa (sukshmarasa; sukshma rasa) ~ the sūks.ma vis.aya of
rasa; subtle taste perceived by the faculty of rasadr.s.t.i.
ssuksma
ūks.ma sabda
śabda (sukshmashabda; sukshma-shabda; sukshma shabda)
~ the sūks.ma vis.aya of śabda; subtle sound heard by the faculty of
śabdadr.s.t.i.
ssuksma
ūks.ma śabdadr
sabdadrsti
. s.t.i (sukshma shabdadrishti) ~ the subtle sense of hearing, “a hearing that is independent of the physical ear”, by which
sūks.ma śabda is perceived.
ssuksma
ūks.ma sparsa
sparśa (sukshma sparsha) ~ the sūks.ma vis.aya of sparśa; subtle touch perceived by the faculty of sparśadr.s.t.i.
ssuksma
ūks.ma śravan
sravana
. a (sukshma sravana; çukshma çravana) ~ the subtle
sense of hearing (śravan.a), the sūks.ma indriya by which śabda is
perceived.
sūks.ma-sthūla (sukshma-sthula; sukshma sthula) ~ subtle-gross;
suksma-sthula
combining the properties of the sūks.ma and the sthūla, or intermediate
between sūks.ma and sthūla.
sūks.matva (sukshmatwa) ~ the state of being sūks.ma; subtlety, nonsuksmatva
materiality.
8
.ssuksma
ūks.ma vvak
āk (sukshmavak; sukshma vak) ~ subtle speech, a form of
sūks.ma śabda consisting of “human voices & words reaching the ear
as if overheard”.
ssuksma
ūks.ma vidyut (sukshma vidyut) ~ subtle electricity.
ssuksma
ūks.ma visaya
vis.aya (sukshmavishaya; sukshma vishaya) ~ an immaterial
vis.aya perceived by a sūks.ma indriya; an object of subtle senseperception, including “many kinds of symbolic, transcriptive or representative images presented to the different psychical senses”; any of
the various faculties of subtle sense-perception (vis.ayadr.s.t.i), especially
those other than rūpadr.s.t.i.
ssuksmavisaya
ūks.mavis.aya jjagrat
āgrat (sukshmavishaya jagrat) ~ samādhi in the waking state in which subtle objects (sūks.ma vis.ayas) are perceived.
sūks.mendriya (sukshmendriya) ~ subtle sense-organ (same as sūks.ma
suksmendriya
indriya).
sūkta ~ perfectly expressed; a Vedic hymn.
sukta
sundara (sundara; sundaram) ~ beautiful.
sundaram ~ see sundara.
sun-ideality ~ same as sūrya ideality.
sūnr.tā (sunrita) ~ true and happy word.
sunrta
śūnya ~ empty; void.
sunya
suparn.a ~ literally “beautifully winged”; a bird, especially a large bird
suparna
such as an eagle; a symbol of the soul in the Veda and Upanishads.
superior ideality ~ (in 1918) the plane of ideality that takes up the inferior ideality into its “greater range”, from which the inferior ideality
“is only a selection”.
supermind ~ “a principle superior to mentality”, which “has the
knowledge of the One, but is able to draw out of the One its hidden
multitudes” and “manifests the Many, but does not lose itself in
their differentiations”, forming a link between “the unitarian or
indivisible consciousness of pure Sachchidananda in which there are
no separating distinctions” and “the analytic or dividing consciousness
of Mind which can only know by separation and distinction” and
making it “possible for us to realise the one Existence, Consciousness,
Delight in the mould of the mind, life and body”; (up to 1920) a
general term for the supra-intellectual faculty or plane (vijñāna); (c.
December 1926) the “Truth-Mind” or plane of “luminous DivineMind-Existence” below the “Divine Truth and Vastness” of mahad

9
brahma; (in 1927 before 29 October) same as supreme supermind,
one of a series of planes above ideality which seem to correspond to
those later included in the overmind system, a series that also included
other planes sometimes designated as forms of “supermind”, such
as supreme supramental supermind and gnostic supermind; (from 29
October 1927 onwards) equivalent to divine gnosis, the plane of “selfdetermining infinite consciousness” above overmind, from which it
differs in that “the overmind knows the One as the support, essence,
fundamental power of all things, but in the dynamic play proper to
it it lays emphasis on its divisional power of multiplicity”, while in
the supermind all is “held together as a harmonised play of the one
Existence” even in its “working out of the diversity of the Infinite”.
supermind gnosis ~ same as divine gnosis.
supermind in overmind ~ (in late 1927 or 1928) supermind manifesting in the higher ranges of the overmind system, a plane of what is
later called overmind gnosis.
supramental ~ (before 1920) same as vijñānamaya or ideal (sometimes restricted to the lower levels of vijñāna); (in 1926-27 before 29
October 1927) having the nature of supermind and related planes
as defined before the introduction of the term overmind and the
elevation of “supermind” above “overmind”, sometimes applied especially to the planes below supreme supermind; (“the supramental” in
some entries of January 1927) the next plane of consciousness above
supramentality; (after 29 October 1927) expressing the working of
supermind (in the latest sense) on its own plane or in the overmind,
where “supramental” movements are sometimes regarded as higher
than supramentalised and lower than gnostic.
supramental gnosis ~ (in April 1927) a term comprising the planes
called (gnostic) intuition, supermind and gnostic supermind as defined
before the introduction of the term overmind and the redefinition of
these planes as parts of the overmind system.
supramentalised ~ (in late 1927 or 1928) under the inﬂuence of the
supermind; having a partly supramental character.
supramentalised mind ~ (in late 1927 or 1928) a supramentalised
form of mind, one of the lower gradations of the overmind system,
mentioned along with supramentality and perhaps corresponding to
the supramental or supreme supramental referred to in the earlier
0
terminology of January 1927.
.supramentalised mind in overmind ~ (in late 1927 or 1928) an inferior
form of the third plane of the overmind system, evidently the result
of supramentalised mind being lifted into the true overmind; perhaps
a later term for what in January 1927 was referred to as supreme
supramental mind in the supreme supermind.
supramentalised overmind ~ (in late 1927 or 1928) a plane or planes
of overmind connected with supermind and having a partly supramental character; when distinguished from supramental overmind, the
term seems to refer to the higher ranges of true overmind below the
line where overmind gnosis begins.
supramentality ~ (in 1927-28) the first plane above the highest ideality, evidently the beginning of what came to be called the overmind
system; its levels are referred to as “the supramentalities”.
supramental overmind ~ (in late 1927 or 1928) a form of overmind
in which the element of supermind is prominent; when distinguished
from supramentalised overmind, which seems to be a lower plane, and
from the higher plane of gnostic overmind, supramental overmind may
be regarded as the beginning of the highest series of overmind planes.
Later it is equivalent to overmind gnosis.
supramental reason ~ a term used in April 1927 for some parts of
what later in the year came to be called the overmind system; it seems
to include grades up to supreme supermind other than gnostic intuition
and is possibly related to overmind logos in the diagram on page 1360
(c. 1931).
supreme d
dasya
āsya ~ (also called quaternary dāsya in a classification used
in January 1913) the highest degree of dāsya, in which the “gulf or
distance which necessitates an obscure process of transit . . . between
the divine Origin and the emerging human current . . . is removed; all
in the individual becomes the divine working”.
supreme supermind ~ (in 1927 before 29 October) the highest plane
below gnosis in the series of planes above ideality, corresponding to
true overmind in the later terminology of the overmind system.
supreme supermind gnosis ~ (in January 1927) gnosis manifesting in
the supreme supermind and forming its highest plane, later called
supramentalised overmind.
supreme supramental ~ the highest in the first group of planes above
1
ideality; the same plane seems to be meant by supreme supramental
mind and supreme supramental supermind.
supreme supramental mind ~ see supreme supramental.
supreme supramental mind in the supreme supermind ~ (in January
1927) a grade of consciousness apparently experienced as a result of
the supreme supramental being lifted into the supreme supermind by
a form of the imperative acting “as an intermediary force”, a process also described as “the supreme supermind taking up the supreme
supramental supermind”; perhaps equivalent to supramentalised mind
in overmind in the terminology adopted for the overmind system later
in the same year.
supreme supramental supermind ~ see supreme supramental.
supta ~ sleeping; absorbed in a deep state of samādhi.
supta caitanya (supta chaitanya) ~ the consciousness of one who is
sleeping or absorbed in a deep state of samādhi.
supta-svapna (supta-swapna; supta swapna) ~ same as sus.uptasvapna.
sūra ~ illumined.
sura
surexcitation [French] ~ over-stimulation.
sūri ~ illumined, luminous; an illumined thinker, a seer; any of the
suri
solar gods or powers of Sūrya2.
sūrih. ~ (nominative of sūri) illumined; “luminous with the solar light
surih
of the ideal knowledge”. [R
. g Veda 1.176.4]
ssurya
ūrya ~ sun; “the sun of knowledge” which is “the very body and
blaze” of the light of the Truth, the symbol of vijñāna.
Surya
ūrya2 ~ the Vedic sun-god, the “Lord of Light and Truth”, of whom
the “solar energy is the physical form”.
ssurya
ūrya ananda
ānanda ~ ānanda full of the light of sūrya1 on the plane of
vijñāna.
ssurya
ūrya ideality ~ ideality as pure vijñāna composed of the direct light
of the sun of knowledge (sūrya1).
ssurya
ūrya jyotis ~ the light of the sun of vijñāna.
sūryaloka ~ the world of the sun of knowledge (sūrya1), symbolising
suryaloka
the plane of vijñāna.
sūryaman.d.ala ~ the orb of the sun (sūrya1).
suryamandala
sūryamaya ~ full of the light of sūrya1; same as vijñānamaya.
suryamaya
Sūrya Savitr. (Surya Savitri) ~ Sūrya2 as the Creator, “the Wisdom-Luminous who is the bringer-out into manifest existence”.
.ssuryasya
ūryasya rasmayah
raśmayah. (suryasya rashmayah) ~ the rays of sūrya1, beams
of the “radiating light-stuff of the consciousness of the eternal Existence”, of which “each ray is a truth”.
ssurya
ūrya tapas ~ will-power (tapas) illumined by sūrya1; same as vijñānamaya tapas.
sushupta ~ see sus.upta.
sushupti ~ see sus.upti.
Susna
Śus
. n.a Kuyava (Sushna Kuyava) ~ (misprinted “Sushna Kayava” on
page 836) a Vedic name for a hostile being; “the false force that distorts
knowledge and action”.
sus.upta (sushupta) ~ fast asleep; immersed in sus.upti; deep sleep; the
susupta
state of sus.upta samādhi.
sus
susupta
samādhi (sushupta samadhi) ~ the state of profound samādhi
. upta samadhi
that is compared to dreamless sleep. It is not an unconscious state, but
“the Yogic sleep of the mind with wakefulness of the vijnana”, which
“is the gate of union with the supreme state of Sachchidananda”.
sus
susupta-svapna
. upta-svapna (sushupta-swapna; sushupta swapna) ~ deep svapnasamādhi bordering on sus.upta samādhi, in which “memory, reason,
mental attention are all absent”, but activity of vijñāna can proceed
and be inertly received by the mind.
sus
susupta
. upta svapna lipi (sushupta swapna lipi) ~ lipi in sus.upta-svapna.
sus
susupta
samādhi (sushupta swapna samadhi) ~ same as su. upta svapna samadhi
s.upta-svapna.
sus.upti (sushupti) ~ deep sleep; an inert condition of the mind resusupti
sembling deep sleep, where in the presence of “things quite beyond its
scope”, the mind “can no longer see truth even as in a dream, but passes
into the blank incomprehension and non-reception of slumber”; the
state of trance compared to dreamless sleep, same as sus.upta samādhi.
sutuko dadasa
dadāśa (sutuko dadásha) ~ a Vedic phrase, occurring in the
sortilege on page 460, whose precise interpretation is problematic; Sri
Aurobindo translates sutukah. elsewhere as “swift”, but connects it
here with “samata & ananda”, while he takes dadāśa, “he has given”,
to refer to “complete dasya subjective & objective”. [R
. g Veda 1.149.5]
suvı̄rāh. ~ perfect in energy.
suvirah
suvı̄ryam
suviryam arvata
arvatā . . brahmana
brahman.ā ~ perfect energy by the war-horse (symbolising “active nervous power”) or by the soul-thought (brahman in

3
the Vedic sense). [Cf. R
. g Veda 2.2.10]
.suvitam ~ literally “right or good going”, a Vedic word for “the
felicity that comes by following the right path”.
.suvrkti
suvr.kti (suvrikti) ~ the process by which “all is clearly distinguished
and put in its place”.
.suyama aśva
asva (suyama aswa) ~ well-governed horse; (symbolically)
well-controlled nervous energy.
.suyamasah
suyamāsah. ~ well-controlled.
.svabhava
svabhāva (swabhava) ~ (literally “own-becoming”) “the essential nature and self-principle of being of each becoming”; individual nature;
temperament; “the general nature of things”.
svabhāvaśakti (swabhavashakti) ~ force of the essential nature.
svabhavasakti
svadeśı̄ (swadeshi) ~ indigenous; a movement in India in the early
svadesi
twentieth century to promote the manufacture and sale of indigenous
goods; a nationalist involved in this movement.
svadhā (swadha) ~ self-fixity; “the spontaneous self-arranging action
svadha
of Nature”.
svādhı̄na (swadhina) ~ independent, free; a being or a world characsvadhina
terised by freedom.
svādhis.t.hāna (swadhishthana; swadhisthana) ~ the cakra “below the
svadhisthana
navel in the abdomen which is the lower or sensational vital centre”,
connecting all the centres above it with the physical; also called the
kāmacakra.
svāhā (swaha) ~ self-energy.
svaha
svāhākr.ta (swahakrita) ~ turned into self-energy.
svahakrta
svapada (swapada) ~ own plane.
svapna (swapna) ~ dream, dreaming; the state of sleep in which
dreams occur, in contrast to deep and dreamless sleep (sus.upti); internal vision in svapnasamādhi; short for svapnasamādhi; the middle
depths of svapnasamādhi.
svapna-jāgrat (swapna-jagrat) ~ inwardly wakeful in svapnasamāsvapna-jagrat
dhi.
svapnamaya (swapnamaya) ~ having the nature of svapna (in the
sense of dream or svapnasamādhi); dreamlike; pertaining to the planes
of subliminal consciousness associated with the dream-state.
svapnamaya sus.upti (swapnamaya sushupti) ~ same as svapnasus.upti.
4
.svapna rupa
rūpa (swapna rupa) ~ image seen in svapnasamādhi.
.svapnasam
svapnasamadhi
ādhi (swapnasamadhi; swapna-samadhi; swapna samadhi)
~ the state of samādhi that arises “when the mind has lost its outward
consciousness . . . and goes inside itself”; this state has some resemblance to ordinary svapna or dream-consciousness, but is characterised
not by dreams but by internal visions which are accurate “records of
true and actual experiences”. The mind in svapnasamādhi “is at work
liberated from the immixture of the physical mentality” and “is able to
use either its ordinary will and intelligence with a concentrated power
or else the higher will and intelligence of the more exalted planes of
mind”.
svapnasiddhi (swapnasiddhi; swapna siddhi) ~ the perfection of
dream, converting it into internal vision in svapnasamādhi.
svapna-sus
svapna-susupti
. upti (swapna-sushupti) ~ sus.upta samādhi with dreamconsciousness.
svapnāvasthā (swapnavastha) ~ the state of svapnasamādhi.
svapnavastha
svar (swar) ~ “the luminous world”, the world of luminous intelligence of which Indra is the lord, comprising the planes at the summit of the mental consciousness; the mental world (manoloka), the highest plane of the triloka; its lower principle of manas, sensational mind, and higher principle of buddhi, intelligence, are manifested in the two realms of svarga and candraloka, respectively. 
svarājya (swarajya) ~ self-rule, subjective empire; “the entire control by the subjective consciousness of all the states and activities proper to its own domain”.
svarāt. (swarat) ~ self-ruler; master of all one’s inner states and activities.
svarga (swarga) ~ heaven; the lower of the two planes of svar, corresponding to manas, the sensational mind; any subdivision of this plane.
svargabhūmi (swargabhumi) ~ a heavenly world; a level of svarga.
svargabhumi
svarloka (swarloka) ~ the world (loka) of mind; same as svar.
svar-tapas (swar-tapas; swar tapas) ~ the power that belongs to the mental plane; manifesting through this medium, the Will “fastens more often on general than on particular effectualities”.
svarūpa (swarupa) ~ literally “own form”; rūpa that is not an image but an actual form on a subtle plane.
5
.svarvatı̄
svarvati buddhi (swarvati buddhi) ~ buddhi full of the light of svar;
illumined intelligence.
.svarvatı̄r
svarvatir apah. (swarvatir apah; swarwatir apah) ~ waters (āpas) that
carry in them the light of svar; the ﬂoods of a “higher consciousness
pouring on the mortal mind”. [R
. g Veda 1.10.8, etc.]
svarvati sakti
svarvatı̄
śakti (swarvati shakti) ~ śakti full of the light of svar; spiritual force working on the plane of luminous intelligence.
svaśakti (swashakti; swaçakti) ~ “self-power”; one’s own power or
svasakti
capacity; the power of the divine śakti manifested in oneself.
svaśaktyām (swashaktyam) ~ (faith) in one’s own power (svaśakti).
svasaktyam
svaśaktyāṁ bhagavati ca (swashaktyam bhagavati cha) ~ (faith) in
svasaktyam
one’s own power (svaśakti) and in God (bhagavān).
svaśakty
svasaktyam
āṁ sraddha
śraddhā (swashaktyam sraddha) ~ faith in one’s own
power as an expression of the universal śakti; same as śraddhā
svaśaktyām.
svayamprak
svayamprakasa
āśa (swayamprakasha) ~ self-luminous, self-evident; selfevident knowledge having the nature of revelation.
sve dame (swe dame) ~ in its own domain.
swabhava, etc. ~ see svabhāva, etc.
swabhava
swaçakti ~ see svaśakti.
swacakti
swadeshi ~ see svadeśı̄.
swadha ~ see svadhā.
swadhina ~ see svādhı̄na.
swadhishthana ~ see svādhis.t.hāna.
swadhisthana ~ see svādhis.t.hāna.
swaha, etc. ~ see svāhā, etc.
swaha
swapada ~ see svapada.
swapna, etc. ~ see svapna, etc.
swapna
swar ~ see svar.
swarajya ~ see svarājya.
swarat ~ see svarāt..
swarga, etc ~ see svarga, etc.
swarga
swarloka ~ see svarloka.
swarupa ~ see svarūpa.
swarvati, etc. ~ see svarvatı̄, etc.
swarvati
swarwatir apah ~ see svarvatı̄r apah..
swashakti ~ see svaśakti.

6
.swashaktyam ~ see svaśaktyām.
.swayamprakasha ~ see svayamprakāśa.
.swe dame ~ see sve dame.
.T ~ (in January 1927) the highest stage in the unification of the el-
ements of T3 and T2, evidently representing a complete identity of
knowledge and will.
T2 ~ a union of two of the three elements of T3; (in 1914) abbreviation
of telepathy-trikāladr.s.t.i, a combination of the knowledge faculties
of T3; (usually, from 1917 onwards) abbreviation of trikāladr.s.t.itapassiddhi, representing a united action of the higher faculties
of knowledge and will, with telepathy included in or replaced by
trikāladr.s.t.i; in the last entries of 1927, this is associated with a
“passive-active attitude . . . in which the Ishwara determines and the
Powers [of the Overmind] may for a time resist and even modify
temporarily what he has determined, but must now or in the end help
to carry out his will”.
T3 ~ abbreviation of telepathy-trikāladr.s.t.i-tapassiddhi, these three
elements “acting separately and not taken up into the union in duality”
of T2; in the last entries of 1927, associated with a “passive attitude . . .
in which the nature is the plaything of the powers of the Overmind”.
tad ekam ~ That One.
tad vratam ~ that is the law. [A recurring phrase in the Chhandogya
and Taittiriya Upanishads.]
taijasa ~ full of tejas; same as tejomaya.
taijasa jala ~ jala with an excess of tejas.
tamas ~ darkness; the lowest of the three modes (trigun.a) of the energy of the lower prakr.ti, the gun.a that is “the seed of inertia and
non-intelligence”, the denial of rajas and sattva, and “dissolves what
they create and conserve”; it is a deformation of śama, the corresponding quality in the higher prakr.ti, “an obscurity which mistranslates,
we may say, into inaction of power and inaction of knowledge the
Spirit’s eternal principle of calm and repose”, and it is converted back
into pure śama in the process of traigun.yasiddhi. This principle of
inertia “is strongest in material nature and in our physical being”;
7
its “stigmata . . . are blindness and unconsciousness and incapacity
and unintelligence, sloth and indolence and inactivity and mechanical routine and the mind’s torpor and the life’s sleep and the soul’s
slumber”.
tamasi ~ in darkness.
tāması̄ ~ characterised by tamas; inert.
tamasi
tamasic dhr
dhrti
. ti (dhriti) ~ same as tāması̄ dhr.ti.
tamasic nati ~ inert submission, “weak resignation or dull acceptance”; the lowest form of nati, “an equality of disappointed resignation”, an acquiescence under the inﬂuence of tamas.
tamasic nidr
nidra
ā ~ same as tamomaya nidrā.
tamasic ty
tyaga
āga ~ outward renunciation of action due to inertia.
tamasic ud
udasinata
āsı̄natā ~ inert indifference; udāsı̄natā due to the inﬂuence
of tamas, part of “the movement of tamasic equality” which “is a
generalisation of Nature’s principle of jugupsā or self-protecting recoil
extended from the shunning of particular painful effects to a shunning of the whole life of Nature itself as in sum leading to pain and
self-tormenting and not to the delight which the soul demands”.
tamasic vair
vairagya
āgya ~ vairāgya characterised by tamas; disgust with life
due to disappointment, weariness and unwillingness to make an effort.
ttamasi
āması̄ dhr
dhrti
. ti (tamasi dhriti) ~ inert persistence of will; blind force of
habit.
tamasyā ~ inertia (a coinage, related to tamas as tapasyā to tapas).
tamasya
tamogun.a ~ the gun.a of tamas.
tamoguna
tamomaya nidr
nidra
ā ~ sleep dominated by inertia and unconsciousness.
tanū ~ body.
tanu
tapah. ~ same as tapas.
tapah.-śakti ~ force of tapas.
tapah-sakti
tapana ~ a form of ideal tapas: the fire of sūrya1 (symbolising
vijñāna) in the will-power.
tapas ~ “concentration of power of consciousness”; will-power; the
force that acts through aiśvarya, ı̄śitā and vaśitā, or the combination
of these siddhis of power themselves, sometimes listed as the fourth
of five members of the vijñāna catus.t.aya; the divine force of action
into which rajas is transformed in the liberation (mukti) of the nature
from the trigun.a of the lower prakr.ti, a power “which has no desire
because it exercises a universal possession and a spontaneous Ananda

8
of its movements”; the force manifested by an aspect of daivı̄ prakr.ti
(see Mahākālı̄ tapas, Mahāsarasvatı̄ tapas); (also called cit-tapas)
“infinite conscious energy”, the principle that is the basis of tapoloka;
limited mental will and power. Tapas is “the will of the transcendent
spirit who creates the universal movement, of the universal spirit who
supports and informs it, of the free individual spirit who is the soul
centre of its multiplicities. . . . But the moment the individual soul leans
away from the universal and transcendent truth of its being, . . . that
will changes its character: it becomes an effort, a straining”.
tapas ānanda
ananda ~ ānanda filled with force.
tapasbuddhi ~ will-thought.
tapas-kośa (tapas-kosha) ~ the sheath (kośa) of our being corresponding to the plane of infinite conscious force (tapas).
tapaso mahin
mahina
ā ~ by the greatness of its energy. [R.g Veda 10.129.3]
tapas-śakti (tapas-shakti) ~ force of working of the siddhis of power.
tapas-sakti
tapas-siddhi (tapassiddhi; tapas-siddhi; tapas siddhi) ~ the working
of tapas through the siddhis of power; fulfilment or effectivity of
aiśvarya, ı̄śitā and vaśitā.
tapas smarana
smaran.a ~ attention with pressure of tapas.
tapastraya ~ the triad of tapas, consisting of the three siddhis of
power.
tapastya ~ a “doubtfully effective rajasic” form of tapas, inferior to
tapatya.
tapasyā ~ concentration of will and energy to control the nature;
tapasya
rigorous discipline; physical austerity.
tapata ~ a form of intellectual / mental tapas, “an uninsistent intellectual stress”, higher than tapatya.
tapatya ~ (in 1913-16) a form of tapas, sometimes associated with
Mahākālı̄ bhāva and with a “higher rudra intensity of knowledge,
action, ananda”, described in its true form as saśraddhā śakti, a “selffulfilling force which is sure beforehand of its result”, though there is
also a “disinterested and instrumental Tapatya not depending on faith
in the results”; an instance of the use of such a force; (in 1917-19) a
form of intellectual / mental tapas intermediate between tapastya and
tapata, defined as “the straining to know and fulfil” which, when desire is eliminated, remains “as an illegitimate prolongation and stress of
what is received in the ideality . . . bringing false stress and falsification
9
of values”.
.tapatya buddhi ~ attitude of tapatya.
.tapatya-siddhi ~ fulfilment or effectivity of tapatya, a form of tapassiddhi.
.tapoloka ~ the world (loka) of “infinite Will or conscious force”, the
plane where the “soul may dwell . . . in the principle of infinite conscious energy” (tapas or cit-tapas) “and be aware of it unrolling out of
self-existence the works of knowledge, will and dynamic soul-action
for the enjoyment of an infinite delight of the being”.
tapomaya ~ consisting of or relating to tapas in any form (mental,
ideal, etc.); volitional; dynamic.
tapomaya ānanda
ananda ~ the tapomaya level of the ānanda plane.
tapyeta ~ one should apply tapas.
taras ~ rapidity.
tat ~ that; “That which escapes definition or description and is yet
not only real but attainable”, a word used to indicate parabrahman as
“something utterly Transcendent, something that is unnameable and
mentally unknowable, a sheer Absolute”. Since this Absolute “is in
itself indefinable by reason, ineffable to the speech”, it can only “be
approached through experience”, either “through an absolute negation
of existence, as if it were itself a supreme Non-Existence, a mysterious
infinite Nihil” (asat) or else “through an absolute affirmation of all
the fundamentals of our own existence, . . . through an inexpressible
absolute of being” (sat).
tat sat ~ the unity of “That which is beyond” (tat) and “that which
represents Him here as the basis of our existence” (sat).
tattva (tattwa) ~ principle.
tejah. (tejah; teja) ~ same as tejas.
tejah.ks.obha (tejahkshobha) ~ a disturbance of ārogya involving the
tejahksobha
bhūta of tejas.
tejah.ślāghā ~ “energy and power of assertion”, an element of cittatejahslagha
śakti.
tejas ~ fiery brilliance; mental light and energy; the energy of temperament that manifests itself in each element of the fourfold personality
(brahmatejas, etc.); a term in the first general formula of the śakti
catus.t.aya; “a strong and ardent force and intensity”, an element of
cittaśakti; one of the seven kinds of akashic material; rūpa or lipi
0
composed of this material; fire, the principle of light and heat, one of
“the five elements of ancient philosophy or rather elementary conditions of Nature, pañca bhūta, which constitute objects by their various
combination”, also called agni1; the virile energy carried to the head
by udāna.
tejas-sūrya ~ a sun composed of tejas.
tejas-surya
tejasvı̄ (tejaswi) ~ energetic.
tejasvi
tejo balaṁ mahattvaṁ pravr.ttih. (tejo balam mahattwam pravrittih; mahattvam -) ~ energy, strength, greatness, dynamism (see next).
tejo balaṁ pravr.ttir mahattvam (tejo balam pravrittir mahattwam) ~
energy (tejas), strength (bala1), dynamism (pravr.tti), greatness (mahattva): the first general formula of the śakti catus.t.aya, consisting of
qualities needed for the perfection of all four elements of vı̄rya.
tejobhūta ~ the bhūta called tejas (fire), the igneous condition of
tejobhuta
material energy.
tejoghana ~ composed of dense tejas.
tejomaya (tejomaya; tejomay) ~ fiery; fierily brilliant; pertaining to the
bhūta of tejas; (rūpa or lipi) composed of or containing the akashic
material called tejas.
tejomaya chayamaya
chāyāmaya ~ brilliant shadowy rūpa; chāyāmaya mixed
with an element of tejas.
tejomaya lipi ~ lipi composed of tejas.
tejomaya rupa
rūpa ~ rūpa composed of tejas.
tejomaya varna
varn.a (tejomay varna) ~ brilliant colour; varn.a mixed with
an element of tejas.
tejonāma ~ nāmadr.s.t.i of tejomaya lipi.
tejonama
tejorāśi (tejorashi) ~ mass of tejas.
tejorasi
tejorekhā ~ tejomaya rūpa resembling a drawing.
tejorekha
telepathic dr
drsti
. s.t.i (drishti; dristi) ~ same as telepathic trikāladr.s.t.i.
telepathic mind ~ a mind “illuminated with intimations and upsurgings from the inner being” and capable of prākāmya and vyāpti, the
powers that constitute telepathy; this is usually distinguished from the
vijñānabuddhi or intuitive mind, in which the higher faculties of jñāna
are partially active in addition to the power of telepathy.
telepathic T2 ~ trikāladr.s.t.i-tapassiddhi with telepathic trikāladr.s.t.i as
the first element.
telepathic trik
trikaladrsti
āladr.s.t.i (trikaldrishti) ~ the lower form of trikāladr.s.t.i

1
which, by means of the faculties of prākāmya and vyāpti, “gives the
fact and tendency [of] actual and potential forces in action”.
telepathy ~ the faculty formed by the combination of prākāmya and
vyāpti, the two siddhis of knowledge; also, either one of these powers
separately. Telepathy is the capacity of consciousness “to communicate
between one mind and another without physical means consciously
and voluntarily”, overcoming the habitual limitations because of which
“Consciousness in one material being communicates with the same
consciousness in another material being by certain fixed methods such
as speech, gesture, writing etc. and unconscious mental communication”.
telepathy-trik
telepathy-trikaladrsti
āladr.s.t.i (telepathy-trikaldrishti; telepathy trikaldrishti)
~ the combination of telepathy and trikāladr.s.t.i, forming the knowledge aspect of T3.
telepathy-trik
telepathy-trikaladrsti-tapas
āladr.s.t.i-tapas (telepathy-trikaldrishti-tapas; telepathy
trikaldrishti tapas) ~ same as telepathy-trikāladr.s.t.i-tapassiddhi.
telepathy-trik
telepathy-trikaladrsti-tapassiddhi
āladr.s.t.i-tapassiddhi (telepathy-trikaldrishti-tapassiddhi; -tapas siddhi) ~ the combination of telepathy, trikāladr.s.t.i and
tapas-siddhi, usually referred to as T3.
telos [Greek] ~ end, completion.
temperamental śraddh
sraddha
ā ~ the faith of the emotional being.
tertiary d
dasya
āsya (dasya; dasyam) ~ (in January 1913) the third of four
degrees of dāsya, “the dasya of the yantra [instrument], which cannot
disobey, but is worked mechanically through an intermediate impulsion of Prakriti”, this indirectness being what distinguishes it from
quaternary dāsya; (from September 1913 onwards, corresponding to
the earlier triple dāsya) the highest of three forms of dāsya, “a complete subjection” to the ı̄śvara, with prakr.ti “only as a channel”, a
state resulting from the loss of the illusory “relative freedom which
by us is ignorantly called free-will”, in which “at each moment and
in each movement the absolute freedom of the Supreme handles the
perfect plasticity of our conscious and liberated nature”; it has three
stages, one in which volition is “dominant in the consciousness not as
free, but as accompanying & approving the movement”, a second in
which the control of prakr.ti is “dominant though as a compelled &
compulsory agent of a remote or veiled Ishwara” and a third in which
prakr.ti is purely a channel and “the compulsion from the Ishwara
2
direct, omnipresent and immanent”.
.tertiary gnosis ~ same as revelatory logistis.
.tertiary logistic gnosis; tertiary logistis ~ same as revelatory logistis.
.tertiary utth
utthapana
āpanā ~ the last stage of utthāpanā, in which “one is not
necessarily subject to the law of gravitation or other physical laws”,
making possible levitation “of the whole body raised from the earth”.
tes hugieies
tēs
hugieiēs [Greek] ~ of the health.
thanousēs [Greek] ~ from the dead one (feminine).
thanouses
thēr [Greek] ~ wild animal.
ther
thespesia [Greek] ~ divine prophecy.
thesphata [Greek] ~ divine decrees, oracles.
thought ~ often equivalent to vijñānamaya thought or to jñāna as
the first member of the vijñāna catus.t.aya; it usually includes both
perceptive thought and vāṅmaya (articulate) thought, but sometimes
refers specifically to one or the other of these (most often the first).
thought-expression ~ same as vāṅmaya thought.
thought-perception ~ same as perceptive thought.
thought-pr
thought-prakamya
ākāmya (thought-prakamya; thought prakamya) ~ reading of the thoughts of others by prākāmya.
thought-reading ~ same as thought-prākāmya.
thought-siddhi (thought-siddhi; thought siddhi) ~ the perfection of
thought; the siddhi of jñāna.
thought-speech ~ same as vāṅmaya.
thought-telepathy ~ awareness of the thoughts of others, consisting of
thought-prākāmya and thought-vyāpti.
thought-vy
thought-vyapti
āpti ~ reception of the thoughts of others by vyāpti.
time-dr.s.t.i (drishti) ~ same as time-trikāladr.s.t.i.
time-drsti
time-trik
time-trikaladrsti
āladr.s.t.i (trikaldrishti) ~ trikāladr.s.t.i (usually foreknowledge)
of the exact time of events; “an intuition of Time which is not of the
mind and when it plays is always accurate to the very minute and if
need be to the very second”.
tiraskaran.i ~ curtain, veil.
tiraskarani
tithi ~ day of the lunar month.
titiks.ā (titiksha) ~ the power of endurance, “the facing, enduring and
titiksa
conquest of all shocks of existence”; the first stage of passive / negative
samatā, relying “on the strength of the spirit within us to bear all the
contacts, impacts, suggestions of this phenomenal Nature that besieges

3
us on every side without being overborne by them and compelled to
bear their emotional, sensational, dynamic, intellectual reactions”.
titiks
titiksa-udasinata-nati
. ā-udāsı̄natā-nati (titiksha-udasinata-nati) ~ see ānandamaya
titiks.ā-udāsı̄natā-nati.
titiks.ā, udāsı̄natā, natih. iti samatā (titiksha, udasinata, natih iti
titiksa,
samata) ~ endurance, indifference, submission: these constitute (passive / negative) samatā.
tı̄vra ~ keen, intense; having the nature of tı̄vrānanda; short for
tivra
tı̄vrānanda; the experience of tı̄vrānanda in a particular part of the
body.
tivra ananda
tı̄vra
ānanda ~ same as tı̄vrānanda.
tı̄vrānanda ~ intense physical pleasure; a form of śārı̄rānanda or
tivrananda
physical ānanda whose nature is, if it is sahaituka, “an intimate and
intense thrill” in the response of the physical system to any touch
(sparśa) or, if it is ahaituka, a similar thrill even without an external
stimulus.
tı̄vra-sthiti ~ fixity of tı̄vrānanda.
tivra-sthiti
tı̄vratā ~ keenness, intensity; “thrill”.
tivrata
tı̄vratama ~ extremely intense.
tivratama
tı̄vratara ~ very intense.
tivratara
tı̄vra-vis
tivra-visaya-kama
. aya-kāma (tivra-vishaya-kama) ~ the combination of tı̄vrānanda, vis.ayānanda and kāmānanda.
Toute usurpation a un cruel retour et celui qui usurpe devrait y songer,
du moins pour ses enfants qui presque toujours portent la peine
[French] ~ All usurpation has a cruel backlash and he who usurps
should think of that, at least for the sake of his children who almost
always pay the penalty.
traigun.ya ~ “the threefold mode of Nature”, consisting of sattva,
traigunya
rajas and tamas in their “interlocked and mutually limited play”;
same as trigun.a.
traigun
traigunyamaya
. yamaya ~ having the nature of any mode or combination of
modes of the traigun.ya.
traigun.yamayı̄ ~ feminine of traigun.yamaya.
traigunyamayi
traigun
traigunyamayi
prakrti
. ti (traigunyamayi prakriti) ~ the lower nature
. yamayı̄ prakr
(aparā prakr.ti) whose process is an interaction of the three gun.as
(sattva, rajas and tamas), “the inferior nature of things” in which “the
play of infinite quality [anantagun.a] is subject to a limited measure”

4
and “managed by a fundamental working in three qualitative modes
[traigun.ya] which conﬂict and combine together in all her creations”.
traigun
traigunyasiddhi
. yasiddhi (traigunyasiddhi; traigunya-siddhi; traigunya siddhi)
~ the perfection of the traigun.ya or trigun.a: that part of the mukti
or liberation of the nature in which, when the being has transcended
the gun.as and is trigun.ātı̄ta, the gun.as are transformed and unified
so that “the three lower unequal modes pass into an equal triune
mode”; tamas, rajas and sattva then “go back to their divine principles” in “three essential powers of the Divine”, termed śama, tapas
(or pravr.tti) and prakāśa, “which are not merely existent in a perfect
equilibrium of quietude, but unified in a perfect consensus of divine
action”.
trailokya ~ the three worlds (physical, vital and mental) of the
aparārdha or lower hemisphere of existence; same as triloka.
trailokyadr.s.t.i (trailokyadrishti; trailokya drishti) ~ vision of the
trailokyadrsti
trailokya.
trailokyagati ~ the ability to move through the three worlds (trailokya) in samādhi.
trailokyamayı̄
trailokyamayi prakr
prakrti
. ti (trailokyamayi prakriti) ~ (the lower) Nature
comprising the three worlds of matter, life and mind.
trailokya of bh
bhu
ū ~ same as triloka in bhū.
trāt.aka (trataka; tratak) ~ concentration of the vision on a single
trataka
point.
traya ~ triad, trinity.
trayasparśa (tryasparsha) ~ a solar day in which three lunar days (all
trayasparsa
of one and parts of two others) meet; it is considered auspicious for
beginning a journey or inaugurating a ceremony.
tretā (treta) ~ the second age in a caturyuga, whose master-spirit is the ks.atriya; a period of the world in which the harmony established in the satyayuga “begins to break down and man upholds it . . . by force of will, individual and collective”.
tri. ~ abbreviation of trikāladr.s.t.i.
trigun.a (triguna) ~ the three gun.as, qualities or modes of the lower Nature (aparā prakr.ti), called sattva, rajas and tamas, which may be defined “in terms of the motion of the universal Energy as Nature’s three concomitant and inseparable powers of equilibrium, kinesis and inertia”; psychologically, tamas is “Nature’s power of nescience”, rajas “her power of active seeking ignorance enlightened by desire and impulsion”, and sattva “her power of possessing and harmonising knowledge”. Among these gun.as “there is a necessary disequilibrium, a shifting inconstancy of measures and a perpetual struggle for domination” which can cease only when “the disharmonies of the triple mode of our inferior existence are overpassed and there begins a greater triple mode of a divine Nature” (parā prakr.ti); tamas, rajas and sattva are then replaced by śama, tapas (or pravr.tti) and prakāśa, of which they are “imperfect or degraded forms”.
trigun.ātı̄ta (trigunatita; trigunatitam) ~ beyond the trigun.a, “superior to the three qualities and master of them and therefore at once capable of action and unaffected, undominated by its own action”; brahman manifesting in “the repose, kinesis, illumination of the divine Nature” above “this nature of the Ignorance with its unquiet unbalanced activity of the three modes”.
trigun
trigunatita
udāsı̄natā ~ udāsı̄natā achieved by a “detached superior. ātı̄ta udasinata
ity to the three modes [trigun.a] of Nature” in which the “soul is
inwardly separated and free from the lower Prakriti, not involved in
its coils, indifferent and glad above it”.
trigun.ātı̄tam ~ see trigun.ātı̄ta.
trigunatitam
trik. ~ abbreviation of trikāladr.s.t.i.
trikāla (trikal) ~ “the three times”: the past, present and future, seen as an indivisible movement.
trikāladr.s.t.i (trikaladrishti; trikaldrishti; trikaldristi) ~ literally “the vision of the three times”, i.e., “the direct knowledge of the past, the intuitive knowledge of the present and the prophetic knowledge of the future”, the second member of the vijñāna catus.t.aya. It is a special faculty of jñāna “by which that general power is applied to the actuality of things”; its essence is a consciousness of “the Infinite deploying in itself and organising all things in time”, making possible “a total view of the three times as one movement singly and indivisibly seen even in their succession of stages, periods, cycles”.
trikāladr.s.t.i (trikaldrishti) of exact time ~ same as time-trikāladr.s.t.i.
trikaladrsti
trikāladr.s.t.i (trikaldrishti) of the past ~ “the direct knowledge of the past”, including the “knowledge of our past lives, ~ whether of past soul states or personalities or scenes, occurrences, relations with others, ~ of the past lives of others, of the past of the world”.
.trikaladrsti
trikāladr.s.t.i (trikaldrishti) of time ~ same as time-trikāladr.s.t.i.
.trik
trikaladrsti-siddhi
āladr.s.t.i-siddhi (trikaldrishti-siddhi) ~ perfection of trikāladr.s.t.i.
.trik
trikaladrsti-tapas
āladr.s.t.i-tapas (trikaldrishti-tapas; trikaldrishti tapas) ~ same as trikāladr.s.t.i-tapassiddhi.
.trik
trikaladrsti-tapassiddhi
āladr.s.t.i-tapassiddhi (trikaldrishti-tapassiddhi; trikaldrishti tapassiddhi) ~ the union of trikāladr.s.t.i and tapas-siddhi, usually referred to as T2.
trik
trikaladrsti
āladr.s.t.i tapas telepathy (trikaldrishti tapas telepathy) ~ same as telepathy-trikāladr.s.t.i-tapassiddhi.
trik
trikaladrsti-vani
āladr.s.t.i-vān.ı̄ (trikaldrishti-vani) ~ vān.ı̄ (a divine voice) making a prediction.
trikālasiddhi (trikalsiddhi) ~ the perfection of trikāladr.s.t.i.
trikalasiddhi
trikaldrishti ~ see trikāladr.s.t.i.
trikaldristi ~ see trikāladr.s.t.i.
trikalsiddhi ~ see trikālasiddhi.
triloka (triloka; trilok) ~ the three lokas or worlds (physical, vital and mental, called bhū, bhuvar and svar) of the aparārdha or lower hemisphere of existence. Each plane has its own triloka, in which the principles of the other two planes are subordinated to its own principle; in their totality they are described as “thrice seven”, because each contains in itself not only the principles of all three worlds of the lower hemisphere, but the four principles of the higher hemisphere (parārdha).
trilokadr.s.t.i (trilokadrishti) ~ vision of the triloka.
trilokadrsti
triloka in bhu
bhū ~ the three levels of the earth-consciousness or plane of
material existence (bhū), consisting of a purely physical, a vital and a
mental layer.
triple d
dasya
āsya (dasya; dasyam) ~ (corresponding in July 1912 to the later
tertiary dāsya) the highest of three forms of dāsya, that in which the
“potential freedom” of double dāsya disappears; this loss of apparent
freedom of the will gives the “true freedom” that is attained only when
“we surrender our conscious will and allow it to be made one with
the will of the Eternal”, for then, “living in the divine liberty, we shall
no longer cling to this shackled so-called free-will, a puppet freedom
ignorant, illusory, relative, bound to the error of its own inadequate
vital motives and mental figures”.
triple ideal supermind ~ (in 1920) the first three supra-intellectual
7
planes, called logistic, hermetic and seer ideality. Cf. intuitive higher
mind, illumined higher mind and highest mind in the terminology of
c. 1931.
triple sam
samadhi
ādhi ~ simultaneous experience of sus.upta samādhi, svapnasamādhi and jāgrat samādhi, the three states of samādhi being
superimposed so that the consciousness “in sushupta perceives below
it the activities of the swapna & perceives also what is happening in
the jagrat”.
triste [French] ~ sad, sorrowful, miserable.
Trita ~ “the Third or Triple, apparently the Purusha of the mental
plane”, the companion of Eka2 and Dvita: “the god or Rishi of the
third plane, full of luminous mental kingdoms unknown to the physical
mind”.
trsvi
tr
. g Veda 4.4.1]
. s.vı̄ prasiti ~ swift movement. [Cf. R
trsvim
tr
. s.vı̄ṁ prasitim ~ same as tr.s.vı̄ prasiti.
truth-reﬂecting intuitivity ~ the highest form of intuitivity, corresponding on the level of the intuitive mind to the truth-seeking reason
on the intellectual plane and related to the revelatory mentality.
truth-reﬂecting intuivity ~ same as truth-reﬂecting intuitivity.
truth-seeking reason ~ the intelligence that “seeks impersonally to reﬂect Truth”, the highest form of the mānasa buddhi or thinking mind.
truth tapas ~ tapas acting in the truth-reﬂecting intuitivity or in the
revelatory ideality.
tryasparsha ~ see trayasparśa.
t-s ~ abbreviation of tapas-siddhi.
tucchyena abhvapihita
ābhvapihita (tucchyena abhwapihita) ~ universal being
(ābhu) concealed by fragmentation or littleness. [R.g Veda 10.129.3]
turi [Bengali] ~ horn.
turı̄ya ~ fourth; “the incommunicable Self or One-Existence . . .
turiya
which is the fourth state of the Self” (ātman), symbolised by the
syllable AUM as a whole, “the supreme or absolute self of being” of
which the waking self, dream-self and sleep-self (virāt., hiran.yagarbha
and prājña) “are derivations for the enjoyment of relative experience in the world”; brahman in its “pure self-status” about which
“neither consciousness nor unconsciousness as we conceive it can
be affirmed . . . ; it is a state of superconscience absorbed in its selfexistence, in a self-silence or a self-ecstasy, or else it is the status of

8
a free Superconscient containing or basing everything but involved in
nothing”.
turı̄ya
turiya dasyabuddhi
dāsyabuddhi ~ the sense of quaternary dāsya, a state in which
all inner and outer activities are perceived to come “only as things
impelled by the divine hand of the Master”.
Tvas.t.ā (Twashta) ~ same as Tvas.t.r..
Tvasta
Tvas.t.r. (Twashtri) ~ a Vedic god, “the Fashioner of things”; the uniTvastr
versal deva pervading all that he fashions as both “the indwelling Lord
and Maker” and “the material of his own works”.
tyāga ~ renunciation.
tyaga
.udana
udāna ~ one of the five workings of the life-force (pañcaprān.a), that
which “moves upward from the body to the crown of the head and is
a regular channel of communication between the physical life and the
greater life of the spirit”.
udāsı̄na ~ indifferent, impartial, “seated above and unmoved”; one
udasina
who “lives high-seated above” in “the unattached freedom of the soul
touched by the supreme knowledge”.
ud
udasina
āsı̄na ānanda
ananda ~ impartial delight.
udasina
ud
āsı̄na nati ~ nati with udāsı̄natā, a submission to the divine Will
that rises superior to the dualities, “regarding joy and sorrow equally
as God’s working in these lower instruments”.
udasina
ud
āsı̄na prema ~ impartial love, one of the three forms of prema.
udasina
ud
āsı̄na śsanti
ānti (udasina shanti) ~ peace of indifference; passive calm
based on udāsı̄natā.
udāsı̄natā ~ the state of being udāsı̄na; the indifference to the
udasinata
dvandvas or dualities that comes from “being seated above, superior to
all physical and mental touches”, the second stage of passive / negative
samatā: “the soul’s impartial high-seatedness looking down from
above on the ﬂux of forms and personalities and movements and
forces”, regarding the “passions of the mind as things born of the
illusion of the outward mentality or inferior movements unworthy
of the calm truth of the single and equal spirit or a vital and emotional disturbance to be rejected by the tranquil observing will and
dispassionate intelligence of the sage”; indifference of various other
9
kinds, due to “either the inattention of the surface desire-soul in its
mind, sensations, emotions and cravings to the rasa of things, or its
incapacity to receive and respond to it, or its refusal to give any surface
response or, again, its driving and crushing down of the pleasure or
the pain by the will”; see rajasic udāsı̄natā, sattwic udāsı̄natā, tamasic
udāsı̄natā, trigun.ātı̄ta udāsı̄natā.
uddeśya (uddeshya) ~ the end in view.
uddesya
uddı̄pana ~ excitation; stimulus.
uddipana
udvigna anandabhava
ānandabhāva ~ troubled state of ānanda.
udyogalipsā ~ the urge towards the application of knowledge to life,
udyogalipsa
an element of Mahāsarasvatı̄ bhāva.
ugra ~ forceful, impetuous, violent, vehement; vivid.
ugrapravr.tti (ugrapravritti) ~ vehement activity.
ugrapravrtti
ugratā ~ forcefulness, impetuosity, violence, vehemence; an element
ugrata
of Mahākālı̄ bhāva or Can.d.ı̄bhāva.
ugra tapas ~ forceful or violent use of will-power.
uktham ~ prayer.
uninspired intuition ~ intuition not uplifted by inspiration (or revelation), the lowest form of intuitional ideality.
untelepathic trik
trikaladrsti
āladr.s.t.i ~ same as non-telepathic trikāladr.s.t.i.
upalabdhi ~ objective experience; subjective experience, realisation,
“spiritual experience ~ a realisation in the very substance of our being”.
uparati ~ cessation; inaction.
upāsanā ~ worship.
upasana
ūrdhvagati (urdhwagati) ~ literally “upward movement”; same as
urdhvagati
utthāpanā or utthāpanā-śakti.
ūrjasvı̄ ~ forceful.
urjasvi
urjo napt
ūrjo
napta
ā sahasv
sahasvan
ān ~ the son of Energy, the master of Force.
uruśaṁsa (urushansa) ~ wide in expression.
urusamsa
Us.ā (Usha) ~ the Vedic goddess of Dawn, bringer of divine illuminaUsa
tion; “the illumining dawn of the higher or undivided Consciousness”.
us.asi (ushasi) ~ in the dawn (of the illumined consciousness).
usasi
utsāha ~ effort.
utsaha
uttama ~ highest; the supreme Being (purus.ottama), “the supreme
Brahman, the supreme Self, who possesses both the immutable unity
and the mobile multiplicity”, the Lord (ı̄śvara) who “by a large

0
mobility and action of His nature, His energy, His will and power . . .
manifests Himself in the world and by a greater stillness and immobility
of His being . . . is aloof from it”.
uttama
uttamam
ṁ rahasyam ~ highest secret, the “supreme mystery of the being of the Purushottama, . . . the miracle of a supreme Person and
apparent vast Impersonal that are one, an immutable transcendent
Self of all things and a Spirit that manifests itself here at the very
foundation of cosmos as an infinite and multiple personality acting
everywhere”. [Cf. Gı̄tā 4.3]
utthāpanā ~ (literally) raising, elevating; “the state of not being subutthapana
ject to the pressure of physical forces”, the second member of the śarı̄ra
catus.t.aya, called utthāpanā or levitation because of its third and final
stage (tertiary utthāpanā) in which “gravitation is conquered”, but
usually referring to either of two earlier stages (primary utthāpanā
and secondary utthāpanā) in which “the habit by which the bodily
nature associates certain forms and degrees of activity with strain,
fatigue, incapacity” is rectified, resulting in a great increase in “the
power, freedom, swiftness, effectiveness of the work whether physical
or mental which can be done with this bodily instrument”; exercise for the development of utthāpanā (such as walking for primary
utthāpanā).
utth
utthapana-sakti
āpanā-śakti (utthapana-shakti; utthapana shakti) ~ the force of
utthāpanā, based on a combination of the siddhis of the body, especially laghimā and mahimā.
.V. ~ abbreviation of “Vachas” (see vacas).
.V.A ~ abbreviation of “Vijnana Ananda” (see vijñānānanda).
.vacah
vācah. (vachah) ~ plural of vāk (in the sense of vacas).
.vacamsi
vacāṁsi (vachansi) ~ plural of vacas.
.vacas (vachas) ~ word; text; same as sortilege.
.vaidyuta ~ composed of vidyut; electrical; electricity (see vaidyutam);
short for vaidyutānanda.
.vaidyuta ānanda
ananda ~ same as vaidyutānanda.
.vaidyutam ~ electricity; the “electric energy” of the life-force (prān.a)
whose currents are felt “vibrating up and down the nerves”.
aidyut
vaidyutananda
ānanda ~ “electric”
201
ānanda; a form of śārı̄rānanda or
physical ānanda which “comes as a blissful electric shock or current
on the brain or other part of the nervous system”. It is said to be “of
two kinds, positive or fiery & negative or cold”, corresponding to
“two forms of sukshma vidyut [subtle electricity] that are the basis of
the phenomena of heat & cold”; a “neutral” vaidyutānanda is also
mentioned.
Vaikun.t.ha ~ the heaven of Vis.n.u.
Vaikuntha
vaiparı̄tyam ~ contradiction; disharmony.
vaiparityam
vaira ~ enmity; the relation (bhāva) with the ı̄śvara in which he comes
to us “as an enemy, with the wrath of love”, and our relations with
him are “those of battle and struggle”; this relation is combined with
friendship (sakhya) into sakhya-vaira as an element of the composite
bhāva.
vairāgı̄ ~ one who is disgusted with the world.
vairagi
vairāgya (vairagya; vairagyam) ~ disgust with the world, frequently
vairagya
a motive for asceticism and the renunciation of life; often used in the
sense of tamasic vairāgya.
vairāgyam ~ see vairāgya.
vairagyam
vairyam ~ same as vaira.
vaiśva ~ universal.
vaisva
vaiśya (vaishya; vaisya) ~ the soul-type representing “the Divine as
vaisya
production, enjoyment and mutuality”, the third element in the fourfold personality symbolised by the cāturvarn.ya.
vaiśyaśakti (vaishyashakti) ~ the “soul-power of mutuality” which
vaisyasakti
reveals itself in the vaiśya.
vaiśyasvabh
vaisyasvabhava
āva (vaishyaswabhava) ~ the inner nature of the vaiśya.
vaisya tejas (vaishya tejas) ~ the energy that manifests itself in the
vaiśya
vaiśya temperament.
vāja ~ plenitude, abundance, substance.
vaja
vājasātih. ~ conquest of the plenitude.
vajasatih
vajra ~ a nād.ı̄ (subtle nerve-channel) connected with the genitourinary system.
vāk ~ word or words, usually internal, but also (in “indicative vak”)
vak
written words serving as sortilege; speech; subtle (sūks.ma) speech
heard in śabdadr.s.t.i; inward speech expressing jñāna, a speech “in
which the higher knowledge, vision or thought can clothe itself within

2
us for expression”, especially “the word revelatory, inspired or intuitive” that “manifests inwardly with a light, a power, a rhythm of
thought and a rhythm of inner sound” by which “it pours into the
language, even though the same as that of mental speech, another than
the limited intellectual, emotional or sensational significance”.
vākya ~ speech; sentence.
vakya
Vala ~ a Vedic demon, the “circumscriber” or “encloser”; the enemy who holds back the Light.
Vali ~ same as Bali2, representing a form of energy (tejas) lacking in ardour but full of patience (dhairya) and obstinacy (hat.ha).
vāmamārga ~ the “left-hand path” of Tantra; the way of ānanda: “Nature in man liberating itself by joyous acceptance . . . of its own energies”.
vvamih
āmı̄h. suvı̄r
suvira
ā is
isah
. ah. (vamih suvira ishah) ~ delightful impulsions full of
a perfect energy. [Cf. R.g Veda 3.53.1]
V. Ananda ~ abbreviation of vijñāna ānanda (see vijñānānanda).
vānara ~ ape; “man with the Ape nature”; the second of the ten types of consciousness (daśa-gāvas) in the evolutionary scale: mind concentrated on the prān.a. 
vānara-asura (vanara-asura) ~ the vānara stage of the asura, which evolves in the first two manvantaras of the sixth pratikalpa.
vangmaya ~ see vāṅmaya.
vān.ı̄ ~ voice; speech; “a word, a message or an inspiration that devani scends to us from above”, sometimes seeming to be “a voice of the Self or of the Ishwara”; a voice conveying a message, often of the nature of guidance or prediction, from a divine or other source, usually distinguished from sūks.ma vāk (subtle speech) which does not come “from above”, but is heard “outside” (though there is also an “external” vān.ı̄).
vvani
ān.ı̄ script ~ script dictated by vān.ı̄.
vāṅmaya (vangmaya) ~ (thought) expressed in vāk; short for vāṅvanmaya
maya thought.
vāṅmaya (vangmaya) thought ~ thought expressing itself “in the form
vanmaya
of an inward speech” (vāk) without the “separate character” of vān.ı̄;
a form of jñāna defined as “the revelation of truth through right
and perfect vak in the thought”, regarded as a special power of śruti
and distinguished from perceptive thought. It has two movements: the

3
effulgent (or original), which is “vak leaping forth from the ideality
with the ideation contained in it”, and the refulgent (or derivative),
which expresses a previous ideation or proceeds “from a silent indefinite ideation to which it gives form and expression”.
Varāhı̄ ~ the śakti of Vis.n.u in his third avatāra, when he incarnated
Varahi
as a mighty boar (Varāha) to raise the Earth from the depths of the
ocean.
vārddhakya (vardhakya) ~ old age.
varddhakya
varn.a ~ colour; one of the seven kinds of akashic material; rūpa or
varna
lipi composed of this material.
varn.aghana ~ dense varn.a.
varnaghana
varn.a-lipi ~ lipi composed of varn.a.
varna-lipi
varn.amaya (varnamaya; varnamay) ~ coloured; (rūpa or lipi) comvarnamaya
posed of varn.a.
varn.aprasāda ~ clearness of the complexion.
varnaprasada
varta ~ see vārttā.
vartam
vartamanadrsti
ānadr.s.t.i (vartamanadrishti) ~ same as present trikāladr.s.t.i.
vārttā (varta) ~ livelihood, subsistence.
vartta
Varun.a ~ “the Lord of Wideness”, a Vedic god who “brings to us
Varuna
the infinite oceanic space of the divine soul and its ethereal, elemental
purity”, one of the Four who represent the “working of the Truth in
the human mind and temperament”; in post-Vedic mythology, the god
of the sea.
vāsanā ~ desire.
vasana
vaśı̄karan.a (vashikarana) ~ control, especially as exercised by vaśitā.
vasikarana
vaśitā (vashita) ~ concentration of the will on a person or object so
vasita
as to control it, one of the three siddhis of power; an instance of such
a concentration of the will.
vaśitā-ı̄śitā (vashita-ishita) ~ the combination of vaśitā and ı̄śitā, two
vasita-isita
of the three siddhis of power.
Vāsudeva ~ a name of Kr.s.n.a.
Vasudeva
vātsalya ~ parental affection, especially of a mother for her child; the
vatsalya
relation (bhāva) with “God the Child”, where the ı̄śvara is experienced
as “the child born to our desire whom we cherish and rear”, part of
the composite bhāva in which “the most intimate human relations”
are made “stepping-stones to the supra-human”.
vayavic ~ relating to vāyu1, gaseous; relating to prān.a, vital.

4
.vvayavya
āyavya jala ~ jala containing an excess of vāyu1.
.vvayu
āyu1 ~ air, wind, gas; the gaseous condition of material being, one
of the pañcabhūta: material Force “modifying its first ethereal status”
(ākāśa) to assume “a second, called in the old language the aerial, of
which the special property is contact between force and force, contact
that is the basis of all material relations”.
Vayu
āyu2 ~ the Vedic god of Wind, the universal deva as “the Master of
Life, inspirer of that Breath or dynamic energy”, later called prān.a,
which “was considered to be a great force pervading all material
existence and the condition of all its activities”.
vāyumaya ~ gaseous; consisting of or relating to vāyu1.
vayumaya
Vāyuputra ~ son of Vāyu2.
Vayuputra
Veda-jññana
āna ~ (intuitive) knowledge of the Veda.
vena ~ a kind of angelic being; cherub.
vepathu ~ trembling, regarded as “the sign of the pranashakti at work
improving an unfit adhara”.
vibhu ~ pervasive; the all-pervading Master.
vibhūti ~ manifestation of divine power; an exceptional individual
vibhuti
who embodies “some power of the Divine and is enabled by it to act
with great force in the world”.
vicāra (vichara) ~ intellectual reﬂection, judgment.
vicara
vicitra (vichitra) ~ rich and varied; variegated.
vicitrabodha (vichitrabodha; vichitra bodha) ~ “richness and great
variety and minuteness of the perceptions”, an element of buddhiśakti.
vidhāna ~ arrangement and right assignment of perceptions.
vidhana
vı̄d.uhars.in (viduharshin) ~ exulting in its strength. [Cf. R
viduharsin
. g Veda
2.23.11]
vidvan
vidv
ān deva ~ all-knowing Godhead.
vidyā ~ knowledge, including the higher and the lower knowledge,
vidya
parā vidyā and aparā vidyā, “the knowledge of Brahman in Himself
and the knowledge of the world”; “the Knowledge of the Oneness”,
the power by which “the Spirit dwells . . . in the consciousness of
unity and identity”; the “science and craft and technique of things”,
an element of Mahāsarasvatı̄ bhāva.
vidyā-avidyā ~ the Knowledge-Ignorance, where vidyā, the convidya-avidya
sciousness of unity, is subject to the conditions of avidyā, the divided
consciousness.

5
.vidy
vidya-avidya-siddhi
ā-avidyā-siddhi ~ the perfection (siddhi) that is attainable under the conditions of vidyā-avidyā, where Knowledge is “inextricably
intertwined with an original Ignorance”.
vidyādhara ~ a kind of supernatural being with magical power and
vidyadhara
knowledge (vidyā); in the evolutionary scale, a sub-type of the deva
type.
vidyunman
vidyunmandala
. d.ala (vidyunmandal) ~ a halo of lightnings.
vidyunmaya ~ filled with lightning.
vidyut ~ lightning; electricity; a term sometimes substituted for varn.a
as one of the seven kinds of akashic material.
vih. ~ bird (Vedic symbol of the inner being).
vı̄ja ~ seed; a spark or speck resembling a seed; also spelled bı̄ja.
vija
vijññana
āna (vijnana; vijnanam; vijnan) ~ “the large embracing consciousness . . . which takes into itself all truth and idea and object of knowledge and sees them at once in their essence, totality and parts or
aspects”, the “comprehensive consciousness” which is one of the four
functions of active consciousness (see ājñānam), a mode of awareness
that is “the original, spontaneous, true and complete view” of existence
and “of which mind has only a shadow in the highest operations of
the comprehensive intellect”; the faculty or plane of consciousness
above buddhi or intellect, also called ideality, gnosis or supermind
(although these are distinguished in the last period of the Record of
Yoga as explained under the individual terms), whose instruments
of knowledge and power form the vijñāna catus.t.aya; the vijñāna
catus.t.aya itself; the psychological principle or degree of consciousness
that is the basis of maharloka, the “World of the Vastness” that links
the worlds of the transcendent existence, consciousness and bliss of
saccidānanda to the lower triloka of mind, life and matter, being
itself usually considered the lowest plane of the parārdha or higher
hemisphere of existence. Vijñāna is “the knowledge of the One and
the Many, by which the Many are seen in the terms of the One, in the
infinite unifying Truth, Right, Vast [satyam r.taṁ br.hat] of the divine
existence”.
vijññana
āna ananda
ānanda (vijnana ananda; vijnana-ananda) ~ same as vijñānānanda.
vijññana
āna bhava
bhāva ~ supra-intellectual state of consciousness.
vijññana
āna brahman ~ brahman experienced in vijñāna.
6
.vijññanabuddhi
ānabuddhi (vijnanabuddhi; vijnana-buddhi; vijnana buddhi) ~
the intuitive mind, intermediate between intellectual reason (mānasa
buddhi) and pure vijñāna, a faculty consisting of vijñāna “working
in mind under the conditions and in the forms of mind”, which “by
its intuitions, its inspirations, its swift revelatory vision, its luminous
insight and discrimination can do the work of the reason with a higher
power, a swifter action, a greater and spontaneous certitude”.
vijññana-caksuh
āna-caks.uh. (vijnana-chakshu) ~ eye of vijñāna.
vijññana
āna catus
catustaya
. t.aya (vijnanachatusthaya; vijnana-chatusthaya; vijnana
chatusthaya) ~ the third catus.t.aya, the quaternary of the supraintellectual faculty (vijñāna), whose members are usually listed as
jñāna, trikāladr.s.t.i, as.t.asiddhi and samādhi; as.t.asiddhi is sometimes
replaced by rūpadr.s.t.i and tapas, making five members.
vijññana
āna darśana
darsana (vijnana darshana) ~ vision of brahman on the plane
of vijñāna.
vijññanadrsti
ānadr.s.t.i (vijnanadrishti; vijnana drishti) ~ dr.s.t.i (revelation) acting in the vijñāna free from mental accompaniment or limitation.
vijññana
āna ghanat
ghanata
ā ~ massed concentration of vijñāna.
vijññana
āna jyotis ~ light of vijñāna.
vijññanakosa
ānakośa (vijnanakosha; vijnana-kosha) ~ the sheath (kośa) corresponding to vijñāna, “the knowledge-sheath, the causal [kāran.a] body”, by living in which the human being “will be able to draw down entirely into his terrestrial existence the fullness of the infinite spiritual consciousness”.
vijññana
āna loka ~ the world (loka) of vijñāna, same as maharloka, “the
plane of the gnosis” where “the infinite . . . is very concretely . . . the
foundation from which everything finite forms itself”.
vijññanam
ānam ~ see vijñāna.
vijññanamaya
ānamaya (vijnanamaya; vijnanamay) ~ supra-intellectual; having
the nature of vijñāna, the principle that links saccidānanda to mind,
life and matter and is revealed through the faculties of smr.ti, śruti and
dr.s.t.i; expressing the principle of vijñāna involved in or subordinated
to the principle of another plane, such as the physical or mental. The
terms ideal, gnostic and supramental are almost interchangeable with
vijñānamaya in the Record of Yoga up to 1920; in 1927, the word
vijñānamaya does not occur, while “supramental” and “gnostic” refer
to planes higher than ideality.
7
.vijññanamaya
ānamaya ānandamaya ı̄śvara (vijnanamaya anandamaya ishwara) ~ the all-knowing and all-blissful Lord.
.vijññanamaya
ānamaya samadhi
samādhi ~ same as savijñāna samādhi.
.vijññanamaya
ānamaya tapas ~ tapas on the plane of vijñāna, “that which fulfils what the knowledge sees”; same as ideal tapas.
.vijññanamaya
ānamaya thought ~ thought elevated to the plane of vijñāna.
.vijññanamaya
ānamaya trik
trikaladrsti
āladr.s.t.i (vijnanamaya trikaldrishti) ~ time-vision in
the vijñāna.
.vijññanamayi
ānamayı̄ ~ feminine of vijñānamaya.
.vijññanananda
ānānanda ~ ānanda experienced on the plane of vijñāna; same
as cidghanānanda.
.vijññanapadma
ānapadma ~ lotus of knowledge; see sahasradala.
.vijñana
ñāna reason ~ same as luminous reason (logistic ideality).
.vijññana
āna śakti
sakti (vijnana shakti) ~ the śakti acting on the plane of
vijñāna.
.vijññana-samadhi
āna-samādhi (vijnana-samadhi; vijnana samadhi) ~ samādhi
transformed by the action of vijñāna; a higher counterpart of the
traditional savicāra samādhi, replacing intellectual judgment and
perception by their supra-intellectual equivalents.
vijññanasarathyupeta
ānasārathyupeta rathi
rathı̄ vidv
vidvan
ān ~ the Knower riding in the chariot
(of the body) with vijñāna as charioteer.
vijññanasiddhi
ānasiddhi (vijnanasiddhi; vijnana-siddhi; vijnana siddhi) ~ the
perfection of the vijñāna catus.t.aya.
vijññana
āna suddha
śuddha ananta (vijnana shuddha ananta) ~ pure infinite delight (śuddha ananta ānanda) experienced on the plane of vijñāna.
vijññana
āna thought ~ same as vijñānamaya thought.
vijññana
āna trik
trikaladrsti
āladr.s.t.i (vijnana trikaldrishti) ~ same as vijñānamaya
trikāladr.s.t.i.
vijññanavan
ānavān deva ~ the Godhead manifesting through vijñāna.
vijññana
āna yantrita ~ controlled by vijñāna.
vikalpa ~ variation; variety; distinction.
vikāra ~ modification, derivative.
vikara
vināsmaran.a (vinasmarana; vina-smarana; vina smarana) ~ without
vinasmarana
smaran.a; (physical ānanda) independent of memory or attention.
viparı̄ta ~ contrary, inverse, perverse.
viparita
virakti ~ disgust, aversion.
virāt. ~ “the Shining and Mighty One”, brahman manifest in the first
virat
8
of the three states symbolised by the letters of AUM; the Self (ātman)
supporting the waking state (jāgrat) or sthūla consciousness; the Lord
(ı̄śvara) pervading the external universe as the Cosmic Soul.
virat
vir
āt. purusa
purus.a (virat purusha) ~ same as virāt..
virati ~ cessation, desistence; dissatisfaction.
virodha ~ opposition; repugnance.
vı̄rya (virya; viryam) ~ strength of character; “the energy of the divine
virya
temperament expressing itself in the fourfold type of the chaturvarnya”
(see cāturvarn.ya), the first member of the śakti catus.t.aya, consisting
of the dynamic force “of the temperament, character and soul nature,
svabhāva, which makes the power of our members effective in action
and gives them their type and direction”; heroism, an attribute of
Balarāma; the virile energy carried to the head by udāna.
vı̄ryam ~ see vı̄rya.
viryam
vı̄ryamiti ~ vı̄rya consists of. . . .
viryamiti
vı̄rya, śakti, can.d.ı̄bhāvah., śraddhā, iti śakticatus.t.ayam (virya,
virya,
shakti, chandibhavah, sraddha, iti shaktichatusthayam) ~ vı̄rya, śakti,
Can.d.ı̄bhāva and śraddhā: these constitute the śakti catus.t.aya.
vis.āda (vishada) ~ despondency, depression.
visada
viśālatā ~ wideness, an element of Maheśvarı̄ bhāva.
visalata
visarjana ~ discharge.
vis.aya (vishaya) ~ an object of sensory or other experience; any of
visaya
the five “properties of energy or matter, sound, touch, form, taste and
smell, which constitute the way in which the mind-sense perceives
objects”, being “five different ways of sense cognizance of the world,
powers evolved by the universal energy [prakr.ti] in order to deal
with all the forms of things she has created from the five elemental
states [pañcabhūta] assumed by her original objective substance”;
(also called sūks.ma vis.aya) an immaterial object or sensation perceived by a subtle sense (sūks.ma indriya); short for vis.ayadr.s.t.i or
vis.ayānanda.
visaya
vis
ānanda (vishaya ananda) ~ same as vis.ayānanda.
. aya ananda
vis.ayabhoga (vishayabhoga; vishaya bhoga) ~ vis.ayānanda in the
visayabhoga
state of bhoga.
visaya
vis
. aya buddhi (vishaya buddhi) ~ worldly reason, science; an attribute of Aniruddha.
vis.ayadr.s.t.i (vishayadrishti) ~ subtle sense-perception (sūks.ma dr.s.t.i)
visayadrsti

9
in general or any particular form of such perception, especially perception of the sūks.ma vis.ayas of sound, touch, smell and taste (śabda,
sparśa, gandha and rasa), with vision of rūpa often mentioned separately; the faculty or faculties constituting the instrumentation of
saṁjñāna or “sense in its purity”, which “exists behind and beyond the
mind it uses and is a movement of the self, a direct and original activity
of the infinite power of its consciousness”, capable of presenting to us
“things concealed from the limited receptivity or beyond the range
of the physical organs, . . . scenes, forms, happenings, symbols of the
vital, psychical, mental, supramental, spiritual worlds”.
vis.aya-kāma (vishaya-kama) ~ the combination of vis.ayānanda and
visaya-kama
kāmānanda.
vis.ayānanda (vishayananda) ~ ānanda in the objects of sense (vis.avisayananda
yas), a form of śārı̄rānanda or physical ānanda by which all “sense and
sensation becomes full of . . . a divine joy, the delight of the Brahman”;
the experience of vis.ayānanda in relation to a particular sense (indriya)
and its objects.
vis
visaya-nirananda
. aya-nirānanda (vishaya-nirananda) ~ undelight in the objects of
sense.
viśes.a-rādhas (vishesha-radhas) ~ special ecstasy.
visesa-radhas
vishada ~ see vis.āda.
vishaya, etc. ~ see vis.aya, etc.
vishaya
vishesha-radhas ~ see viśes.a-rādhas.
Vishnu, etc. ~ see Vis.n.u, etc.
Vishnu
vishuddha, etc. ~ see viśuddha, etc.
vishuddha
vishuddhi ~ see viśuddhi.
vishwadarshana ~ see viśvadarśana.
viśis.t.ādvaita (visishtadwaita, visistaadvaita) ~ modified monism; the perception of “relation in a qualified identity”.
vismaran.a ~ forgetfulness.
vismarana
vismr.ti (vismriti) ~ forgetfulness, inattention.
vismrti
Vis.n.u (Vishnu) ~ a Vedic god, “the all-pervading, the cosmic Deity, the
Visnu
Lover and Friend of our souls, the Lord of the transcendent existence
and the transcendent delight”, who supplies for the action of the other
gods “the necessary static elements, ~ Space, the ordered movements
of the worlds, the ascending levels, the highest goal”; in later Hinduism,
the Preserver of the world, one of the “three Powers and Personalities

0
of the One Cosmic Godhead”, of which the other two are Brahmā, the
Creator, and Śiva or Rudra2, the Destroyer; also regarded as the Lord
himself (ı̄śvara) who incarnates in the avatāras, and the one deva of
whom all the gods are manifestations; in the Record of Yoga, usually
a subordinate aspect of Kr.s.n.a, sometimes identified with Pradyumna
as the personality of the fourfold ı̄śvara whose śakti is Mahālaks.mı̄.
Vis
Visnu-Narayana
. n.u-Nārāyan.a (Vishnu-Narayana) ~ Vis.n.u, regarded as a cosmic
personality of Kr.s.n.a, manifesting in the form of Nārāyan.a, who is
“Vishnu . . . as the God in man”.
Vis.n.uśakti (Vishnushakti) ~ the soul-power or element of vı̄rya
Visnusakti
that expresses the personality of the fourfold ı̄śvara as Vis.n.u or
Pradyumna.
visr.s.t.i (visrishti) ~ evacuation; discharge of waste matter from the
visrsti
digestive system in the liquid form of mūtra (in jalavisr.s.t.i) or in the
solid form of purı̄s.a (in pārthiva visr.s.t.i), a process whose diminution
indicates improved assimilation connected with ārogya.
visr
visrsti-visarjana
. s.t.i-visarjana (visrishti-visarjana) ~ discharge of mūtra or purı̄s.a.
viśuddha (vishuddha; visuddha) ~ the cakra in the throat, the centre
visuddha
of consciousness that “governs the expressive and externalising mind”.
viśuddhatā (vishuddhata) ~ purity of the thinking faculty, an element
visuddhata
of buddhiśakti.
viśuddhatā, prakāśa, vicitrabodha, jñānadhāran.asāmarthyam iti
visuddhata,
buddhiśaktih. (vishuddhata, prakasha, vichitrabodha, jnanadharanasamarthyam iti buddhishaktih) ~ purity, clarity, variety of understanding, capacity to hold all knowledge: these constitute the power
of the thinking mind.
viśuddhi (vishuddhi; visuddhih) ~ purity; same as viśuddhatā.
visuddhi
viśuddhih., prakāśo, vicitrabodho, jñānasāmarthyam (visuddhih,
visuddhih,
prakasho, vichitrabodho, jnanasamarthyam) ~ purity, clarity, variety of understanding, capacity for all knowledge (the elements of buddhiśakti).
viśvadarśana (vishwadarshana; vishwa darshana) ~ vision of all the worlds; ānandadarśana on all planes.
viśvadevaloka ~ the world of the all-gods or karmadevatās.
visvadevaloka
viśvadr.s.t.i (visvadrishti) ~ vision of all the worlds.
visvadrsti
viśvagati ~ the power to travel through all the worlds (lokas) in samādhi; an alternative name for the last member of the vijñāna catus.t.aya.
.visvaisvarya
viśvaiśvarya (visvaiswarya) ~ universal power, omnipotence.
.Visvakarman
Viśvakarman ~ the divine architect of the universe, identified with
Tvas.t.r..
.visvasparsa
viśvasparśa (visvasparsha) ~ universal touch.
.viśv
visva
ā varyani
vāryān.i śravasy
sravasya
ā ~ all the boons of inspired knowledge. [R
.g
Veda 1.149.5]
.viveka (viveka; vivek) ~ intuitive discrimination, one of the two components of smr.ti, a faculty of jñāna; its function is “to seize on our thoughts & intuitions, arrange them, separate their intellectual from their vijnanamaya elements, correct their false extensions, false limitations, misapplications & assign them their right application, right extension, right limitation”.
vivekamaya ~ having the nature of viveka.
vivekamaya trikāladr.s.t.i (trikaldrishti) ~ trikāladr.s.t.i in which viveka is used for “deciding the correct event among the various tendencies, applied forces & possibilities”.
vividhānanda ~ various delight; ānanda as the last member of
vividhananda
the śarı̄ra catus.t.aya, consisting of the fivefold physical ānanda or
śārı̄rānanda whose forms are kāmānanda, vis.ayānanda, tı̄vrānanda,
raudrānanda and vaidyutānanda.
vividha
vividh
ā vvani
ān.ı̄ ~ miscellaneous vān.ı̄.
vivr.ta (vivrita) ~ open, revealed.
vivrta
vouloir (exclusivement) la délivrance
delivrance de ses vassaux [French] ~ to desire (exclusively) the deliverance of his vassals.
vraj
vraja
ā bhuranta gonam
gonām ~ (the steeds of life-energy) gallop to the pens
of the luminous cows (the illuminations of the divine Truth). [R
. g Veda
5.6.7]
vran.a ~ wound; ﬂaw, “scar of imperfection”. [Cf. Īśā Upanis.ad 8]
vrana
vrijina ~ see vr.jina.
vrika ~ see vr.ka.
vrisha ~ see vr.s.ā.
Vritra ~ see Vr.tra.
vritratwa ~ see vr.tratva.
vr.jina (vrijina) ~ crooked.
vrjina
vr.ka (vrika) ~ wolf; “tearer”; a type of hostile being in the Veda.
vrka
vr.s.ā (vrisha) ~ as master or strongly or abundantly.
vrsa

2
.Vrtra
Vr.tra (Vritra) ~ a Vedic demon, the “coverer” who blocks the ﬂow of the waters of being; a hostile power obstructing the yoga.
.vrtratva
vr.tratva (vritratwa) ~ state of being concealed by Vr.tra; obscuration.
.vyaghracarma
vyāghracarma (vyaghracharma) ~ tiger-skin.
.vyakarana
vyākaran.a ~ grammar; a special power that gives the intuitive knowledge of grammar, related to bhās.āśakti.
.vyakta ~ manifest.
.vyana
vyāna ~ one of the five workings of the life-force (pañcaprān.a), that
which “distributes the vital energies throughout the body”.
.vyapti
vyāpti ~ the pervasion of all by a universal consciousness; a stream
of conscious connection between beings arising from a fundamental
unity; (also called receptive vyāpti) the reception of thoughts, feelings,
etc., entering into one’s mind from others, one of the two siddhis
of knowledge whose combination constitutes telepathy; (also called
effective or communicative vyāpti) the transmission of thoughts or
states of consciousness to others, an agent of vaśitā.
vyāptih., prākāmyam, aiśvaryam, ı̄śitā, vaśitā, mahimā, laghimā,
vyaptih,
an.imā, iti as.t.asiddhih. (vyaptih, prakamyam, aishwaryam, ishita,
vashita, mahima, laghima, anima, iti ashtasiddhih) ~ vyāpti, prākāmya, aiśvarya, ı̄śitā, vaśitā, mahimā, laghimā, an.imā: these are the eight
siddhis or supernormal powers.
vy
vyapti-prakamya
āpti-prākāmya (vyapti-prakamya; vyaptiprakamya; vyapti prakamya) ~ the combination of vyāpti and prākāmya, the two siddhis of
knowledge, which constitutes telepathy.
vyaya ~ “capacity to spend freely”, an attribute of the vaiśya.
vyaya-laks.mı̄ (vyaya-lakshmi) ~ success and prosperity resulting from
vyaya-laksmi
expenditure of energies.
vyūha ~ marshalling of the rays of the sun of knowledge. [Cf. Īśā
vyuha
Upanis.ad 16]
.yadr
yadrcchalabhasantosah
. cchālābhasantos.ah. ~ being satisfied with whatever comes by
chance.
.yajña ~ sacrifice.
.yaksa
yaks.a (yaksha) ~ a kind of supernatural being belonging to a world
of pleasure; in the evolutionary scale, a sub-type of the deva type.
3
.Yama ~ the “Controller or Ordainer”, a form of the Vedic sun-god,
Sūrya2, as “the guardian of the divine Law”.
.yantra ~ tool, instrument, machine; the ādhāra as “a complex engine
of Nature” placed at the service of the ı̄śvara in the relation of tertiary
dāsya or yantrabhāva.
yantrabhāva ~ the relation (bhāva) with the ı̄śvara in which one has
yantrabhava
the sense of being a living instrument (yantra) in his hands, a state
associated with tertiary dāsya in which “we do not obey, but move to
his will as the string replies to the finger of the musician”.
yantran.ā ~ forcing, hurting.
yantrana
yantrı̄ ~ one who makes use of an instrument (yantra); the purus.a
yantri
as the “master of the machine”; the ı̄śvara as “the Mechanician . . .
mending & testing His machine” or as “the Worker” in whose hands
the ādhāra is a passive instrument.
yantrita ~ controlled.
yantrı̄-yantra
yantri-yantra bh
bhava
āva ~ the relation (bhāva) with the ı̄śvara that is
compared to that of an instrument (yantra) to the user of the instrument (yantrı̄), the control of the yantrı̄ being felt by the yantra “as
if it were being pushed by him with his hand upon it”.
yaśah.prāpti (yashahprapti) ~ the attainment of glory.
yasahprapti
yaśas (yashas) ~ glory; victory; success.
yasas
yaśolipsā (yasholipsa) ~ the urge towards glory and victory, an atyasolipsa
tribute of the ks.atriya.
yath
yatharthabodha
ārthabodha ~ correct perception.
yāthārthya ~ truth, real nature.
yatharthya
yat kiñca jagaty
jagatyam
āṁ jagat (yat kincha jagatyam jagat) ~ “whatever is
individual world of movement [jagat] in the universal motion [jagatı̄]”.
[Īśā Upanis.ad 1]
yauvana ~ youth.
yoga ~ union; “the union of that which has become separated in the play of the universe with its own true self, origin and universality”; any of various methods of seeking for such a union; especially the path of pūrn.a yoga, culminating in a “Yoga of self-perfection” by which the “liberated individual being, united with the Divine in self and spirit, becomes in his natural being a self-perfecting instrument for the perfect outﬂowering of the Divine in humanity”. In Sri Aurobindo’s diary, “the Yoga” usually refers to his practice of this Yoga of self-perfection, whose elements are enumerated in the sapta catus.t.aya; but the effective half of the karma catus.t.aya is for some purposes treated as part of “life” or the lı̄lā, as distinct from the yoga.
yoga catustaya
catus.t.aya (yoga chatushtaya) ~ the quaternary of yoga; another name for the siddhi catus.t.aya.
yog
yogagnimaya
āgnimaya śarı̄ra
sarira (yogagnimaya sharira) ~ a body filled with the
fiery energy generated by yoga. [Śvetāśvatara Upanis.ad 2.12]
yogāṅga ~ the limbs or divisions of the yoga of self-perfection.
yoganga
yogasiddhi (yogasiddhi; yoga-siddhi; yoga siddhi) ~ “the perfection that comes from the practice of Yoga”; the progressive or eventual attainment of perfection (siddhi) in yoga, especially in the yoga of selfperfection outlined in the sapta catus.t.aya, often not including karma or the effective half of the karma catus.t.aya.
yogatattva (yogatattwa) ~ the principles of yoga, especially the yoga of self-perfection outlined in the sapta catus.t.aya.
yogesvara Hari (yogeshwara Hari) ~ Kr.s.n.a, Master of the Yoga. [Cf. Gı̄tā 11.9]
yogin ~ one who practises yoga; one who has attained yogasiddhi.
yo . . . śamı̄
samim
ṁ śaśamānasya nindāt ~ “who confines the work when
man seeks his self-expression”. [R
. g Veda 5.42.10]
yo . . . suptes
suptesu
. u jāgarti ~ “this that wakes in the sleepers”. [Kat.ha
Upanis.ad 2.2.8]
yo . . . tucchy
tucchyan
ān kāmān karate sis.vidānah. ~ “who with sweat of effort
creates little fragmentary desires”. [R.g Veda 5.42.10]
yuddha ~ struggle, battle; (on page 1281) the name of a svarga.
yuddhalipsā ~ the urge towards battle, an element of Mahākālı̄ bhāva
yuddhalipsa
or Can.d.ı̄bhāva.
yuddhānanda ~ delight in struggle and battle.
yuddhananda
yuga ~ age, period; any of the four ages of a caturyuga.
